Assignment Filename =  001draft2.txt
Rising from beneath the muggle packaging, a sparkling new broomstick delights the viewer with its magnificent beauty.
The swirls of mist and stars floating around the broom help to create the magic within the picture, as the plain box and ribbon lay discarded on the ground.
The broom, with its long clean line, makes the viewer wish their own broomsticks had the ability to be so sleek and fresh.
By looking at the way the broom floats above the ordinary packaging, the viewer can see how J.K. Rowling has the ability to make normal things extraordinary; this is important because people tend to overlook ordinary objects' possibilities and limit themselves to the mundane.
By taking an ordinary object, such as this household cleaning utility, J.K. Rowling is able to stretch the viewers' imagination to beyond what is normal.
Children everywhere are able to take their mother's brooms and pretend they are wizards and witches because she gave them the little push to imagine the impossible.
This broom, pictured in chapter eleven of Harry Potter and the Prisoner of Azkaban, makes brooms in every cupboard around the world look pitiful.
With its long, sleek handle and it's crisp, straight tail, the broom pictured projects a look of pure magic.
Even the brace between the tail and handle shines like it is made of pure gold.
It is hard for a viewer to think this broom has ever been used.
This broom shines so bright, it can be seen even in black and white!
The tail has two sparkles that catch the viewer's eye, without those two accents it would be difficult to see this broom for anything more than a regular broomstick.
It is through the accents in this picture that the artist creates a sense of wonderment and magic.
The swirls of mist and stars around the broom are accents that seem vital to the picture.
Swirling around the broom with its magical manner, the mist creates a sense of wonderment.
Why is it there?
The viewer could assume that it is dust from the box that has not been opened in years, maybe lost in an attic and an unassuming person stumbled upon it.
However, since the use of stars in the mist is clearly visible, the viewer must assume that the broom has some supernatural powers.
So easily the artist was able to give an ordinary object significance and magic, just by adding stars.
The swirls at the ends of the mist draw the viewer's eye to each end of the broom, making it appear even longer than the box it came in.
This elongated affect adds emphasis to the lingering infatuation with wizards and witches.
It makes it appear better than the box it came in by being so clean and fresh.
This is a huge comparison to the worn box lying below.
The positioning of the broom in comparison to the ordinary box puts wizards and their belongings above muggles.
In this way, they are able to make something normal extraordinary and leave the ordinary behind.
Lying torn open below the magic broom is the forgotten packaging.
Even this, seemingly plain, box has serious meaning in the picture.
The wrinkled paper inside the box creates feeling urgency.
The person opening the box was clearly more concerned with its contents than saving the wrapping.
Ribbon lays forgotten to the sides of the box as hint that it was a gift.
The ribbon almost looks like wings extending from the box, like it wants to be able to fly like the broom inside.
Shadows are cast by the box, giving the viewer an idea of how deep the box has to be to hold such a large gift.
With the shadow growing larger near the top of the box, the viewer is left to wonder what the source of the light is.
Is it sunrise when the gift has been delivered?
Or maybe it was a gift delivered at sunset so the rider could leave that night.
The box itself is shaped to fit something slender at one end and wide at the other.
The mysterious material leaves the viewer guessing at what could be so sturdy to carry such an expensive object.
It appears to be a cardboard type of material, but wood would be more practical for an object as heavy as this.
The combination of J.K. Rowling's writing and the chapter artist's vision has created a picture that can confuse and delight people all at the same time.
With magic dust swirling around a broomstick that is gleaming in the unknown light source, the ordinary box is put to shame by its beauty.
This small picture has more meaning than meets the eye.
The positioning of the magical object, rising above the mundane and ordinary box, reveals the higher priority some people place on being magical.
In the Harry Potter series, there is a clear distinction between muggle-born and pure-blood, but they all seem to agree that magic is better than non-magic.
Wonderment is an excellent word to summarize this picture; the wonder in the unknown and how seemingly ordinary things become magical.
Brooms, objects that have been in use for centuries for their practicality, have been made into extraordinary flying objects with the use of imagination and creativity.
It is through pictures like this one, J.K. Rowling's visions have been brought to life.
Her creativity in words has been translated into a visual form the reader can use as a guide.
When looking at this picture, a viewer can almost imagine the person who opened the package standing in awe for s few seconds before realizing what exactly they have received.
It is through chapter art like this that helps the reader realize the importance of making things ordinary extraordinary.








Assignment Filename =  001final2.txt
Rising from beneath the muggle packaging, a sparkling new broomstick delights the viewer with its magnificent beauty.
The swirls of mist and stars floating around the broom help to create the magic within the picture, as the plain box and ribbon lay discarded on the ground.
The broom, with its long clean line, makes the viewer wish their own broomsticks had the ability to be so sleek and new.
By looking at the way the broom floats above the ordinary packaging, the viewer can see how J.K. Rowling has the ability to make normal things extraordinary; this is important because with this chapter art, the artist and Rowling make magic seem more important than non-magic.
By taking an ordinary object, such as this household cleaning utility, J.K. Rowling is able to stretch the viewer's imagination to beyond what is normal.
Children everywhere are able to take their mothers' brooms and pretend they are wizards and witches because she gave them the little push to imagine the impossible.
This broom, pictured in chapter eleven of Harry Potter and the Prisoner of Azkaban, makes brooms in every cupboard around the world look pitiful.
With its long, sleek handle and it's crisp, straight tail, the broom pictured projects a look of pure magic.
Even the brace between the tail and handle shines like it is made of pure gold.
It is hard for a viewer to think this broom has ever been used.
This broom shines so brightly, it can be seen even in black and white!
The tail has two sparkles that catch the viewer's eye, without those two accents it would be difficult to see this broom for anything more than a regular broomstick.
It is through the accents in this picture that the artist creates a sense of wonderment and magic.
The swirls of mist and stars around the broom are accents that seem vital to the picture.
Swirling around the broom in its magical manner, the mist creates a sense of wonderment.
Why is it there?
The viewer could assume that it is dust from the box that has not been opened in years, maybe lost in an attic and an unassuming person stumbled upon it.
However, since the use of stars in the mist is clearly visible, the viewer must assume that the broom has some supernatural powers.
So easily the artist was able to give an ordinary object significance and magic, just by adding stars.
The swirls at the ends of the mist draw the viewer's eye to each end of the broom, making it appear even longer than the box it came in.
This elongated affect adds emphasis to the lingering infatuation with wizards and witches.
It makes it appear better than the box it came in by being so clean and new.
This is a huge comparison to the worn box lying below.
The positioning of the broom in comparison to the ordinary box puts wizards and their belongings above muggles.
In this way, they are able to make something normal extraordinary and leave the ordinary behind.
Lying torn open below the magic broom is the forgotten packaging.
Even this, seemingly plain, box has serious meaning in the picture.
The wrinkled paper inside the box creates a feeling of urgency.
The person opening the box was clearly more concerned with its contents than saving the wrapping.
Ribbon lays forgotten to the sides of the box as a hint that it was a gift.
The ribbon almost looks like wings extending from the box, like it wants to be able to fly like the broom inside.
Shadows are cast by the box, giving the viewer an idea of how deep the box has to be to hold such a significant gift.
With the shadow growing larger near the top of the box, the viewer is left to wonder what the source of the light is.
Is it sunrise when the gift has been delivered?
Or maybe it was a gift delivered at sunset so the rider could leave that night.
The combination of J.K. Rowling's writing and the chapter artist's vision has created a picture that can confuse and delight people all at the same time.
Even the way the handle is tilted, it is almost inviting the reader to join in the action.
J.K. Rowling and the chapter artist have created this enticing picture, and it is only the chapter art!
With magic dust swirling around a broomstick that is gleaming in the unknown light source, the ordinary box is put to shame by its beauty.
This small picture has more meaning than meets the eye.
The positioning of the magical object, rising above the mundane and ordinary box, reveals the higher priority some people place on being magical.
In the Harry Potter series, there is a clear distinction between muggle-born and pure-blood, but they all seem to agree that magic is better than non-magic.
Wonderment is an excellent word to summarize this picture; the wonder in the unknown and how seemingly ordinary things become magical.
Brooms, objects that have been in use for centuries for their practicality, have been made into extraordinary flying objects with the use of imagination and creativity.
It is through pictures like this one, J.K. Rowling's visions have been brought to life.
Her creativity in words has been translated into a visual form the reader can use as a guide.
When looking at this picture, a viewer can almost imagine the person who opened the package standing in awe for a few seconds before realizing what exactly they have received.
It is through chapter art like this that helps the reader realize the importance of making things ordinary extraordinary.








Assignment Filename =  002draft3.txt
A Scottish teacher and historian, Thomas Carlyle once said, "A man willing to work, and unable to find work, is perhaps the saddest sight that fortune's inequality exhibits under this sun" (Carlyle).
While Thomas Carlyle was referring to a need for social reform in the United Kingdom, in Harry Potter and the Goblet of Fire, house elves Dobby and Winky demonstrate this quote to be very true.
Reactions to unemployment are as varied as the people unemployment effects.
By looking at the different reactions to house elf liberation shown by Winky and Dobby, readers are able to see that unemployment shows the true character of the person it effects, which most people do not see; this is important because while most people can pick themselves up after they fall, some are unable to and will ultimately give up hope.
Winky and Dobby are not typical house elves, but for different reasons.
Dobby, is almost the anti-house elf.
After being freed, he set out for work with intention of being paid and benefits.
It was after two years of searching he found work at Hogwarts with Professor Dumbledore as his new master.
Winky, on the other hand, was set free after a misunderstanding between government officials and her master.
She did not react as well as Dobby and her new found freedom.
She became depressed and even an alcoholic, going through six bottles of butter beer a day.
The other house elves at Hogwarts treat her as something to be shameful of because she is always drunk, crying, a sloppy mess, or passed out.
These two house elves show the two opposite sides of the spectrum of unemployment.
Dobby, the thriving go getter, and Winky, the depressed mess who cannot figure out what to do without a job or family to take care of.
The Great Depression happened over a period of ten years in the United States and some places in Europe.
Many things led to this period of time the United States History.
With the conclusion of World War I, a hands-off government, the people of the United States discovering credit and doubting the stock market, no one really understood how bad things could get.
The collapse of the Stock Market in October of 1929 set the United States marked the beginning of The Great Depression.
Banks failing, along with many small businesses left many people unemployed.
Most struggled with finding new work and began to rely on the government once Franklin D. Roosevelt came into office.
President Roosevelt was completely opposite of President Hoover's method of public welfare.
Hoover's hands-off approach left most distrusting the government and Roosevelt's involvement in the personal welfare of the people of the United States made him an immediate favorite.
He set up The New Deal, which helped those struggling by providing them with the help they needed.
Like Dumbledore accepting Dobby and Winky into his work force, President Roosevelt created jobs by employing the unemployed.
In the more recent recession, reactions to unemployment have been extremely varied.
The real estate industry crashed almost five years ago and has yet to be fully fixed.
Agents that were once making five figure deals are now sitting at home wondering when the real estate business will pick back up.
College students all over the country were changing majors from things that used to be lucrative to things that were now safe bets, like business or medical school.
The questions went from what can I make money in to what is a steady job?
Budget cuts had forced many people out of the job as well.
How do the unemployed deal with the sudden change?
Depression, confusion, and alcoholism are things that can happen to the recently unemployed.
Winky demonstrates all of these in her conversations with Harry and his friends while in the Hogwarts kitchens.
She hasn't moved for days, which is prevalent in her stained dress and somber attitude.
She is confused as to who is her master.
By refusing to reveal any of Mr. Crouch's secrets and denying pay from her new master, Dumbledore, Winky shows her confusion in who she can trust and who she should obey.
Alcoholism is reveled through her drunken weeping when Harry, Ron and Hermione come to visit a second time.
While butter beer may have very little alcohol in it, almost like a wine cooler, a house elf's stature makes it easy to get drunk from a few bottles.
These three responses to recent unemployment are negative effects of what unemployment can do to people who are not mentally prepared for the sudden change in life.
Empowerment, enlightenment, and creativity are some positive outcomes of unemployment.
Demonstrated to the fullest by Dobby, these occur to those who have mentally prepared themselves for what is to come and have planned accordingly.
Dobby is empowered by his freedom.
He immediately goes out and looks for a job that will pay him.
This is unheard of for a house elf!
Which is why it take hime two years to find someone open minded enough to be willing to pay enthusiastic workers.
Dumbledore empowered Dobby by letting him set the rules of their contract.
When Dumbledore offered Dobby too much pay and too much time off, Dobby took charge and made it clear that he wasn't asking for too much, just a steady job.
Enlightenment is something Dobby must have been born with.
He understood that he got the raw end of the deal being born into slavery.
It is with his help that Hermione wishes to enlighten the rest of the house elves into joining S.P.E.W and asking for wages, benefits, and vacation time.
While Dobby has unusual sense in style and overall attitude, no one can deny he isn't creative.
He is smart and resourceful and is not afraid to get what he wants.
The unemployed should have these qualities if they do not want to stay unemployed forever.
By becoming like Dobby, a empowered go -getter, the unemployed can make their own futures as bright as they want to.
Unemployment is something that effects everyone.
Dobby and Winky are prime examples of how one can rise to the occasion or fall under the pressure.
While not human, J.K. Rowling is using them as examples of how to react to drastic change in one's life.
She, herself, had financial problems before penning the Harry Potter series.
She could be showing a bit of herself in each of these characters.
Beaten down by society, she rose to the top and is now richer than the Queen of England.
By taking a page out of these house elves books, everyone can learn that tough times build character.
It is not what happens to people that defines them, rather how they react to what happens to them that defines them.






Assignment Filename =  002final3.txt
A Scottish teacher and historian, Thomas Carlyle, once said, "A man willing to work, and unable to find work, is perhaps the saddest sight that fortune's inequality exhibits under this sun" (Carlyle).
While Thomas Carlyle was referring to a need for social reform in the United Kingdom, in Harry Potter and the Goblet of Fire, house elves Dobby and Winky demonstrate this quote to be very true.
Reactions to unemployment are as varied as the people unemployment effects.
By looking at the history of unemployment, the reader can see that Winky the house elf shows the psychological effects that can happen after someone has been fired; this is important because J.K. Rowling is able to show how humans react to high stress situations through a character that was created not to endure stressful situations well.
The Great Depression happened over a period of ten years in the United States and some places in Europe.
Many things led to this period of time the United States History.
With the conclusion of World War I, a hands-off government, the people of the United States discovering credit and doubting the stock market, no one really understood how bad things could get.
The collapse of the Stock Market in October of 1929 set the United States marked the beginning of The Great Depression.
Banks failing, along with many small businesses, left many people unemployed.
Most struggled with finding new work and began to rely on the government once Franklin D. Roosevelt came into office.
President Roosevelt was completely opposite of President Hoover's method of public welfare.
Hoover's hands-off approach left most distrusting the government and Roosevelt's involvement in the personal welfare of the people of the United States made him an immediate favorite.
He set up The New Deal, which helped those struggling by providing them with the help they needed.
Like Dumbledore accepting Dobby and Winky into his work force, President Roosevelt created jobs by employing the unemployed.
In the more recent recession, reactions to unemployment have been extremely varied.
The real estate industry crashed almost five years ago and has yet to be fully fixed.
Agents that were once making five figure deals are now sitting at home wondering when the real estate business will pick back up.
College students all over the country were changing majors from things that used to be lucrative to things that were now safe bets, like business or medical school.
The questions went from what can I make money in to what will give me a steady job?
Budget cuts had forced many people out of the job as well.
How do the unemployed deal with the sudden change?
Winky and Dobby are not typical house elves, but for different reasons.
Dobby is almost the anti-house elf.
After being freed, he set out for work with intention of being paid and benefits.
It was after two years of searching he found work at Hogwarts with Professor Dumbledore as his new master.
Winky, on the other hand, was set free after a misunderstanding between government officials and her master.
She did not react as well as Dobby and her new found freedom.
She became depressed and even an alcoholic, going through six bottles of butter beer a day.
The other house elves at Hogwarts treat her as something to be shameful of because she is always drunk, crying, a sloppy mess, or passed out.
These two house elves show the two opposite sides of the spectrum of unemployment.
Dobby, the thriving go getter, and Winky, the depressed mess who cannot figure out what to do without a job or family to take care of.
The relationship between Dobby and Winky is one to learn from.
Dobby, while unemployed, makes sure to look out for his newly liberated friend Winky.
By finding them both jobs, Dobby becomes a protector of Winky, and remains a protector during their stay at Hogwarts.
While the other house-elves are ashamed of Winky's behavior, Dobby takes to looking out for Winky in her drunken stupors and periods of depression.
Depression, confusion, anxiety, and alcoholism are all things that can happen to the recently unemployed (Linn).
Winky demonstrates all of these in her conversations with Harry and his friends while in the Hogwarts kitchens.
She hasn't moved for days, which is prevalent in her stained dress and somber attitude.
She is confused as to who is her master.
By refusing to reveal any of Mr. Crouch's secrets and denying pay from her new master, Dumbledore, Winky shows her confusion in who she can trust and who she should obey.
Winky almost has an anxiety attack when she finds out that Mr. Crouch has not been going to work because he is sick.
She jumps to the conclusion that her old master is at home and has no one to take care of him; automatically assuming no one else is capable of taking care of her old master as well as she can.
Alcoholism is reveled through her drunken weeping when Harry, Ron and Hermione come to visit a second time.
Her newly found attachment to alcoholic beverages is common among the recently unemployed.
In a study published in the American Journal of Public Health, recently unemployed were recorded spending more days in bed sick than those who had steady jobs (Linn).
Winky knows there is work to be done in the Hogwarts kitchens, but stays in her spot near the fire.
Her responses to recent unemployment are only examples of the negative effects unemployment has on people who are not mentally prepared for the sudden change in life.
Another explanation of Winky's depression could be the "person-environment fit theory.
"  This theory suggests that the problems, like anxiety and depression, are caused from a sudden change in environment for the unemployed.
This theory also claims that persons seek work places that they feel comfortable in (Reynolds).
Winky clearly did not feel comfortable in any environment other than the Crouch household.
She had problems opening up to her new master, Dumbledore, because she was so caught up in being sacked by Barty Crouch.
By clinging to the secrets she kept for the Crouch family, Winky feels that she is still a part of the environment she feels the most comfortable in.
Unemployment is something that affects everyone.
Especially in times like these, it is hard not to know someone who has been affected by the sudden financial changes in our society.
Winky is an excellent example of the negative effects unemployment can have on the people it affects directly.
With events like the Great Depression and today's recession, researchers have been able to record the mental effects one can expect when unemployed.
J.K. Rowling does a good job revealing them in the character Winky.
She makes the reader see how a good friend like Dobby can help when put in bad situations. 








Assignment Filename =  003draft1.txt
Is clearly showed on this passage I have closed read on the prisoner of Azkaban the little "respect", consideration that students at Hogwarts have upon their teachers which most readers don't notice.
The students (Children) seem to be on a higher position than the teachers (Adults)  with more liberty to commit errors and to be forgiven.
However, the teachers are in a continuing observation.
They do one thing out of the normal and they are out.
Harry Potter, Hermione and Ron do not have the "fear" most student have upon teachers.
The capitalization of Harry's words- " YOU'RE PATHETIC!
" Harry yelled.- when talking to Snape , one of the most feared and "respected" teachers at Hogwarts, clearly shows how confidents Harry and the others have on themselves.
How because Dumblendore is on their side and is fooled by them, it means that their won't ever be punished and they can do whatever they want.
Others students could not even think on confronting a teacher like those, Harry, Hermione and Ron, are doing.
And not teachers could let them confront them either as they letting those three.
This is all because they are privileged.
Is not Harry anymore the only one who can do and don't do whatever he wants, its now the other two, his friends, Hermione and Ron that have also start doing as they want.
On the other hand, we have the teachers, Snape and Lupin.
Firstly Snape as I said before, is one of the most "respected" and feared teachers at Hogwarts but for Harry, Hermione and Ron , he is just one of a million, one among the others and what he says or order them to do is something they don't take on consideration.
Not even Dumblendore listens to Snape's words.
Snape who since the beginning didn't trust Lupin - "I've told the headmaster again and again that you're helping your old friend Black into the castle, Lupin, and here's the proof.-"  thinking that he will probably listen to his words, but once again this show that Dumblendore doesn't trust his own staff or doesn't believe at all everything they have to say, is like if what they think or say do not count at all, but if instead of Snape,  were Harry, Hermione, Ron or other student, Dumblendore will have listened to them because once again as I said before, students are the privileged.
Most readers don't notice how students at Hogwarts most of the time don't get punished when they do something they should clearly be punished from and how they influence the headmaster, Dumblendore, most of the time.
On the other hand, we have the teachers, who It doesn't matter how right they are, or the proofs that they  have about whatever.
They definitely won't be taken as serious as the students and that is something very unusual.
There is no school like Hogwarts in the world.
A school in which students would raise their voices to the teachers, without being punished.
A school in which students would hit , in this case with their wands, teachers without being punished either.
A school in which teachers are the ones who should control what they say or do to students.
We can see by looking at this passage that at Hogwarts the students (young) are above the teachers (adults), and that is something that most readers don't see, this is important because it explain the actions of most of the students at Hogwarts and most importantly it explains why Harry, Ron and Hermione "keep searching for troubles".
All because they know that they wont get punished because they are the heros, the ones who run the school like most of the students.
This is not something that is just started at Hogwarts.
Even when Snape, Lupin and Sirious were at Hogwarts, it was like this too.
For example Lupin and Sirious, almost killed Snape when they all were students at Hogwarts, those two, including Harry's dad, were not punished for what they did but they were forgiven.
But what if Snape himself had killed Harry because he would not get out of the way trying to protect, Lupin and Sirious, or simply used his wand against one of them, Harry, Hermione or Ron.
He definitely will be kick out of the school even though he had told them to get out of the way.
But it wasn't the case.
Ron, Hermione and Harry, were the ones who used the wands against a teacher, who is supposed to be superior than them and from whom they should have respect or had listened when he told them to let Sirious and Lupin to him, but those three knowing that they could do whatever they want and it wont be consequences, didn't care about what Snape had to say.
They don't listened to anybody but themselves and that's something unusual when talking about the relation between teachers and students.
We seem teachers as our "parents", adults from who we should take advices and listen to what they have to say.
People from whom we learn about life and in the case of wizards teachers are their "masters".
But especially for those three, Ron, Hermione and Harry, the only teacher they respect so far is Dumblendore.
If we read at this passage more than once, we can also notice that the relation between young and adult is practically the same as students and teachers in which the first ones are above the other.
This passage shows clearly how privileged the students are and on the other hand how the teachers are below them.






Assignment Filename =  003final1.txt
"YOU'RE PATHETIC!
" Harry yelled.
"JUST BECAUSE THEY MADE A FOOL OF YOU AT SCHOOL YOU WON'T EVEN LISTEN-" (Pg.361), those are words that must not be told to a teacher, an authority, and an adult.
However this law doesn't apply for Hogwarts' students who lack of respect toward teachers.
Is clearly showed on this passage I have close read on the Prisoner of Azkaban the word "respect" do not exist in the vocabulary of most Hogwarts' students upon their teachers, which most readers do not notice.
The students (children) at Hogwarts are on a higher position than the teachers (adults) with more liberty to commit errors and to be forgiven.
However the teachers whom are in continuing observation, are treated differently by the headmaster and are not listened by him as much as the students are.
For example, when Snape told Dumbledore about Lupin "I've told the headmaster again and again that you're helping your old friend Black into the castle, Lupin, and here's the proof.
" (pg.358)
     
Harry Potter, Hermione and Ron do not have the "fear" most students have upon teachers.
The capitalization of Harry's words in the book- "YOU'RE PATHETIC!
" (pg.
361) , shows a raise in his voice when talking to Snape, one of the most feared and "respected" teachers at Hogwarts, clearly shows how confident Harry is just because Dumbledore is on their side and is fooled by them.
Meaning that they won't ever be punished and they can do whatever they feel like doing.
However others students at Hogwarts would not confront and raise the voices to a teacher like Harry, Hermione and Ron do; and not all teachers will let them confront them either.
This is all because they are privileged.
Harry is no longer the only one who can do whatever he please, Ron and Hermione, his two best friends, have just starting to feel privileged, just because they are Harry's best friends.
An example of it is when Hermione convince professor McGonagall to allow her to use the "time turner" when it was something that no student could use, however professor McGonagall did the impossible to help her, just because she is Harry's best friend.
On the other hand, we have the teachers, Snape and Lupin, the unprotected, the non-favorites, like I stated before is one of the most "respected" and feared teachers at Hogwarts but for Harry, Hermione and Ron, he is just one of a million, one among the others and what he says or instruct them to do is something they don't take in consideration.
Not even Dumbledore listens to Snape's words.
Snape who since the beginning didn't trust Lupin - "I've told the headmaster again and again that you're helping your old friend Black into the castle, Lupin, and here's the proof.-"thinking that he will probably listen to his words, but once again this show that Dumbledore doesn't trust or listen to his own staff or doesn't believe at all everything they have to say, is like if what they think or say do not count at all, but if instead of Snape, were Harry, Hermione or Ron the one from whom Dumbledore heard about Lupin the situation would have been different.
Dumbledore would have either done something or tell them the reason of why Lupin is trustable.
However that was not what happened because instead of a student's word it was a teacher's.
Most readers don't notice how students at Hogwarts most of the time don't get punished when they do something they should clearly be punished from (break the rules) and how they influence the headmaster, Dumbledore, most of the time.
On the other hand, we have the teachers, and doesn't matter how right they are, or the proofs they have to accuse someone.
They definitely are not taken as serious as the students and that is something unusual.
There is no such school like Hogwarts in the world.
A school in where students raise their voices to the teachers and not respecting them, without being punished.
A school in where students hit, in this case with their wands, teachers without being punished either.
A school in where teachers are the ones who control what they say or do to students.
We can see by looking at this passage that the students (young) at Hogwarts are above the teachers (adults), and that is something unusual that most readers don't see, this is important because it explain the decisions and actions of most of the students at Hogwarts and most importantly it explains why Harry, Ron and Hermione "keep getting into trouble".
All because they know that they will not get punished because they are overprotected by the headmaster, Dumbledore.
This is not something that is just starting at Hogwarts.
Even when Snape, Lupin and Sirius were at Hogwarts, students were privileged (some always more than others).
For example Lupin and Sirius, almost killed Snape when they all were students at Hogwarts, the two, including Harry's dad, were not punished for what they did instead they were forgiven for their actions.
The history would have been different if the word "expelliarmus" had gotten out of Snape's mouth toward Harry, Hermione or Ron instead of them hurting him.
He definitely would have been kick out of the school even though he had told them to get out of the way.
But it wasn't the case.
Ron, Hermione and Harry, were the ones who used the wands against a teacher, who is supposed to be superior and respected by them.
But the three friends, knowing that they can do whatever they want without consequences, didn't care about what Snape had to say.
They don't listen to anybody but themselves and that's something unusual when talking about the relation between teachers and students (children and adults).
We see teachers as our "parents" adults from who we take advices and listen to what they have to say.
People from whom we learn about life and in the case of wizards, teachers are their "masters".
However is not the case of Harry Hermione and Ron, the only teacher they respect so far is Dumbledore.
By close reading this passage (Chapter 19, 358-361) of Harry Potter and the Prisoner of Azkaban, we notice the relation between Hogwarts' students and teachers.
No a good teacher-student relation because the teachers are not trusted or respected by the students and vice versa.
"Keep Quiet, you stupid girl" (pg.
360) are not the kind of things a teacher will tell his student.
Just like words such as "you're pathetic" (pg.
360) should be told to a teacher. 








Assignment Filename =  004draft2.txt
An orphanage is known as a residential institution for the full-time care and education of children with neither parents nor relatives.
Places where children live temporary till a family decide to adopt them.
But we all know this.
However an orphanage is much more than that and through the analysis of this photography it can be not only demonstrated that orphanages are not good for children's care but that they can also have a tremendous impact on children's emotional and behavioral state.
And a proof of that is showed on this photographed moment when Dumbledore is introduced to Tom Riddle (Voldemort).
It shows how unhappy and depressed Tom Riddle is on this place through the expression and looks on his eyes.
Also Tom Riddle's second hand clothes, the room, which looks like a mental hospital's room instead of one of a child and the dry scaly skin, contribute at the poor quality of services at the orphanage.
The fact that Tom Riddle's body is occupying way more space than the others figures situated in the background of the photograph, when they are the adults whom were suppose to represent authority upon children, effects the way we could interpret this scene.
If we assume that Tom Riddle is somehow related to the people in the background then the story also changes.
But even thought those two figures occupy less space in the photograph than Tom Riddle, they still hold our attention.
The expression on their faces, perhaps of preoccupation, worry, concern or even fear, indicates a absence in communication and connection between the young and the adult on the orphanages.
It shows fear for the new.
Leaving what it's familiar for the unknown, new family, can be sometimes a happy time or sad and scary.
Some children are easier to deal with than others.
Those children who are easy-going allow changes on their lives and accept it with curiosity and smiles.
On the other hand, they are the "shy" children like Tom Riddle that are scary of the new.
If we suppose that Dumbledore was in Tom Riddle's room to get to know him because he wanted to adopt him.
It changes completely the way we could interpret this scene.
Only by focusing on the long distance that separates Tom Riddle and Dumbledore, we could argue on the reason of the rejection of Tom Riddle upon Dumbledore.
Sometimes children react to the "Unknown" with fear or angry.
Orphans take more time to make connections with the "Unknown" or the "new".
Because they live in an environment where everything is always the same, the same routine, same schedule, same people, dreams.
Not knowing what is beyond could sometimes cause fear.
Many children who live in an orphanage have fewer opportunities to develop or learn how to interact with adults either by emotions or by talking.
This can affect them later on when they leave the orphanage or when they get adopted.
Even when they are adopted, there may be fewer good memories of the time when they were in the institution.
We all know that orphanages are not as bright and happy as the day-care center where you can easily leave your child for the day, few hours or weekly knowing that they will take good care of him.
But what if orphanages could be as cheery and with the same well-prepared staff as the day-care center?
Wouldn't it make the orphans happy and provide them with good memories?
That would help them to ignore or completely forget the sad and hurtful times of their past.
All these elements combined create a tense atmosphere between the personages on it.
Their body language, postures, facial expression and even the environment contribute to make the viewer feel sorry for Tom Riddle, not only because of the pain reflected on his eyes or the lost on his look but mainly because of his loneliness and separation from the adult that are on the background of the photograph, .
Orphanages are not good for children's care and could get a child behavior get worse through time.
Not only because of lack of attention they receive from the "staff" but because of the loneliness they feel while being in there.
People have to become aware of this issue and we all should try to make the orphanages a better place for children.
We want kids to be happy and to have good memories that will help them to grow stronger and to have self-esteem. 








Assignment Filename =  004final2.txt
An orphanage is known as a residential institution for the full-time care and education of children with neither parents nor relatives.
Places where children live temporary till a family decide to adopt them.
But we all know this.
However an orphanage is much more than that and through the analysis of this photography it can not only be demonstrated that orphanages are not good for children's care but that they can also have a tremendous impact on children's emotional and behavioral state.
And a proof of that is showed on this photographed moment when Dumbledore is introduced to Tom Raider (Voldermort).
It shows how unhappy and depressed Tom Raider is on this place through the expression and looks in his eyes.
Also Tom Raider's second hand clothes, the room, which looks like a mental hospital's room instead of one of a child and the dry scaly skin, indicate the poor quality of services at the orphanage.
This is important because it gives the viewer and idea of what kind of person this child will become just by looking at the way he was treated and the environment he lived on, which is something that most readers do not seem to understand.
The fact that Tom Raider's body is occupying way more space than the others figures situated in the background of the photograph, when they are the adults who are supposed to represent authority upon children, effects the way we could interpret this scene.
If we assume that Tom Riddle is somehow related to the people in the background then the story also changes.
But even thought those two figures occupy less space in the photograph than Tom Raider, they still hold our attention.
The expression on their faces, perhaps of preoccupation, worry, concern or even fear, indicates an absence in communication and connection between the young and the adult on the orphanages.
It shows fear for the new.
Leaving what it's familiar for the unknown, new family, can be sometimes a happy time or sad and scary.
Some children are easier to deal with than others.
Those children allow changes on their lives and accept it with curiosity and smiles.
On the other hand, they are "shy" children like Tom Riddle that are scary of the new.
If we suppose that Dumbledore was in Tom Riddle's room to get to know him because he wanted to adopt him.
It changes completely the way we could interpret this scene.
Only by focusing on the long distance that separates Tom Riddle and Dumbledore, we could argue on the reason of the rejection of Tom Riddle upon Dumbledore.
Sometimes children react to the "Unknown" with fear or angry.
Orphans take more time to make connections with the "Unknown" or the "new".
Because they live in an environment where everything is always the same, the same routine, same schedule, same people, dreams.
It's all they know.
Not knowing what is beyond could sometimes cause fear.
Riddle's room is lacked of brightness and for being a child's room, that's something unusual.
The lack of happiness on this picture is clearly related to the unhappy expression of the figures on it.
Tom Riddle's face is lacked of happiness.
For being a child like I stated before, that is something very unusual.
This image can be interpreted in different ways depending on which perspective we analyze it.
If we see the picture from and adult's view, the explanation of Riddle's madness can be explained by something bad he has done and now the adults in the background want him to assume the consequences of his acts.
However if the image is analyzed by a child perspective, the story will be different.
The reason of Riddle's madness would be because of something that the adults in the background have not let him do.
All these elements combined create a tense atmosphere between the personages on it.
Their body language, postures, facial expression and even the environment contribute to make the viewer feel sorry for Tom Riddle, not only because of the pain reflected on his eyes or the lost on his look.
It also makes the viewer feel the separation Tom Riddle is getting from the adults.
Orphanages are not good for children and could get a child behavior get worse through the time.
Not only because of lack of attention they receive from the "staff" but because of the loneliness they suffer while being in there.
People have to become aware of this issue and we all should try to make the orphanages a better place for children.
We want kids to be happy and to have good memories that will help them to grow stronger and to have self-esteem. 








Assignment Filename =  005draft1.txt
It has almost become commonplace to depict the villain of any narrative as ugly.
Ugly and evil are seemingly synonymous when choosing the prototypical antagonist.
Countless examples abound from even the most elementary childhood fairy tales such as The Wizard of Oz's Wicked Witch of the West, to more advanced pieces of literature such as the Harry Potter series.
It is true that even the acclaimed novelist herself J.K. Rowling resorted to this tactic with the villain of all villains- Lord Voldemort.
Described as an evil, hideous being, even the characters of the novels shudder when forced to recall his name.
But, as it is with almost every case, there are exeptions to this rule.
One such exeption is found in the Harry Potter series in the form of Sirius Black.
A mangy character with a mop of greasy hair the color of coal on his head who is perpetually donned in tattered scraps of clothing, Black gives every reason to judge him as evil based on appearance alone.
However, Sirius Black's appearance is in direct contrast to his innermost emotions.
In fact, it could be argued that there is no figure within the Harry Potter series who cares more for Harry's well-being, yet is also a figure who is severely misunderstood when judging by appearance alone.
Within this particular picture, one can observe that unlike previous movie posters in which Harry Potter is the clear focus, this Prisoner of Azkaban poster places the emphasis on Sirius Black with the use of shadows and lighting, which most viewers don't notice; this is significant because it highlights the protective and caring qualities that Sirius possesses that directly belie his appearance.
It would exceedingly easy for the everyday viewer to see this poster and vote Harry as the primary focus; however, this could not be further from the truth.
The aspect that makes this picture unique unto itself is the use of lighting and shadows.
Unlike previous movie posters, this one lends itself to a darker, more menacing ambiance that directly contradicts the styles of its predecessors.
The illustrator clearly wanted to highlight the dark versus light approach and in doing so, illuminates the characters in a way that otherwise would not have been possible had this poster been in full color.
Instead of emphasizing Harry and his companions in the forefront, the black and white qualities of the picture instead work to place greater emphasis on the individual behind them- Sirius Black.
It is in this manner that the viewer can accurately observe Black from a purely physical standpoint.
This is remarkable because, although his appearance is quite scruffy, one can tell immediately that he means no harm to the characters in the forefront.
Instead Harry, Ron, and Hermione are much more pre-occupied with whatever it is that stands before them than the figure behind them.
Sirius's position behind them illustrates his inherently protective nature as he is quite literally looking over their shoulder with a discernable expression of concern on his face.
What is peculiar in this poster is the proportion that the illustrator gave each character with respect to their bodies.
Harry and Hermione's bodies are almost completely obscured from the scene, while only Ron's upper shoulders are visible.
The only character amongst them whose body is evident is Sirius Black's.
This suggests the importance of Black not only within this picture, but also re-emphasizes the integral role he plays in watching and caring for the young heroes in the forefront.
The way the illustrator positioned each of the characters plays a vital role in determining who the viewer's focus should be upon.
Although Harry and Hermione's heads are significantly larger than those of Ron or Sirius, the proportion of Ron and Sirius's bodies show that there is no such decreased importance in either of their roles.
While Harry, Ron, and Hermione are looking into the distance with expressions of rapt attention, it is only Sirius Black who seems to exude confidence.
This is not to say that Harry and his companions do not seem up to the task before them, only that Sirius's expression leaves no doubt that he is not rattled by whatever they may be required to face, however daunting it might be.
Although the use of shadows and decreased lighting lend the entire picture to a more hostile, foreboding sense, it cannot be denied that the youthful cleanliness of Harry, Ron, and Hermione contradicts Sirius's more haggard worn appearance.
Although Harry has clearly triumphed over his share of ordeals, the viewer cannot help but notice the disparity between him and Sirius Black who seems to have endured much more adversity leading up to this point.
The difference is that Harry, while still self-assured and undoubtedly prepared for the worst, still possesses a childish naiveté and Sirius Black is the embodiment of realism with his raggedy clothing and forlorn expression.
While the disparity between  Sirius and the younger heroes before him may be striking, it remains quite clear that they are all hoping for the best while at the same time expecting the worst.
Sirius's pained look combined with his positioning behind the characters strongly suggests that cares immensely for Harry, Ron, and Hermione's well-being.
The direct contrast between Sirius's shabby appearance and his inner qualities places even greater emphasis upon the vital role he plays within the series and this poster.
His calming presence alone in the picture gives encouragement to Harry, Ron, and Hermione though they might not realize it.
This is the effect that Sirius's frayed appearance has on the viewer, that despite the ominous shadows and decreased lighting, he provides a light of experience that he casts on the younger friends.
Without his ragged appearance, there would be a lack of contrast that works so flawlessly within this picture.
 






Assignment Filename =  005final1.txt
Though it can be argued that there are myriad different reasons why the Harry Potter series has achieved such world-wide renown, there is little disputing that much of that success is due largely in part to J.K. Rowling's unique ability to develop her characters.
Rowling's possession of this talent distinguishes her as a great writer, but it is how she effectively wields it, imparting it upon even her most lowly characters, that truly ranks her among the most elite writers of this generation.
Clearly Rowling took much care and deliberation when molding the primary characters such as Harry, Ron, and Hermione.
The trio is extraordinarily well thought out with each youth offering different characteristics that contribute to the dynamics of the group as a whole.
Their success is not simply merely a sum of their parts.
What remains to be given any attention, though, is the depth to which Rowling develops her secondary characters.
In particular, Hagrid's role in the series is depicted as loyal and steadfast but predictably static.
However, this could not be further from the truth.
Within the first chapter of his introduction to the series, Hagrid displays a keen sense of perception that belies his appearance.
By observing Hagrid's actions in his confrontation with Uncle Vernon, one can detect the fierce loyalty with which Hagrid defends those who he loves and, upon further analysis, Hagrid's intelligent, intuitive understanding of familial bonds; this is important because it contradicts the image of Hagrid as oafish and unintelligent.
Rowling uses her considerable talents to mold Hagrid into one of the most pivotal characters in the series.
It is abundantly clear how highly she values Hagrid's presence in the series, as he is the first figure from the magical world that Harry is introduced to, a fact that many readers quickly gloss over.
In fact, the most famous quote of the entire first novel is enunciated from the lips of Rubeus Hagrid when he informs the young hero, "Harry- yer a wizard" (51).
Therefore as a reader, one must carefully analyze Hagrid, the character who is solely responsible for Harry Potter's introduction into the magical realm.
Surely Rowling would have picked someone a bit more refined for the task of re-introducing the magical world to Harry Potter, the boy who is solely responsible for the defeat of Lord Voldemort.
The magnitude of this daunting task is not lost on Hagrid though, and with this realization, the first glimpse of Hagrid's well-honed sense of perception is revealed.
"His name's been down ever since he was born,"(58).
is the first line that Hagrid delivers that offers a look into Hagrid's deeper, more aware nature.
Although Hagrid's task is little more than to find Harry and bring him to Hogwarts, Hagrid fully comprehends the gravity of his role in this plan.
After initially analyzing Hagrid's gift of observation, the reader's next logical conclusion would be to assume that although Hagrid displays a keen talent for awareness, he most likely would not be able to cope with confrontation with any sort of control or restrain.
Described as "a giant of a man with a long, shaggy mane of hair and a wild, tangled beard"(46), Hagrid's appearance lends itself to the assumption that he is something of a brute, capable of devastating acts of violence.
His size alone is enough to strike fear into ordinary sized people, something that the Dursleys were keen to notice, "He had leapt to his feet.
In his anger he seemed to fill the whole hut.
The Dursleys were cowering against the wall"(48).
But this is quite the opposite of how Rowling chooses to mold Hagrid.
Rather, he possesses the unique ability to, upon confrontation, evaluate the source of the threat and respond appropriately.
This ability to quickly calculate and accurately decipher the intentions of others further distances Hagrid's true nature from his rather intimidating physical appearance.
Within the passage, Uncle Vernon is wise enough not to insult Hagrid directly, instead choosing to insult Albus Dumbledore.
At this point in the novel the reader does not know what Hagrid and Dumbledore's relationship entails, only that Hagrid immensely respects him.
The reader gains access to this knowledge when Hagrid informs Uncle Vernon, "He'll be under the greatest headmaster Hogwarts ever had, Albus Dumbledore"(57).
Uncle Vernon responds not so wisely this time, choosing to insult Dumbledore by calling him a "crackpot old fool"(57).
The reader is now privy to the knowledge that Hagrid respects Dumbledore but it is not possible at this point in the passage, nor in the series, to know the personal level on which Hagrid cares for Dumbledore.
However, one could go even so far as to say that Hagrid could not have been more insulted by Uncle Vernon's remark had Vernon affronted Hagrid himself.
With Hagrid's appearance as it is, the reader anticipates an enraged attack on Uncle Vernon, leaving Vernon in a terrible physical state.
But it is here that Rowling chooses to delve deeper into Hagrid's psyche and establish him as a fiercely loyal character whose appearance is vastly juxtaposed to his capacity for reasoning.
Rowling imparts a remarkable sense of observation upon Hagrid, a sense that is no more overt than in this exact passage.
After hearing the slur aimed at the man whom Hagrid deeply respects, the reader most likely expects Hagrid to respond with unrestrained fury.
And even though Hagrid is working to check that fury- a fact that Rowling emphasizes by placing dashes before and after each of Hagrid's words, "NEVER-INSULT-ALBUS-DUMBLEDORE-IN-FRONT-OF-ME!
"(57)- how he delivers his reaction is unorthodox to say the least.
Instead of retorting by insulting and/or attacking Uncle Vernon, he instead chooses to place a hex on Dudley, the single greatest pride of Uncle Vernon.
This subtle shift in people involved goes unnoticed amongst most readers, a fact which testifies to Rowling's prodigious talent.
Hagrid, by aiming his rejoinder at pitiful Dudley who had done nothing remarkable thus far in this passage, proves that he is capable of observing and interpreting the innermost dynamics in the Vernon family.
Quite simply, he attacked in the exact spot where he had been attacked: the heart.
Rowling shows in this moment that Hagrid places such value on his relationship with Dumbledore, that the only method of retribution was to lash out at Dudley, whom Uncle Vernon placed an equal value.
It is a momentous and pivotal moment within the book, and furthermore, within the series because it establishes these qualities within Hagrid quickly, and in doing so, lays the foundation upon which Rowling will develop Hagrid as a truly remarkable character.
By placing this glimpse into Hagrid's deeper nature it enables her to build upon it in later novels in the series, and also gives weight to a character.
In showing Hagrid as an intellectual rather than a mere brute, Rowling gives Hagrid a deeper identity that consists of many contrasts.
From the way his appearance contradicts his mental aptitude, Hagrid asserts himself quickly as one of the novels' most interesting figures.
Combined with his fierce loyalty, Hagrid is an ally that Harry Potter and his peers are quite fortunate to have.








Assignment Filename =  006draft2.txt

It has almost become commonplace to depict the villain of any narrative as ugly.
Ugly and evil are seemingly synonymous when choosing the prototypical antagonist.
Countless examples abound from even the most elementary childhood fairy tales such as The Wizard of Oz's Wicked Witch of the West, to more advanced pieces of literature such as the Harry Potter series.
It is true that even the acclaimed novelist herself J.K. Rowling resorted to this tactic with the villain of all villains- Lord Voldemort.
Described as an evil, hideous being, even the characters of the novels shudder when forced to recall his name.
But, as it is with almost every case, there are exeptions to this rule.
One such exeption is found in the Harry Potter series in the form of Sirius Black.
A mangy character with a mop of greasy hair the color of coal on his head who is perpetually donned in tattered scraps of clothing, Black gives every reason to judge him as evil based on appearance alone.
However, Sirius Black's appearance is in direct contrast to his innermost emotions.
In fact, it could be argued that there is no figure within the Harry Potter series who cares more for Harry's well-being, yet is also a figure who is severely misunderstood when judging by appearance alone.
Within this particular picture, one can observe that unlike previous movie posters in which Harry Potter is the clear focus, this Prisoner of Azkaban poster places the emphasis on Sirius Black with the use of shadows and lighting, which most viewers don't notice; this is significant because it highlights the protective and caring qualities that Sirius possesses that directly belie his appearance.
It would exceedingly easy for the everyday viewer to see this poster and vote Harry as the primary focus; however, this could not be further from the truth.
The aspect that makes this picture unique unto itself is the use of lighting and shadows.
Unlike previous movie posters, this one lends itself to a darker, more menacing ambiance that directly contradicts the styles of its predecessors.
The illustrator clearly wanted to highlight the dark versus light approach and in doing so, illuminates the characters in a way that otherwise would not have been possible had this poster been in full color.
Instead of emphasizing Harry and his companions in the forefront, the black and white qualities of the picture instead work to place greater emphasis on the individual behind them- Sirius Black.
It is in this manner that the viewer can accurately observe Black from a purely physical standpoint.
This is remarkable because, although his appearance is quite scruffy, one can tell immediately that he means no harm to the characters in the forefront.
Instead Harry, Ron, and Hermione are much more pre-occupied with whatever it is that stands before them than the figure behind them.
Sirius's position behind them illustrates his inherently protective nature as he is quite literally looking over their shoulder with a discernable expression of concern on his face.
What is peculiar in this poster is the proportion that the illustrator gave each character with respect to their bodies.
Harry and Hermione's bodies are almost completely obscured from the scene, while only Ron's upper shoulders are visible.
The only character amongst them whose body is evident is Sirius Black's.
This suggests the importance of Black not only within this picture, but also re-emphasizes the integral role he plays in watching and caring for the young heroes in the forefront.
The way the illustrator positioned each of the characters plays a vital role in determining who the viewer's focus should be upon.
Although Harry and Hermione's heads are significantly larger than those of Ron or Sirius, the proportion of Ron and Sirius's bodies show that there is no such decreased importance in either of their roles.
While Harry, Ron, and Hermione are looking into the distance with expressions of rapt attention, it is only Sirius Black who seems to exude confidence.
This is not to say that Harry and his companions do not seem up to the task before them, only that Sirius's expression leaves no doubt that he is not rattled by whatever they may be required to face, however daunting it might be.
Although the use of shadows and decreased lighting lend the entire picture to a more hostile, foreboding sense, it cannot be denied that the youthful cleanliness of Harry, Ron, and Hermione contradicts Sirius's more haggard worn appearance.
Although Harry has clearly triumphed over his share of ordeals, the viewer cannot help but notice the disparity between him and Sirius Black who seems to have endured much more adversity leading up to this point.
The difference is that Harry, while still self-assured and undoubtedly prepared for the worst, still possesses a childish naiveté and Sirius Black is the embodiment of realism with his raggedy clothing and forlorn expression.
While the disparity between  Sirius and the younger heroes before him may be striking, it remains quite clear that they are all hoping for the best while at the same time expecting the worst.
Sirius's pained look combined with his positioning behind the characters strongly suggests that cares immensely for Harry, Ron, and Hermione's well-being.
The direct contrast between Sirius's shabby appearance and his inner qualities places even greater emphasis upon the vital role he plays within the series and this poster.
His calming presence alone in the picture gives encouragement to Harry, Ron, and Hermione though they might not realize it.
This is the effect that Sirius's frayed appearance has on the viewer, that despite the ominous shadows and decreased lighting, he provides a light of experience that he casts on the younger friends.
Without his ragged appearance, there would be a lack of contrast that works so flawlessly within this picture.








Assignment Filename =  006final2.txt
It has almost become commonplace to depict the villain of any narrative as ugly.
Ugly and evil are seemingly synonymous when choosing the prototypical antagonist.
Countless examples abound from even the most elementary childhood fairy tales such as The Wizard of Oz's Wicked Witch of the West, to more advanced pieces of literature such as the Harry Potter series.
It is true that even the acclaimed novelist herself J.K. Rowling resorted to this tactic when she unearthed a truly wicked villain -- Lord Voldemort.
Described as an evil, hideous being, even the characters of the novels shudder when forced to recall his name.
But, as it is with almost every case, there are exceptions to this rule.
One such exception is found in the Harry Potter series in the form of Sirius Black: a mangy character with a mop of greasy hair the color of coal on his head who is perpetually donned in tattered scraps of clothing, Black gives every reason to judge him as evil based on appearance alone.
However, Sirius Black's appearance is in direct contrast with his innermost emotions.
In fact, it could be argued that there is no figure within the Harry Potter series who cares more for Harry's well-being, yet is also a figure who is severely misunderstood when judging by appearance alone.
Within this particular picture, one can observe that unlike previous movie posters in which Harry Potter is the clear focus, this Prisoner of Azkaban poster places the emphasis on Sirius Black with the use of shadows and lighting; this is significant because it highlights the protective and caring qualities that Sirius possesses that directly belie his appearance.
It would be exceedingly easy for the everyday viewer to see this poster and vote Harry as the primary focus; however, this could not be further from the truth.
The aspect that makes this picture unique unto itself is the use of lighting and shadows.
Unlike previous movie posters, this one lends itself to a darker, more menacing ambiance that directly contradicts the styles of its predecessors.
The illustrator clearly wanted to highlight the dark versus light approach and in doing so, illuminated the characters in a way that otherwise would not have been possible had this poster been in full color.
Instead of emphasizing Harry and his companions in the forefront, the black and white qualities of the picture instead work to place greater emphasis on the individual behind them -- Sirius Black.
It is in this manner that the viewer can accurately observe Black from a purely physical standpoint.
This is remarkable because, although his appearance is quite scruffy, one can tell immediately that he means no harm to the characters in the forefront.
Instead Harry, Ron, and Hermione are much more pre-occupied with whatever it is that stands before them than the figure behind them.
Sirius's position behind them illustrates his inherently protective nature as he is quite literally looking over their shoulder with a discernable expression of concern on his face.
What is peculiar in this poster is the proportion that the illustrator gave each character with respect to their bodies.
Harry and Hermione's bodies are almost completely obscured from the scene, while only Ron's upper shoulders are visible.
The way the illustrator positioned each of the characters plays a vital role in determining who the viewer's focus should be upon.
Although Harry and Hermione's heads are significantly larger than those of Ron or Sirius, the proportion of Ron and Sirius's bodies show that there is no such decreased importance in either of their roles.
The only character amongst them whose body is evident is Sirius Black's.
This suggests the importance of Black not only within this picture, but also re-emphasizes the integral role he plays in watching and caring for the young heroes in the forefront.
Perhaps the most interesting quality about Black's appearance in this poster is the way in which he wears his clothing.
Notice that he takes painstaking measures to grow out his hair, thereby covering any means of identifying him accurately.
But, when the viewers' eye travels down his torso, a great portion of his chest is left bear.
Although, the most obvious conclusion would be to suggest that this directly signifies his vulnerability, one could also interpret this as a symbol of his audacity towards the powers that placed him in confinement.
By leaving his shirt open and exposing his heart, he defiantly challenges the authority of the dementors, essentially claiming that he has nothing to hide.
His firm belief of his own innocence allows Black to be callously wonton in his defense against dementors, those who feed upon weakness and susceptibility.
The way the illustrator positioned each of the characters plays a vital role in determining who the viewer's focus should be upon.
While Harry, Ron, and Hermione are looking into the distance with expressions of rapt attention, it is only Sirius Black who seems to exude confidence.
This is not to say that Harry and his companions do not seem up to the task before them, only that Sirius's expression leaves no doubt that he is not rattled by whatever they may be required to face, however daunting it might be.
What is truly remarkable is the way that Black's self assuredness perpetuates the entire poster, yet he stands the furthest from the front.
Although the use of shadows and decreased lighting lend the entire picture to a more hostile, foreboding sense, it cannot be denied that the youthful cleanliness of Harry, Ron, and Hermione contradicts Sirius's more haggard worn appearance.
Although Harry has clearly triumphed over his share of ordeals, the viewer cannot help but notice the disparity between him and Sirius Black who seems to have endured much more adversity leading up to this point.
The difference is that Harry, while still self-assured and undoubtedly prepared for the worst, possesses a childish naiveté and Sirius Black is the embodiment of realism with his raggedy clothing and forlorn expression.
What is clear about this poster is the great pains it takes to emphasize the contrasting qualities within it.
While the disparity between  Sirius and the younger heroes before him may be striking, it remains quite clear that they are all hoping for the best while at the same time expecting the worst.
Sirius's pained look combined with his positioning behind the characters strongly suggests that he cares immensely for Harry, Ron, and Hermione's well-being.
The direct contrast between Sirius's shabby appearance and his inner qualities places even greater emphasis upon the vital role he plays within the series and this poster.
His calming presence alone in the picture gives encouragement to Harry, Ron, and Hermione though they might not realize it.
Moreover, Sirius's appearance in this poster provides a sense of gravity that is largely absent from the younger characters.
While his presence brings solemnity, it does not overwhelm the poster in severity.
This is the effect that Sirius's frayed appearance has on the viewer, that despite the ominous shadows and decreased lighting, he provides a light of experience that he casts on the younger friends.
Without his ragged appearance, there would be a lack of contrast that works so flawlessly within this picture.








Assignment Filename =  007draft3.txt
With this quote Tacitus addresses the very entity that spurns resistance and fuels the fire that keeps it lit: hope.
Tacitus- a Roman historian- clearly expresses that there is a small fiber of every person's being that is dedicated to resistance by way of unyielding hopefulness.
The varying factor in that statement, however, is how large the fiber of inspiration may be.
For enslaved Africans, forced to do bidding at the command of foreign Europeans, it is thick and cable-like for their spirit of resistance was honed for generations.
Father and son alike, western Africans were picked as if they were a mere piece of fruit and whisked across the sea to another world to answer the ominous toll of slavery.
However, they met this slavery with an iron will and the flame of hope that could not be extinguished.
The very same fire inspiration came alive in Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix when Dumbledore's Army was created to oppose Dolores Umbridge and her crazed lust for power.
By observing the unifying tendencies that connect all resisting peoples such as enslaved Africans and Dumbledore's Army, we can see that hope is the primary catalyst that promotes and sustains opposition against oppression, which most people don't see; this is important because it suggests that without hope, there would be no unifying force to rally around for those who are oppressed.
In the overwhelming majority of the cases that involve oppression, the ruling body constricts the mental freedom just as much or more than the physical liberties.
Fear and despair are quickly found to be extremely effective to neutralize and break a fighting spirit.
The greatest asset to any group of resisting people is the belief that they can truly do something to improve their situations.
Armed with this knowledge, belief often transforms into resistance and opposition against the ruling body.
The regime, then, does all that it can to ensure that inspiration does not strike.
In her description of the slave trade of western Africa, Orena D. Lara depicts the enslavement as vastly more debilitating psychologically than otherwise.
What is despicably ironic is that this process feeds on itself.
In essence, the slave trade itself was the root of the evil that "sowed fear and insecurity"(Oruno,1880).
The vicious cycle repeats, leaving the oppressed people derived of all hope, wallowing in sorrow and self-pity.
However, the small percentage of opposition that are successful in their fights, are quick to realize to the valuable flame that hope can emit, and are wise to surround themselves with its glow.
Quite simply, it gives the people something to fight for.
Hermione, who first proposes the idea of forming a resistance group to Umbridge's regime, grasps this logic the quickest out of any student at Hogwarts.
The first glimpse of this hope is shown in her manner in chapter fifteen as she introduces the idea of forming Dumbledore's Army.
Her face, described as "alight with the kind of fervor that S.P.E.W.
usually inspired in her,"(Rowlingpage#) gives testimony to the power that inspiration can instill in people.
As mentally debilitating as the absence of inspiration is, the restorative powers that it possesses are greater by far.
Once inspiration has touched one, the result is a spreading wildfire that soon becomes uncontrollable, expanding to all peoples.
This too is evident within the Harry Potter novel as evidenced by the "rush of people"(337) who show up at The Hog's Head to hear Harry speak about what would soon be known as Dumbledore's Army.
Harry's dismay at being called on to lead these students is understandable and apparent.
<insert quote>.
Unfortunately, when an oppressing regime is assaulting the mental state of its victims, spreading uncertainty and discord is not enough.
Fear itself was not enough so satisfy the ravenous appetite for mental destruction they sought to wreak on the defenseless African slaves.
They wanted to go beyond trepidation and disallow all other forms of mental stimulation from rousing the dormant spirit of hope that lay within each of the men they enslaved.
By blocking off any method of education, the slave traders ensured that their quarry would remain illiterate and ignorant of the injustice with which they were being treated.
Similarly the institutional control that Umbridge exerts over the students at Hogwarts traps the students in their own inadequate knowledge.
Hermione again is the first to recognize the Ministry's methods, questioning Umbridge's methods for teaching on the first day of class, "There's nothing up there about using defensive spells"(Rowling 241).
Hermione's outburst serves as the catalyst for the other students who are apt to realize that this unorthodox manner of teaching will not only cripple them for their examinations, but also in real life.
This perfectly exemplifies the theory that if the light of one person's inspiration is allowed to show, the hope in others is illuminated.
The effect is almost instantaneous with other students voicing their incredulity at Umbridge's policies.
Over half a dozen students express their displeasure after Ron Weasley enunciates, "We're not going to use magic?"(Rowling,242).
This is precisely the moment that every oppressing body seeks to avoid.
For if one person begins to inspire another, the end result that arrives is debilitating for the regime: resistance.
Although resistance of any kind against an oppressing power is inevitable, the imminent threat of punishment is just as unavoidable.
It goes without question that the oppressing regime must punish those who seek to undermine it, lest they spread inspiration and hope amongst their peers.
This is precisely the case when one analyzes the annals of Dutch slave trade off the western coast of Africa.
It was recorded that an Ashanti native by the name of Essjerrie Ettin was hanged and lynched after leading a rebellion with his fellow slaves.
Though the records are few, it is quite apparent that Ettin was in fact the primary figure in mounting this particular revolt in 1770, and thus suffered the worst consequences.
His punishment, described as "having his right hand cut off and being hanged and lynched to death"(Oruno 195), gives testimony to the brutality suffered by any who resisted enslavement.
Nevertheless, his actions inspired others, giving them hope for a brighter future than the bleak prospect of slavery.
Ettin's heroics were not in vain as demonstrated further in the records, "Though the waters of Juda Harbor were teeming with sharks, men and women captives alike jumped into the water rather than accept their internment"(Oruno 195).
Countless other occurances similar to this one are interspersed throughout the grisly history of African enslavement.
Historian Terry Snyder records one such event that took place just off the coast of Georgia early in the 1800's.
A group of Igbo , captured from the western coast of Africa, had survived the voyage across the Atlantic only to be resold to another proprietor.
A proud people, the Igbo decided they would not allow themselves to be subjected any longer to the "mismanagement"(Snyder 36) and "rose up from the confinement of their vessel and revolted against the crew"(Snyder 36).
As heroic as their actions may have been, they were not done from inspiration or hope.
Rather, the revolt most likely stymied from a sense of dread at being resold into slavery, this time to another buyer.
This is proven when the newly-freed Igbo "took to the marsh and drowned themselves" (Snyder 36).
It is clear that the Igbo were not hopeful of their situation, and thus decided to remove themselves of it.
In this gruesome case, the mental assault of slavery was too much and had sapped all the mental fortitude of the Igbo which left them no choice other than suicide.
Indeed, the prospect is quite sobering that sacrifices must be taken in order to oppose injustice.
However, death is not the only method by which punishment is enacted and hope is snatched.
Many times, the rigors placed upon those resisting oppression are mentally taxing as well as physically.
Unfair as it is to claim, a servant who is mentally devoid of hope is much more likely to do one's bidding than a servant who is rendered physically incapable due to repeated bodily horrors.
The case of a disturbing mental punishment is quite evident in Order of the Phoenix when Umbridge commands Harry to serve detention with her, and proceeds to give him a quill that etches his skin and uses Harry's own blood as ink.
Harry is understandably appalled by Umbridge's tactics to the point where he refuses to tell even his dearest friends Ron and Hernione, "He was not sure why he was not telling Ron and Hernione he only knew he did not want to see their looks of horror, that would make the whole thing seem worse and therefore more difficult to face"(Rowling 269).
Harry is clearly being subjected to physical suffering but his most pressing anguish is mental in his inability to confide in his companions about what he is facing.
This is common practice among ruling bodies.
Make those who are being ruled feel isolated, and thereby eliminate the chance that they will band together in opposition.
The relationship between the oppressing regime and the oppressed is a dark one.
The sadistic mental and physical injustices suffered by the victims of oppression is comparable only to torture.
However, this torture extends much deeper than merely the mind or body.
It penetrates the soul and tears at the moral fiber with which human beings are composed.
It's sole purpose is to suppress and extract hope.
But it is with hope that the oppressed are able to fight back.
As was the case with African enslavement and Dumbledore's Army, hope can inspire resistance of all kinds whether it be passive or aggressive.
It is precisely as Tacitus said many hundreds of years ago, every person possess a fighting spirit.
Every person can hope.








Assignment Filename =  007final3.txt

With this quote Tacitus addresses the very entity that spurns resistance and fuels the fire that keeps it lit: hope.
Tacitus, a Roman historian, clearly expresses that there is a small fiber of every person's being that is dedicated to resistance by way of unyielding hopefulness.
The varying factor in that statement, however, is how large the fiber of inspiration may be.
For enslaved Africans, forced to do bidding at the command of foreign Europeans, it is thick and cable-like for their spirit of resistance was honed for generations.
Father and son alike, western Africans were picked as if they were a mere piece of fruit and whisked across the sea to another world to answer the ominous toll of slavery.
However, they met this slavery with an iron will and the flame of hope that could not be extinguished.
The very same fire inspiration came alive in Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix when Dumbledore's Army was created to oppose Dolores Umbridge and her crazed lust for power.
By observing the unifying tendencies that connect all resisting peoples such as enslaved Africans and Dumbledore's Army, we can see that hope is the primary catalyst that promotes and many times sacrifices are needed to sustain opposition against oppression; this is important to note because it suggests that, through self sacrifice, the flame of hope is kept alive when it is shared amongst an inspired people.
In the overwhelming majority of the cases that involve oppression, the ruling body constricts the mental freedom just as much or more than the physical liberties.
Fear and despair are quickly found to be extremely effective to neutralize and break a fighting spirit.
The greatest asset to any group of resisting people is the belief that they can truly do something to improve their situations.
Armed with this knowledge, belief often transforms into resistance and opposition against the ruling body.
The regime, then, does all that it can to ensure that inspiration does not strike.
In her description of the slave trade of western Africa, Orena D. Lara depicts the enslavement as vastly more debilitating psychologically than otherwise.
What is despicably ironic is that this process feeds on itself.
In essence, the slave trade itself was the root of the evil that "sowed fear and insecurity" (Oruno1880).
The vicious cycle repeats, leaving the oppressed people derived of all hope, wallowing in sorrow and self-pity.
Unfortunately, when an oppressing regime is assaulting the mental state of its victims, spreading uncertainty and discord is not enough.
Fear itself was not enough so satisfy the ravenous appetite for mental destruction that the European nations sought to wreak on the defenseless African slaves.
They wanted to go beyond trepidation and disallow all other forms of mental stimulation from rousing the dormant spirit of hope that lay within each of the men they enslaved.
By blocking off any method of education, the slave traders ensured that their quarry would remain illiterate and ignorant of the injustice with which they were being treated.
Similarly, the institutional control that Umbridge exerts over the students at Hogwarts traps the students in their own inadequate knowledge.
Hermione again is the first to recognize the Ministry's methods, questioning Umbridge's methods for teaching on the first day of class: "There's nothing up there about using defensive spells"(Rowling 241).
Hermione's outburst serves as the catalyst for the other students who are apt to realize that this unorthodox manner of teaching will not only cripple them for their examinations, but also in real life.
This perfectly exemplifies the theory that if the light of one person's inspiration is allowed to show, the hope in others is illuminated.
The effect is almost instantaneous with other students voicing their incredulity at Umbridge's policies.
Over half a dozen students express their displeasure after Ron Weasley enunciates, "We're not going to use magic?
"(Rowling 242).
This is precisely the moment that every oppressing body seeks to avoid.
For if one person begins to inspire another, the end result that arrives is debilitating for the regime: resistance.
Although resistance of any kind against an oppressing power is inevitable, the imminent threat of punishment is just as unavoidable.
It goes without question that the oppressing regime must punish those who seek to undermine it, lest they spread inspiration and hope amongst their peers.
This is precisely the case when one analyzes the annals of Dutch slave trade off the western coast of Africa.
It was recorded that an Ashanti native by the name of Essjerrie Ettin was hanged and lynched after leading a rebellion with his fellow slaves.
Though the records are few, it is quite apparent that Ettin was in fact the primary figure in mounting this particular revolt in 1770, and thus suffered the worst consequences.
His punishment, described as "having his right hand cut off and being hanged and lynched to death" (Oruno 195), gives testimony to the brutality suffered by any who resisted enslavement.
Nevertheless, his actions inspired others, giving them hope for a brighter future than the bleak prospect of slavery.
Ettin's heroics were not in vain as demonstrated further in the records, "Though the waters of Juda Harbor were teeming with sharks, men and women captives alike jumped into the water rather than accept their internment" (Oruno 195).
However, the small percentage of opposition that are successful in their fights, are quick to realize to the valuable flame that hope can emit, and are wise to surround themselves with its glow.
Quite simply, it gives the people something to fight for.
Hermione, who first proposes the idea of forming a resistance group to Umbridge's regime, grasps this logic the quickest out of any student at Hogwarts.
The first glimpse of this hope is shown in her manner in chapter fifteen as she introduces the idea of forming Dumbledore's Army.
Her face, described as "alight with the kind of fervor that S.P.E.W.
usually inspired in her"(Rowling 319), gives testimony to the power that inspiration can instill in people.
As mentally debilitating as the absence of inspiration is, the restorative powers that it possesses are greater by far.
Hermione goes further in her attempts to coerce Harry into teaching them by using flattery, "You were the only person last year who could throw off the Imperius Curse completely, you can produce a Patronus, you can do all sorts of stuff that full-grown wizards can't"(332).
After persuading Harry into helping train them against the dark arts, hope abounds in the school.
Once inspiration has touched one, the result is a spreading wildfire that soon becomes uncontrollable, expanding to all peoples.
This too is evident within the Harry Potter novel as evidenced by the "rush of people" (337) who show up at The Hog's Head to hear Harry speak about what would soon be known as Dumbledore's Army.
The relationship between the oppressing regime and the oppressed is a dark one.
The sadistic mental and physical injustices suffered by the victims of oppression is comparable only to torture.
However, this torture extends much deeper than merely the mind or body.
It penetrates the soul and tears at the moral fiber with which human beings are composed.
Its sole purpose is to suppress and extract hope.
But it is with hope that the oppressed are able to fight back.
Indeed, the greatest asset that a people can have is the power of hope.
For if they are able to foster and spread this hope, then the fate of many will be rescued.
Hope is a collective emotion, meant to be shared and never to be captivated or contained.
As was the case with African enslavement and Dumbledore's Army, hope can inspire resistance of all kinds whether it be passive or aggressive.
It is precisely as Tacitus said many hundreds of years ago, every person possess a fighting spirit, a hopeful spirit.
It is up to the people of the resistance to spread the light of hope to illuminate even the darkest situations.
Hope must be all-encompassing and as pervasive as the sunlight if it to truly succeed.









Assignment Filename =  008draft1.txt
In the Harry Potter series, Hermione Granger is the brains of Hogwarts.
Accomplishing uncountable academic achievements, she is stated throughout the series as being the smartest student at Hogwarts School of Witchcraft and Wizardry, and is often accredited for her successes through being awarded points for Gryffindor House and receiving the highest marks in all classes.
Although Hermione has some knowledge outside of what she learns in books, her intelligence does not go far beyond what she studies, and is limited when required to apply her knowledge in real life situations.
Most readers see Hermione's abundant knowledge as being the sole reason for success in crisis situations involving Harry, Ron, and Hermione.
However, by carefully observing the personalities, strengths, and weaknesses of each of the students, we can see that all three individuals are necessary in solving problems, specifically with the entrapment of the Devil's Snare in Harry Potter and the Sorcerer's Stone.
This is important because friendship and working together are central to the novel to solve each problem the three students encounter.
Without contributions from each Harry, Ron, and Hermione, the three students would never be successful with any trouble they face.
Although not solely responsible, Hermione did provide some actions that proved beneficial when dealing with the Devil's Snare.
First, Hermione is able to instantly escape from the plant's tendrils, which later enables her to give direction and help her two friends escape from the same plant.
Her advice is evidenced in the text; ""Stop moving!
" Hermione ordered them," (Rowling 277).
The use of an exclamation point in the dialogue, along with Hermione being described in the text as  watch[ing] in horror, (277)' shows Hermione's genuine concern for her two friends.
She truly wants to help them, but is getting frustrated at their thoughtless behavior.
Once the boys listen, the small piece of advice helps greatly in the situation, as the trio later finds out that a characteristic of the plant is that it tightens its tendrils as the person entrapped tries to escape, and therefore they need to listen to Hermione by ceasing movement.
Hermione further helps in the situation through her book smarts by eventually identifying the plant and deducing from that information what to do to solve the issue at hand, demonstrating the vast knowledge she possesses.
In the text, Hermione concludes, "Devil's Snare, Devil's Snare what did Professor Sprout say?
it likes the dark and the damp  (278).
" Her ability to filter through the abundance of information in her head to come to a conclusion illustrates Hermione's attention to detail during class time and displays her extreme value of education.
A normal student at Hogwarts would most likely not be able to remember a small detail learned from a book, but Hermione certainly can, making her useful in this situation.
A final example of importance that Hermione contributes is her ability to follow direction well.
Once Harry and Ron tell her what to do, she immediately acts by casting a spell and the boys are able to pull free.
Her comprehension of the verbal direction given by her two friends was vital to their escape.
Hermione did offer useful knowledge, information, and action in the Devil's Snare situation.
However, she also did some things that would have prevented escape, had the two boys not been there to give her advice.
Hermione is undoubtedly does not perform well under pressure, as evidenced by several sentences in this short passage.
The use of punctuation shows her hesitation and uncertainty of the situation.
When trying to identify the plant, she says, "I-I know what this is  it's the Devil's Snare!
" Although she did produce an accurate answer, the hyphens used in the dialogue indicate that Hermione was not fully confident in her ability to solve the problem.
Furthermore, Hermione cracks under pressure when trying to remember what to do in order to destroy the Devil's Snare.
After Ron comments on her identification of the plant, Hermione says, "Shut up, I'm trying to remember how to kill it!
" Her word selection of  Shut up' and the exclamation point at the end of the sentence show Hermione's stress in the situation.
If she were calm and content with the situation, she would not have snapped at Ron for merely speaking a few words.
Instead, Hermione feels the strong need to be accurate and quick in solving the issue at hand and cracks under pressure, resulting in her scolding of Ron.
She tries to remain calm, but her true feelings of anxiety are shown through her words.
Once Hermione identifies the name of the plant and what the plant likes, she completely falls apart and loses all common sense.
Hermione states that Professor Sprout taught her that the Devil's Snare likes the dark and the damp.
A person with common sense would use that information to deduce that the plant would not like the light and the dry.
However, Hermione is oblivious to that thought process and has to wait for Harry to suggest lighting a fire.
When Harry commands Hermione to make a fire to destroy the plant, she still is not comprehensive to the situation.
In response to Harry's instruction, Hermione says, "Yes- of course- but there's no wood!
" making a complete fool of herself.
Hermione is a witch with a magical wand, giving her full capability to produce a fire in a matter of seconds.
Yet she does not perform this simple action, because she has fully lost all practicality.
She was able to produce knowledge learned through books, but cannot produce the knowledge to put the information together to act in the circumstances.
Hermione could not have defeated the Devil's Snare without the advisement of both Ron and Harry because of her lack of application of knowledge and loss of common sense.
Each of the two boys made individual contributions to the overall situation in his own way, even though both are entangled by the Devil's Snare for the majority of the scene.
Ron offers humor to the scene through dialogue to enlighten the mood.
After Hermione identifies the name of the plant, he snarls, "Oh, I'm so glad we know what it's called, that's a great help.
" He obviously isn't being literal with his words and rather is trying to make the heavy situation less intense.
Whether done so intentionally or not, his wittiness allows all three students to slightly calm down and not stress as much over the issue at hand.
After each time Ron speaks sarcastically, the trio of students is able to take a deep breath, relax, and regain composure of the circumstances.
Ron adds further sarcasm after Hermione gives the lame excuse that they can't make a fire because there is no wood; "HAVE YOU GONE MAD?
" Ron bellowed.
"ARE YOU A WITCH OR NOT?
" Ron is repulsed that Hermione loses all common sense, forgetting that she can perform magic, and reacts in a firm, yet sarcastic way by yelling at her.
Ron's yelling may have upset Hermione, but if it weren't for his reaction, she would not come to the simple conclusion of casting a spell to defeat the plant.
This same quote shows Ron's simplistic thinking, which contributes to the ultimate solution to the problem as well.
He recognizes that the complex problem requires an extremely simple solution, and lets that be known.
Ron's practicality is vital to defeating the Devil's Snare.
Without Ron's simple-minded thinking, Hermione would not have destroyed the plant and Harry and Ron would not have escaped.
Harry's thoughtfulness, recognition of others' success, and ability to remain calm are essential in escaping from the Devil's Snare.
Once Hermione says that the Devil's Snare likes the dry and damp, Harry says, "So light a fire!
(278)" providing the exact solution that saves himself and Ron from entanglement.
Harry uses the information Hermione produces to provide a solution to the problem.
This is usually the case when it comes to Harry and problematic situations.
He is normally not the one who originally obtains necessary information to solve problems he encounters.
Rather, Harry is the one to piece the information produced from outside sources together and combine it with his practical knowledge to provide an ultimate solution.
In this case, Harry uses the information Hermione has stated to provide a simple, yet extremely useful solution.
Harry knows that he cannot be successful on his own and comprehends that he must rely on the guidance of others to succeed.
This unselfish realization is shown when Harry says, "Lucky you pay attention in Herbology, Hermione (278).
" Harry recognizes that without Hermione's knowledge of the plant, he could not have arrived at a conclusion to kill the plant.
He gives credit where credit is due by complimenting Hermione on her vast knowledge.
His appreciation causes Hermione to relax, relieving the stress of what has occurred.
With this simple statement, Harry's down to earth personality is revealed, which contributes to the eventual success of the Devil Snare's demise.
In the passage, Harry speaks very little, saying only ten short words during the course of the time he was entangled.
This simple fact demonstrates Harry's ability to remain calm in stressful situations.
He trusts that things will turn out fine, and remains composed, collected, and focused.
He knows that losing his mind and overreacting to the circumstances will not be of any help to solving the problem, and therefore keeps his mouth closed except when offering good advice and suggestions on how to conquer the Devil's Snare.
Ron recognizes Harry's tranquility after the two boys have escaped the plant's tendrils by adding, "Yeah, and lucky Harry doesn't lose his head in a crisis- (278).
" Ron recognizes that Harry's ability to remain calm was essential in the death of the plant and states its importance.
In the passage of Harry Potter and the Sorcerer's Stone involving the Devil's Snare, Hermione, Ron, and Harry each made individual contributions that led to the death of the plant and the escape of the three students from its entrapment.
Hermione offered intelligence through knowledge of books, but was unable to apply her knowledge because she does not work well under pressure and has a lack of common sense.
Although Ron is entangled by the plant and cannot help himself, he offers humor to lighten the mood of the situation, causing the three students to relax and regain composure.
He also possesses great common sense and recognizes simplicity, causing him to make Hermione realize that she has the ability to solve the problem in a matter of seconds.
Harry is also entangled in the Devil's Snare and cannot free himself, but he helps the overall situation by piecing together useful information to ultimately give the solution that results in the death of the plant.
Harry also helps by maintaining composure and keeping calm in the stressful situation.
He trusts that the problem will be solved and gives credit to his friends where credit is due.
If the contributions of any of the three Hogwart's students are removed, the students would never arrive at the conclusion that brought the death of the Devil's Snare and the freeing of the three students. 








Assignment Filename =  008final1.txt
In the Harry Potter series, Hermione Granger is the brains of Hogwarts.
Accomplishing uncountable academic achievements, she is stated throughout the series as being the smartest student at Hogwarts School of Witchcraft and Wizardry, and is often accredited for her successes through being awarded points for Gryffindor House and receiving the highest marks in all classes.
Although Hermione has some knowledge outside of what she learns in books, her intelligence does not go far beyond what she studies, and is limited when required to apply her knowledge in real life situations.
Most readers see Hermione's abundant knowledge as being the sole reason for success in crisis situations involving Harry, Ron, and Hermione.
However, by carefully observing the personalities, strengths, and weaknesses of each of the students, we can see that all three individuals are necessary in solving problems, specifically with the entrapment of the Devil's Snare in Harry Potter and the Sorcerer's Stone.
This is important because friendship and working together are central to the novel to solve each problem the three students encounter.
Without contributions from each Harry, Ron, and Hermione, the three students would never be successful with any trouble they face.
Although not solely responsible, Hermione did provide some actions that proved beneficial when dealing with the Devil's Snare.
First, Hermione is able to instantly escape from the plant's tendrils, enabling her to give directions shortly thereafter, helping  her two friends escape from the same plant.
Her advice is evidenced in the text; ""Stop moving!
" Hermione ordered them," (277).
The use of an exclamation point in the dialogue, along with Hermione being described in the text as  watch[ing] in horror, (277)' shows Hermione's genuine concern for her two friends.
She truly wants to help them but is getting frustrated at their thoughtless behavior.
Once the boys listen, the small piece of advice helps greatly in the situation, as the trio later finds out that the plant tightens its tendrils as the person entrapped tries to escape, and therefore they need to listen to Hermione by ceasing movement.
Hermione further helps in the situation through her book smarts by identifying the plant and deducing from that information what to do in order to solve the issue at hand, demonstrating the vast knowledge she possesses.
In the text, Hermione concludes, "Devil's Snare, Devil's Snare what did Professor Sprout say?
it likes the dark and the damp " (278).
Her ability to filter through the abundance of information in her head to come to a conclusion illustrates Hermione's attention to detail during class time and displays her personal extreme value of education.
A normal student at Hogwarts would most likely not be able to remember a small detail learned from a book, but Hermione certainly can, making her useful in this situation.
A final example of Hermione's contribution is her ability to follow direction well.
Once Harry and Ron tell her what to do, she immediately acts by casting a spell and the boys are able to pull free.
Her comprehension of the verbal direction given by her two friends is vital to their escape.
Hermione does offer useful knowledge, information, and action in the Devil's Snare situation.
However, she also does some things that would have prevented escape, had the two boys not been there to give her advice.
Hermione undoubtedly does not perform well under pressure, as evidenced by several sentences in this short passage.
When trying to identify the plant, she says, "I-I know what this is  it's the Devil's Snare!
" Although she did produce an accurate answer, the hyphens used in the dialogue show hesitation and uncertainty and indicate that Hermione is not fully confident in her ability to solve the problem.
Furthermore, Hermione cracks under pressure when trying to remember what to do in order to destroy the Devil's Snare.
After Ron comments on her identification of the plant, Hermione says, "Shut up, I'm trying to remember how to kill it!
" Her word selection of  Shut up' and the exclamation point at the end of the sentence show Hermione's stress in the situation.
If she were calm and content with the situation, she would not have snapped at Ron for merely speaking a few words.
Instead, Hermione feels the strong need to be accurate and quick in solving the issue at hand and stresses under pressure, resulting in her scolding of Ron.
She tries to remain calm, but her true feelings of anxiety are expressed through her words.
Once Hermione identifies the name of the plant and what the plant likes, she completely falls apart and loses all common sense.
Hermione states that Professor Sprout taught her that the Devil's Snare likes the dark and the damp.
A person with common sense would use that information to deduce that the plant would not like light and heat.
However, Hermione is oblivious to the simple thought process and has to wait for Harry to suggest lighting a fire.
When Harry commands Hermione to make a fire to destroy the plant, she still does not comprehend to the situation.
In response to Harry's instruction, Hermione says, "Yes-- of course-- but there's no wood!
" making a complete fool of herself.
Hermione is a witch with a magical wand, giving her full capability to produce a fire in a matter of seconds with a simple flick of the wrist.
Yet she does not perform this basic action because she has completely lost all practicality.
She was able to recall knowledge learned through books, but cannot apply the knowledge to put the information together to act in the circumstances.
Hermione was not raised in the wizarding world as she was born of two muggle parents and therefore does not have significant wizarding instincts.
However, after attending Hogwarts for multiple months and being submersed in everything to do with witches and wizards, her forgetfulness of the reason why she is attending school is inexcusable.
As smart as she is, Hermione should be able to call her amazing magical talents.
If a muggle can use knowledge learned in a book to apply in a real life situation, a witch should definitely be able to do the same.
Hermione could not have defeated the Devil's Snare without the advice of both Ron and Harry due to her lack of application of knowledge and loss of common sense.
Each of the two boys made individual contributions to the overall situation in his own way, even though both are entangled by the Devil's Snare for the majority of the scene.
Ron offers humor to the scene to both characters and readers through dialogue to enlighten the mood.
After Hermione identifies the name of the plant, he snarls, "Oh, I'm so glad we know what it's called, that's a great help" (278).
He obviously isn't being literal with his words and rather tries to make the heavy situation less intense.
Whether done so intentionally or not, his wittiness allows all three students to calm down slightly and lessen stress over the issue at hand.
After Ron's sarcastic remarks, the trio of students is then able to relax and regain composure of the circumstances.
Ron adds further sarcasm after Hermione gives the unintelligent excuse that they cannot make a fire because there is no wood; "HAVE YOU GONE MAD?
" Ron bellowed.
"ARE YOU A WITCH OR NOT?
" (278).
Ron is repulsed that Hermione loses all common sense, forgetting that she can perform magic, and reacts in a firm, yet sarcastic way by yelling at her.
Ron's yelling may have upset Hermione, but if it weren't for his reaction, she would never come to the simple conclusion of casting a spell to defeat the plant.
This same quote shows Ron's simplistic thinking, which contributes to the ultimate solution to the problem as well.
He recognizes that the complex problem requires an extremely simple solution, and lets that be known.
Ron's practicality is vital to defeating the Devil's Snare.
Without his simple-minded thinking, Hermione would destroy the plant and Harry and Ron would not escape.
Similar to Ron, Harry makes positive contributions to the situation at hand.
His thoughtfulness, recognition of others' success, and ability to remain calm are essential in escaping from the Devil's Snare.
Once Hermione says that the Devil's Snare likes the dry and damp, Harry says, "So light a fire!
(278)" providing the exact solution that saves himself and Ron from entanglement.
Harry uses the information Hermione produces to provide a solution to the problem.
This is usually the case when it comes to Harry and problematic situations.
He is normally not the one who originally obtains necessary information to solve problems he encounters.
Rather, Harry is the one to piece gathered information from outside sources together and combine it with his practical knowledge to provide an ultimate solution.
In this specific case, Harry uses the information Hermione has stated to provide a simple, yet extremely useful solution.
Harry knows that he cannot be successful on his own and comprehends that he must rely on the guidance of others to succeed.
This unselfish realization is shown when Harry says, "Lucky you pay attention in Herbology, Hermione" (278).
Harry recognizes that without Hermione's knowledge of the plant, he could not have arrived at the conclusion to kill the plant.
He gives credit where credit is due by complimenting Hermione on her vast knowledge.
His appreciation causes Hermione to relax, relieving the stress of what has occurred.
With this simple statement, Harry's down to earth personality is revealed, which contributes to the eventual success of the Devil Snare's demise.
Harry's down to earth personality allows him to not feel stress in typically stressful situation.
His simplistic mannerisms permit a sense of calmness.
In the passage, Harry speaks very little, saying only ten short words during the course of the time he was entangled.
This basic fact demonstrates Harry's ability to remain calm in stressful situations.
He trusts that things will turn out fine, and remains composed, collected, and focused.
He knows that losing his mind and overreacting to the circumstances will not be of any help to solve the problem, and therefore keeps his mouth closed except when offering good advice and suggestions on how to conquer the Devil's Snare.
Ron recognizes Harry's tranquility after the two boys have escaped the plant's tendrils by adding, "Yeah, and lucky Harry doesn't lose his head in a crisis- "(278).
Ron recognizes that Harry's ability to remain calm was essential in the death of the plant and states its importance.
Ron's acknowledgement of Harry's levelheadedness is important because it shows that, like Harry, he gives credit where credit is due, making others feel confident about their decision making skills and abilities to react in demanding situations.
Confidence produces accurate reactions, benefitting all involved with the Devil's Snare.
In the passage of Harry Potter and the Sorcerer's Stone involving the Devil's Snare, one student does not solve the problem by himself/herself.
The idea that Hermione saves Ron and Harry since she is not entangled by the plant, like the two boys are, is false.
Instead, Hermione, Ron, and Harry each make individual contributions that lead to the death of the plant and the escape of the three students from its entrapment.
Hermione offers intelligence through knowledge of books, but is unable to apply her knowledge due to her inability to work well under pressure and lack of common sense.
Although Ron is entangled by the plant and cannot help himself, he offers humor to lighten the mood of the situation, causing the three students to relax and regain composure.
Ron also possesses great common sense and recognizes simplicity, causing him to lead Hermione to realize that she is able to solve the problem in a matter of seconds.
Like Ron, Harry is also entangled in the Devil's Snare and cannot free himself.
However, he helps the overall situation by piecing together useful information to ultimately give the solution that destroys the plant.
Harry also helps by maintaining composure and keeping calm in the stressful situation, trusting that the problem will be solved and giving credit to his friends where credit is due.
If the contributions of any of the three Hogwarts students are removed, the students would never arrive at the conclusion that brought the death of the Devil's Snare and the freeing of the three students.
Throughout the series, Rowling repetitively places Harry, Ron, and Hermione in crisis situations that cannot be solved with the use of one brain.
When they solve a problem, there are always people around that had to offer help in some way whether it be a simple piece of advice or a complex action.
Through doing this, she shows the importance of friendships and emphasizes working together in order to achieve success.
She uses this particular passage with the Devil's Snare as an example to demonstrate this common theme.
She does not want one character to outshine all of the others, but as an alternative wants each character she has developed to play an integral role in the individual books, like Harry Potter and the Sorcerer's Stone as well as in the series as a whole.








Assignment Filename =  009draft1.txt
What is the difference between a celebrity and a prisoner?
To a tribute in the Hunger Games, there is none.
Katniss Everdeen realizes this completely as she is saying goodbye to her friends and family in the Justice Building.
The strongest point occurs when she speaks with Gale.
Through Gale's interaction with Katniss before she is taken to the Capitol, one can see Gale's character expanded which many readers do not take into account, because they are distracted by the anticipation of what is to come as well as the would-be romance between the two.
This is important because it actually reveals the primary conflict of humanity of all people versus the dehumanization of the many to elevate an elite few.
Most readers easily lose the importance of this scene, because they are caught up in the romance that might come from Katniss and Gale.
He is the only boy she has been around up to this point.
He has to be the one.
Katniss rushes to him for comfort when he offers her an embrace, while simultaneously denying she might have deeper feelings for him (38).
To the anticipating reader, this is a definite sign of love to come.
The pair is rushing to have their conversation, and they are not allowed to finish before their time is up.
Only when they are torn apart does Katniss truly begin to panic (40).
Likewise, Gale has been telling Katniss that her best chance is to get a bow, and she has been arguing she has no hope (39).
Gruesome details from past Hunger Games are also being revealed, serving as another distraction.
Suzanne Collins masterfully distracts her audience into breezing over the important details which will captivate them later in the series.
The importance of this discussion is not held by the short-term advice Gale is offering Katniss, but by the long-term conflicts it poses to the reader.
Gale is a representation of the rage that comes with oppression.
Although he is reassuring her, he maintains a cold ironic humor about the content of the Games.
When referring to one year he says, "Since that year half of them died of cold.
Not much entertainment in that" (39).
This also shows his understanding of the Capitol's view.
Although primarily angry, Gale is not without understanding of the world around him.
He verges on thinking similarly to the very people he hates.
His next reassurance is telling her, " it's just hunting" (40).
Ultimately, Gale has more than one purpose.
First, he is Katniss's confidant and one of her oldest friends.
Likewise, he represents the aggressive, more animal side of Katniss.
She proves this by agreeing with him about the ease of hunting people, if she can put aside the fact they are humans as well (40).
He furthermore represents the Capitols mindset.
Finally, he is one of the primary representations of the emotional state of not just the subjugated people of Panem, but also of anyone who has ever been in such a broken state.
Although there are many dynamics in this one scene, the most significant conflict is posed near the end when Gale and Katniss are discussing murder.
He asks, "How different can it be, really?"(40).
In this pivotal moment, the reader is confronted with the comparison of humans to animals.
Collins' viewpoint is noticeable, because Gale's statement that murdering people is the same as killing animals reinforces the idea in the reader's mind that the opposite is true.
This conflict of dehumanization is also demonstrated by Katniss's circumstance.
She is about to enter an arena to kill other children for the sport and entertainment of the Capitol.
Within the space of a few words, she has remembered three separate occasions where other young people were killed.
The Capitol considered the best Hunger Games those that had bloodshed and gore; the instances with more natural deaths were boring (39).
Gale is here once again representing the Capitol viewpoint, because they do not see this as offensive.
Both sides of the spectrum are represented here.
The elite who control the situation do not recognize its significance.
They have been exposed to it for so long without a negative impact on themselves.
On the other hand, there are the average citizens who endure hardships every day.
However, they have no ability to control it or improve their standard of living.
Unfortunately, they have given up hope.
Katniss represents them with her constant surety of loss.
For every positive tip Gale tries to give her, she mentally turns it down as unachievable (39-40).
This section of dialogue is comparable to other analogies of the past.
It serves its purpose in the fantasy, while at the same time representing a greater resolution.
The impatient reader may miss this, as he is preoccupied by what he thinks will unfold or by what he wants to occur.
However, this novel is not driven to be a story for entertainment alone, and especially not to please its readers.
Its design is to impact its audience to recognize issues in the modern world.
Not only does this audience realize them, they are automatically drawn to a side.
Humans are precious, unique creations, not animals for slaughter.
Although Gale serves as the means by which this message is stated, his character is not to be underestimated as only having this purpose.
Collins uses him as a tool to distract the reader.
Also, he represents the emotional state of oppression.
Through this one scene of text, the fervent reader can deduce information that pertains not only to the novel but also to the greater purpose of the work.
To do this, however, they must recognize who Gale really is and his place in The Hunger Games.








Assignment Filename =  009final1.txt
What is the difference between a celebrity and a prisoner?
To a tribute in the Hunger Games, there is none.
Katniss Everdeen realizes this completely as she is saying goodbye to her friends and family in the Justice Building.
The strongest point occurs when she speaks with Gale.
Through Gale's interaction with Katniss before she is taken to the Capitol, one can see Gale's character expanded which many readers do not take into account, because they are distracted by the anticipation of what is to come as well as the would-be romance between the two.
This is important because it actually reveals the opposing perspectives the two friends have as a result of their dehumanizing oppression under the Capitol.
While Katniss actually gained an appreciation for the value of life, Gale instinctively degrades it to make coping less painful.
Most readers easily lose the importance of this scene, because they are caught up in the romance that might come from Katniss and Gale.
He is the only boy she has been around up to this point.
He has to be the one.
Katniss rushes to him for comfort when he offers her an embrace, while simultaneously denying she might have deeper feelings for him (Collins 38).
To the presumptuous reader, this is a definite sign of love to come.
The pair is rushing to have their conversation, and they are not allowed to finish before their time is up.
Only when they are torn apart does Katniss truly begin to panic (Collins 40).
Likewise, Gale has been telling Katniss that her best chance is to get a bow, and she has been arguing she has no hope (Collins 39).
When the Peacekeepers pull Gale away from her at the end of the scene, she shouts to him to take care of her family (Collins 40).
She does not think she will be coming home from the Games.
Gruesome details from past Hunger Games are also being revealed, serving as another distraction.
Suzanne Collins masterfully distracts her audience into breezing over the important details which will captivate them later in the series.
The importance of this discussion is not held by the short-term advice Gale is offering Katniss, but by the long-term conflicts it poses to the reader.
Gale is a representation of the rage that comes with oppression.
Although he is reassuring her, he maintains a cold ironic humor about the content of the Games.
When referring to one year he says, "Since that year half of them died of cold.
Not much entertainment in that.
" (Collins 39) This also shows his understanding of the Capitol's view.
Although primarily angry, Gale is not without understanding of the world around him.
He verges on thinking similarly to the very people he hates.
His next reassurance is telling her, " it's just hunting.
" (Collins 40) Ultimately, Gale has more than one purpose.
First, he is Katniss's confidant and one of her oldest friends.
Likewise, he represents the aggressive, more animal side of Katniss.
She proves this by agreeing with him about the ease of hunting people, if she can put aside the fact they are humans as well (Collins 40).
He furthermore represents the Capitol's mindset.
Finally, he is one of the primary representations of the emotional state of not just the subjugated people of Panem, but also of anyone who has ever been in such a broken state.
Although there are many dynamics in this one scene, the most significant conflict is posed near the end when Gale and Katniss are discussing murder.
He asks, "How different can it be, really?
"(Collins 40) In this pivotal moment, the reader is confronted with the comparison of humans to animals.
Collins' viewpoint is noticeable, because Gale's statement that murdering people is the same as killing animals reinforces the idea in the reader's mind that the opposite is true.
Katniss does not argue this point further; she almost agrees, but maintains the idea that this murder is a terrible prospect.
This conflict of dehumanization is also demonstrated by Katniss's circumstance.
She is about to enter an arena to kill other children for the sport and entertainment of the Capitol.
Within the space of a few words, she has remembered three separate occasions where other young people were killed.
The Capitol considered the best Hunger Games those that had bloodshed and gore; the instances with more natural deaths were boring (Collins 39).
Gale is here once again representing the Capitol viewpoint, because they do not see this as offensive.
Both sides of the spectrum are represented here.
The elite who control the situation do not recognize its significance.
They have been exposed to it for so long without a negative impact on themselves.
On the other hand, there are the average citizens who endure hardships every day.
However, they have no ability to control it or improve their standard of living.
Unfortunately, they have given up hope.
Katniss represents them with her constant surety of loss.
For every positive tip Gale tries to give her, she mentally turns it down as unachievable (Collins 39-40).
This section of dialogue is comparable to other analogies of the past.
It serves its purpose in the fantasy, while at the same time representing a greater resolution.
The impatient reader may miss this, as he is preoccupied by what he thinks will unfold or by what he wants to occur.
However, this novel is not driven to be a story for entertainment alone, and especially not to please its readers.
Its design is to impact its audience to recognize issues in the modern world.
Not only does this audience realize them, they are automatically drawn to a side.
Humans are precious, unique creations, not animals for slaughter.
Although Gale serves as the means by which this message is stated, his character is not to be underestimated as only having this purpose.
Collins uses him as a tool to distract the reader.
Also, he represents the emotional state of oppression.
Through this one scene of text, the fervent reader can deduce information that pertains not only to the novel but also to the greater purpose of the work.
To do this, however, they must recognize who Gale really is and his place in The Hunger Games.








Assignment Filename =  010draft2.txt
"I like you, Seneca.
Be careful, (Ross)" spoken by President Snow, are some of the most ominous words in The Hunger Games film.
The dread of these words comes to life as Seneca Crane is taken to his execution.
He is locked in an ornate room with a bowl of toxic nightlock berries.
His only option is suicide.
Shortly after, the movie cuts to President Snow in the gameroom.
By looking at these scenes we can see the beauty the Capitol portrays the Districts contrasted with its truly stark cruelty; this is important because it reveals the deceivingly totalitarian nature of the Capitol.
At first the room Seneca is left in seems to be a pleasant place.
It is luxuriously decorated with wood paneled walls and marble floors.
The marble also forms columns up the walls.
The space is adorned with golden sconces and an embossed table with legs carved from two golden eagles.
An elegant chandelier hangs in the center of the room, and a cluster of white roses is off to one side.
The Capitol seal is above the door.
Even the bowl filled with deadly berries is beautifully shaped.
The overall appearance of the room is that of a manor from history, although there are modern touches.
The door is made of a metal reminiscent of stainless steel and is covered by small rectangular slats.
The music at this moment does not fit the setting.
It is futuristic and seems to building up or counting down to an event.
The window is shown briefly behind the berries, but it appears to have bars across it.
The doors are locked as well.
Even though this room is beautiful at first glance, it is definitely a prison.
On the other hand, the gameroom is very simple.
It seems to be underground and is illuminated only by artificial light.
All the workers are dressed in white uniforms.
It looks very polished and is free of clutter.
It is undecorated, with its ample technology as its only boast.
Although this room is very futuristic, it is also extremely plain when compared to the berry room.
Its shape is also unique.
This scene begins from behind President Snow, providing an excellent view of its circular appearance.
Since all of the screens are on one side, this at first is not understandable.
However, this room is actually an arena shape and all of the workers are beneath Snow.
The orientation is from his point of view, but the effect is the audience feels his dominion the way his subjects do.
Also, the same musical piece from the scene with Seneca Crane has continued up to this point.
As Snow begins to leave the room, however, it gains an eerie quality.
It has also reached its climax, which lends itself to the idea that it has reached what it was building up to.
The primary significance of these scenes is that they highlight the defining characteristics of the Capitol.
The room with Seneca is very ornate, which shows the Capitols outside appearance.
The Capitol's disloyalty is displayed by its willingness to eliminate its own citizens.
This scene shows the Capitol also uses terror tactics on its people.
Seneca is made to kill himself using the method that Katniss and Peeta would have used to defy the Capitol.
In his last moments he is being shown his mistake and ridiculed for it.
At the same time, President Snow is seemingly gracious.
Although this is Seneca's execution, he is in a room made for a king.
The Nightlock berries presented to him act quickly.
He will not go through a long painful death.
This scene also plays on the minds of the audience.
At the time they see the berries, they are glad of the poetic justice of the scene.
Seneca Crane is getting what he deserves for causing Katniss and Peeta such a horrible ordeal.
Although Snow's symbol of white roses is proudly displayed in the room with the berries, it is not until they see him in the gameroom that the watchers realize the true evil has only begun to emerge.
Seneca was just a puppet, and life in Panem is about to be much worse.
In the gameroom, Snow has a look of arrogance and control.
He is barely perturbed and not even flustered.
He views the current situation as a minor setback that will easily be alleviated.
He is portrayed standing in the shadows even though the rest of the room is well lit.
When he turns his back on the gameroom, it shows his confidence that everything is in order, and the predicament will be resolved.
It is also a strong statement that his back is to the audience as he leaves.
Usually such a position lends itself to weakness or fear; in Snow's case, it only expands on his dominance.
He turns with the appearance of one about to act, not as though a task has been completed.
Although the conflict of the film seems to be ending, this simple action reveals that much worse is about to come for all the characters.
Also the camera angle pans around Snow, showing every aspect of his figure.
Although the gameroom is very familiar at this point in the movie, it is never the primary focus of the scene.
All of these minor details in the screenplay show those watching Snow's character, and thereby the true identity of the Capitol.
The Capitol is as multifaceted as a diamond.
On one hand, it is full of lavishness and wealth.
On the other, it demonstrates clinical simplicity.
The Capitol citizens do not realize they are being used, while those in the Districts starve to feed them.
The Hunger Games are portrayed to all as a way of uniting Panem for a better future.
Under this guise, the Capitol executes its decisions with an unemotional logic.
It is loyal only to its goals.
The elimination of Seneca Crane immediately followed by a focused view of President Snow reveals him as the only person controlling this massive machine.
As Seneca planned the circumstances of the tributes, Snow plans the events of the entire nation.
Although he is not always the one in the spotlight, he has always been the Head Gamemaker.








Assignment Filename =  010final2.txt
"I like you, Seneca.
Be careful," (Ross) spoken by President Snow, are some of the most ominous words in The Hunger Games film.
The dread of these words comes to life as Seneca Crane is taken to his execution.
He is locked in an ornate room with a bowl of toxic nightlock berries.
His only option is suicide.
Shortly after, the movie cuts to President Snow in the gameroom.
These two scenes work together to reveal both sides of the Capitol, thereby revealing the inner workings of President Snow as well.
The Capitol is as multifaceted as a diamond.
On one hand, it is full of lavishness and wealth.
On the other, it demonstrates clinical simplicity.
Even though it is this expansive, however, every action it performs is directed by President Snow.
He truly is the Capitol embodied in one man.
By looking at these scenes we can see the beauty the Capitol portrays to the Districts contrasted with its truly stark cruelty; this is important because it reveals the deceivingly totalitarian nature of the Capitol.
At first the room Seneca is left in seems to be a pleasant place.
It is luxuriously decorated with wood paneled walls and marble floors.
The marble also forms columns up the walls.
The space is adorned with golden sconces and an embossed table with legs carved from two golden eagles.
An elegant chandelier hangs in the center of the room, and a cluster of white roses, President Snow's personal symbol, is off to one side.
The Capitol seal is above the door.
Even the bowl filled with deadly berries is beautifully shaped.
The overall appearance of the room is that of a manor from history, although there are modern touches.
The door is made of a metal reminiscent of stainless steel and is covered by small rectangular slats.
The music at this moment does not fit the setting.
It is futuristic and seems to be building up or counting down to an event.
The window is shown briefly behind the berries, but it appears to have bars across it.
The doors are locked as well.
Even though this room is beautiful at first glance, it is definitely a prison.
Seneca's face shows his emotions as he grasps the meaning of his situation.
At first he thinks he is being rewarded, but he becomes confused when the doors are locked.
When he sees the bowl, he curiously walks toward it.
Upon seeing the berries, a look of horror spreads across his face.
He has not been rewarded but given the ultimate punishment.
While the berry room revealed the Capitol's extravagant side, the gameroom portrays how methodical its operations are.
The gameroom is devoid of emotion and appears very sterile.
It seems to be underground and is illuminated only by artificial light.
All the workers are dressed in white uniforms.
It looks very polished and is free of clutter.
It is undecorated, with its ample technology as its only boast.
Although this room is very advanced, it is also extremely plain when compared to the berry room.
Its shape is also unique.
This scene begins from behind President Snow, providing an excellent view of its circular appearance.
Since all of the screens are on one side, this at first is not understandable.
However, this room is actually an arena shape, and all of the workers are beneath the standing platform that faces the screens.
A few metal bars form a handrail.
The orientation is from Snow's point of view, but the effect is the audience feels his dominion the way his subjects do.
Also, the same musical piece from the scene with Seneca Crane has continued up to this point.
As Snow begins to leave the room, however, it gains an eerie quality.
It has also reached its climax, which lends itself to the idea that it has reached what it was building up to.
The primary significance of these scenes is that they highlight the defining characteristics of the Capitol.
The room with Seneca is very ornate, which shows the projection Snow makes of the Capitol's appearance to the rest of the nation.
Snow's disloyalty is displayed by its willingness to eliminate his own citizens.
This scene shows that the Capitol also uses terror tactics on its people.
Seneca is made to kill himself using the method that Katniss and Peeta would have used to defy the Capitol.
In his last moments he is being shown his mistake and ridiculed for it.
At the same time, President Snow is seemingly gracious.
Although this is Seneca's execution, he is in a room made for a king.
The Nightlock berries presented to him act quickly.
He will not go through a long painful death.
This scene also plays on the minds of the audience.
At the time they see the berries, they are glad of the poetic justice of the scene.
Seneca Crane is getting what he deserves for causing Katniss and Peeta such a horrible ordeal.
At the same time, they realize how sadistic President Snow is by watching his methods of punishment.
Although Snow's symbol of white roses is proudly displayed in the room with the berries, it is not until they see him in the gameroom that the watchers realize the true evil has only begun to emerge.
Seneca was just a puppet, and life in Panem is about to be much worse.
In the gameroom, Snow has a look of arrogance and control.
He is barely perturbed and not even flustered.
He views the current situation as a minor setback that will easily be alleviated.
He is portrayed standing in the shadows even though the rest of the room is well lit.
When he turns his back on the gameroom, it shows his confidence that everything is in order, and the predicament will be resolved.
It is also a strong statement that his back is to the audience as he leaves.
Usually such a position lends itself to weakness or fear; in Snow's case, it only expands on his dominance.
He turns with the appearance of one about to act, not as though a task has been completed.
Although the conflict of the film seems to be ending, this simple action reveals that much worse is about to come for all the characters.
Also the camera angle pans around Snow, showing every aspect of his figure.
Although the gameroom is very familiar at this point in the movie, it is never the primary focus of the scene.
All of these minor details in the screenplay show those watching Snow's character, and thereby the true identity of the Capitol.
The Capitol citizens do not realize they are being used, while those in the Districts starve to feed them.
The Hunger Games are portrayed to all as a way of uniting Panem for a better future.
Under this guise, the Capitol executes its decisions with an unemotional logic.
It is loyal only to its goals and Snow's every whim.
The elimination of Seneca Crane immediately followed by a focused view of President Snow reveals him as the only person controlling this massive machine.
As Seneca planned the circumstances of the tributes, Snow plans the events of the entire nation.
Although he is not always the one in the spotlight, he has always been the Head Gamemaker.








Assignment Filename =  011draft3.txt
Although it may be surprising, The Hunger Games series by Suzanne Collins correlates quite well to the Vietnam War.
There are prisoners, leaders, executioners, and battles for freedom in both.
The tales of those in captivity are the most interesting, especially when one focuses on their thought patterns and attempts at escape.
However, neither the tributes nor the prisoners of war (POWs) could stand on their own; they needed to communicate.
Looking at the use of codes by the Tributes in the arena when compared to that of the POWs in Vietnam, shows that suppressed peoples are forced to use subvert tactics to escape their predicament, whether it be a literal or mental escape; this is important because it sends the message that people need to not only speak but also understand the those around them.
The code used in the Arena in Catching Fire was fairly simple.
Used to arrange an escape for the Tributes inside, it involved the supporters on the outside sending them bread.
The number of bread roles and the origin of those bread roles represented the day in the arena and the time of day of the rescue, respectively (Collins 385).
This was the perfect code, because it was easily overlooked.
Sponsors often sent their favorite tributes gifts, such as food, at especially difficult times in the arena.
It was also a simple communication method.
They had to know how many days they had been in the arena, and count the rolls.
Because rationing the food was already necessary, this did not stand out even to the tributes who did not know of the plan.
The entire ordeal was being broadcast to the nation of Panem, but there was little need to worry of discovery.
The POWs in Vietnam were in a parallel circumstance.
They were not allowed to communicate with each other under threat of torture.
Therefore, they developed an ingenious method of communication called the tap code.
Carlyle Smith Harris introduced it, having learned it from an instructor in the air force (Hubbell 44).
It was similar to Morse code, but there were no dashes.
Variations of it could be done with coughing and other respiratory sounds.
Jeremiah Denton (who is famous for sending the message "TORTURE" by blinking in Morse code during a propaganda television interview early in his prison experience [Denton 91-92]) takes credit for inventing this particular version, although it became quite common throughout North Vietnam's prisoner network.
This vocal method was efficient because the prisoner's were often ill.
Thus it was easily disguised (Hubbell 46-47 and Denton ix-x).
Just as the characters in Catching Fire used their communication to plan an escape, so did the POWs in Vietnam.
Denton developed one such plan.
He discovered a way to open his cell door and disclosed the method to two friends who were later able to escape, albeit briefly (Denton 126-127).
The POWS also relied on communication to escape mentally.
Solitary confinement was not an uncommon punishment, and for some it went on for years.
The only opportunity these men had to communicate with someone besides their tormentors was to speak through the tap code.
One good example of this desperation for contact is John McCain.
Because his father became commander in chief of the US Pacific forces during his captivity in the war, McCain was often focused on in interrogations, punishment, and of course, solitary confinement.
He says, "As far as this business of solitary confinement goesthe most important thing for survival is communication with someone, even if it's only a wave or a wink, a tap on the wall, or to have a guy put his thumb up.
It makes all the difference.
" (McCain) The POWs' existences would have been null had it not been for the network they devised.
They maintained a military framework, and their mission was to resist their interrogators (Hubbell 44-47).
Once they could converse, they were able to support each other through the many trials they experienced as prisoners, just as the Tributes formed alliances to defend themselves in the arena.
The emphasis placed on communication in Catching Fire serves to prove a point.
Communication is a two-party system.
It requires sending and receiving, or speaking and listening.
The men in the Vietnamese prison camps knew the importance of both parts.
They developed extremely good hearing as a result of listening for nearly inaudible taps or coughs (Denton viii-ix).
Finnick showed the same attentiveness when counting the rolls they had received.
The resemblance between this historic circumstance and Collins' novel is no accident.
She is making the statement that people in America have lost this attentiveness and need to regain it in order to escape impending perils.
She does this by focusing on the receiving end of the message in Catching Fire.
In a paragraph, she explains the entire plan and the method of sending the message to the Tributes (Collins 385).
However, she describes in detail Finnick's reaction to the first loaf of bread (Collins 317) and to the smaller roles (Collins 349).
He held onto the bread as if it were a lifeline; and indeed it was.
At the time this book was written there was a constant flow of information about the war in Iraq.
Social media and the Internet were gaining prevalence.
People were making a variety of open political statements.
It was an ideal formula for vast knowledge, but no one truly listened to what others were saying.
Worse than that, they appeared apathetic.
What they heard, they did not take the time to comprehend.
They made their own assumptions about other people and what they thought.
By emphasizing communication in her novel, Collins simultaneously notes its lack of existence in the outside world.
Society also needs to make an escape, not from an arena or a prison camp, but from this endless cycle of miscommunication.
Few public people in recent history have lied directly; most tell only what they want the public to hear.
When their constituency finds out they have been mislead by politicians, they react as though shocked that they were deceived.
The fact is it is easy to mislead someone who is only half- listening.
Although people appear shocked when it is someone famous or infamous as the case may be, it is a purely hypocritical reaction.
They use the same forms of deception in their daily lives.
The officials in office reflect the citizens who gave them that role.
In order to cease being offended, they need to change themselves, not just the leaders.
If they are truly attentive to everything politicians say, then they are less likely to be deceived.
As a result, gradually the current bureaucrats will be replaced by honest leaders.
What is the point of lying?
When one recognizes the situation of the POWs stripped of everything they had, one can realize there is no real use for deception.
It only brings people down and destroys purpose.
The POWs had nothing to lie to each other about, and as a result their communications thrived.
In The Hunger Games series, Katniss was always at her best when she knew the truth of her situation.
Their enemies knew the harm this communication could do and were willing to do anything to put a stop to it.
Suzanne Collins' message is simple: America needs to become a two-way communication system.
It needs to both listen and respond without making assumptions and costly miscalculations.
The same applies to its individual citizens.
In all the noise of the modern era, the United States has lost its voice.
Only once it has cleared its throat of everything that is obstructing it can it be heard by any other nation.








Assignment Filename =  011final3.txt
Although it may be surprising, The Hunger Games series by Suzanne Collins correlates quite well to the Vietnam War.
There are prisoners, leaders, executioners, and battles for freedom in both.
The tales of those in captivity are the most interesting, especially when one focuses on their thought patterns and attempts at escape.
However, neither the tributes nor the prisoners of war (POWs) could stand on their own; they needed to communicate.
Looking at the use of codes by the Tributes in the arena when compared to that of the POWs in Vietnam, shows that suppressed peoples are forced to use subvert tactics to escape their predicament, whether it be a literal or mental escape; this is important because it sends the message that people need to not only speak but also understand the those around them.
The code used in the Arena in Catching Fire was fairly simple.
In a paragraph, she explains the entire plan and the method of sending the message to the Tributes (Collins 385).
Used to arrange an escape for the Tributes inside, it involved the supporters on the outside sending them bread.
"The district where the bread originated indicated the day...
The number of rolls the hour.
"(Collins 385) This was the perfect code, because it was easily overlooked.
Sponsors often sent their favorite tributes gifts, such as food, at especially difficult times in the arena.
It was also a simple communication method.
They had to know how many days they had been in the arena, and count the rolls.
Because rationing the food was already necessary, this did not stand out even to the tributes who did not know of the plan.
The entire ordeal was being broadcast to the nation of Panem, but there was little need to worry of discovery.
The POWs in Vietnam were in a parallel circumstance.
They were not allowed to communicate with each other under threat of torture.
Therefore, they developed an ingenious method of communication called the tap code.
Carlyle Smith Harris introduced it, having learned it from an instructor while in the air force (Hubbell 44).
It was similar to Morse code, but there were no dashes.
Variations of it could be done with coughing and other respiratory sounds.
Jeremiah Denton (who is famous for sending the message "TORTURE" by blinking in Morse code during a propaganda television interview early in his prison experience [Denton 91-92]) takes credit for inventing this particular version, although it became quite common throughout North Vietnam's prisoner network.
This vocal method was efficient because the prisoner's were often ill.
Thus it was easily disguised (Hubbell 46-47 and Denton ix-x).
Just as the characters in Catching Fire used their communication to plan an escape, so did the POWs in Vietnam.
Denton developed one such plan.
He discovered a way to open his cell door and disclosed the method to two friends who were later able to escape, albeit briefly (Denton 126-127).
The POWS also relied on communication to escape mentally.
Solitary confinement was not an uncommon punishment, and for some it went on for years.
The only opportunity these men had to communicate with someone besides their tormentors was to speak through the tap code.
One good example of this desperation for contact is John McCain.
Because his father became commander in chief of the United States Pacific forces during his captivity in the war, McCain was often focused on in interrogations, punishment, and of course, solitary confinement.
He says, "As far as this business of solitary confinement goesthe most important thing for survival is communication with someone, even if it's only a wave or a wink, a tap on the wall, or to have a guy put his thumb up.
It makes all the difference.
" (McCain) The POWs' existences would have been null had it not been for the network they devised.
They maintained a military framework, and their mission was to resist their interrogators (Hubbell 44-47).
Once they could converse, they were able to support each other through the many trials they experienced as prisoners, just as the Tributes formed alliances to defend themselves in the arena.
The emphasis placed on communication in Catching Fire serves to prove a point.
Communication is a two-party system.
It requires sending and receiving, or speaking and listening.
The men in the Vietnamese prison camps knew the importance of both parts.
They developed extremely good hearing as a result of listening for nearly inaudible taps or coughs (Denton viii-ix).
Finnick showed the same attentiveness when counting the rolls they had received.
The resemblance between this historic circumstance and Collins' novel is no accident.
She is making the statement that people in America have lost this attentiveness and need to regain it in order to escape impending perils.
She does this by focusing on the receiving end of the message in Catching Fire.
She describes in detail Finnick's reaction to the first loaf of bread and to the smaller roles.
"Finnick turns the bread over in his hands, examining the crust.
A bit too possessively.
" (Collins 317) "Finnick counts them, turning each one over in his hands before he sets it in a neat configuration  he seems obsessed with handling it.
" (Collins 349) He held onto the bread as if it were a lifeline; and indeed it was.
Collins emphasizes the honest aspect of communication, by showing how angry Katniss is when she finds out the other Tributes worked around her with the code.
"Used without consent, without knowledge My supposed friends have been a lot more secretive.
" (Collins 385-386) After a few minutes of processing this new revelation, she even attacks Haymitch (Collins 387).
Whenever the North Vietnamese discovered prisoners using codes or saying anything, they had a similar violent reaction.
Once, Jeremiah Denton got news from home from another prisoner.
When he gave a triumphant shout, the guards instantly captured, questioned, and tortured him (Denton 140-141).
Understanding communication is the power to control others.
The North Vietnamese realized this as enforcers, whereas Katniss realized it as a victim.
Collins wanted to make this point of two-way communication to her audience.
Society needs to make an escape, not from an arena or a prison camp, but from this endless cycle of miscommunication.
The fact is it is easy to mislead someone who is only half- listening.
Although people appear shocked when someone famous (or infamous as the case may be) deceives them, it is a purely hypocritical reaction.
They use the same forms of deception in their daily lives.
In order to cease being offended, citizens need to change themselves, not just the leaders.
If they are truly attentive to everything politicians say, then they are less likely to be deceived.
As a result, gradually the current bureaucrats will be replaced by honest leaders.
What is the point of lying?
When one recognizes the situation of the POWs stripped of everything they had, one can realize there is no real use for deception.
It only brings people down and destroys purpose.
The POWs had nothing to lie to each other about, and as a result their communications thrived.
In The Hunger Games series, Katniss was always at her best when she knew the truth of her situation.
Their enemies knew the harm this communication could do and were willing to do anything to put a stop to it.
Suzanne Collins' message is simple: America needs to become a two-way communication system.
It needs to both listen and respond without making assumptions and costly miscalculations.
The same applies to its individual citizens.
In all the noise of the modern era, the United States has lost its voice.
Only once it has cleared its throat of everything that is obstructing it can it be heard by any other nation.








Assignment Filename =  012draft4.txt
Here is the recipe for literary success: add segregation, tribulation, war, and romance; subtract individuality, consciousness, and the accepted male role.
Time the release for a date when the last "big thing" is beginning to fade.
Let it sit through the initial criticism.
Then you have the next New York Times bestseller.
Young adults today are fascinated by these trends in either current or futuristic dystopias.
In order to accommodate the sudden surge in this literary genre, authors have experimented over the past decade with various combinations of these ingredients.
There were Harry Potter and Twilight.
Recently, the most significant has been Suzanne Collins The Hunger Games series.
However Divergent by Veronica Roth is closely following it.
By comparing Katniss's Hunger Games experience with Tris's initiation process, we can see the progression and sophistication of the recipe in satisfying the current audience/readers' appetites; this is important because it reflects a better understanding of young adults' mindset.
When Prim's name was drawn during the reaping, Katniss stepped forward to take her place in the Seventy-fourth annual Hunger Games.
She was given a minimal amount of time to train for the ordeal before she was thrown into the arena and forced to fight for her death.
Fortunately, she had many things going in her favor.
She already knew how to trap and forage for food.
She could climb trees to get out of the reach of other tributes.
Most importantly, she had perfect aim with a bow.
Except for the fact she did not want to kill anyone, she was a perfect contestant for the Hunger Games.
There was only one thing she did not expect: she was pretending to be in love with Peeta Mellark.
This was initially a rouse to gain the attention of the sponsors, but it grew into genuine affection by the end of the Games.
At one point near the end, they share a kiss in a cave.
Katniss says, "This is the first kiss where I actually feel stirring inside my chest the first kiss that makes me want another.
" (The Hunger Games 298)

Tris's situation was not as much of an extreme battle, but it was easily just as fatal and possibly as much of a psychological challenge.
First, she had an aptitude test to tell her which faction, of the city she belonged in.
The city was divided into five factions, much as Panem was divided into twelve Districts.
Instead of being divided by labor, however, they were divided by ideology.
She was attached to a machine and presented with scenarios.
Her results showed her as being Divergent, meaning she could adapt to more than one faction.
Unfortunately, it also meant people would be willing to murder her to remove the nonconformity (Roth 257).
At the choosing ceremony, she picked Dauntless, which meant leaving her home of Abnegation and taking on a completely different personality.
Her first test was to jump off a moving train to reach the Dauntless compound.
Then she had to jump off the top of a building into a hole leading underground.
After this, the real training began.
It was divided into three stages.
First was combat training.
Not only did she fight the other initiates, she also learned to shoot a gun.
She states, "There is power in controlling something that can do so much damagein controlling something, period.
" (Roth 79) The second stage was similar to the aptitude test.
She was hooked back into the machine and forced to face her most horrible fears.
This was to teach her to overcome fear.
Fortunately, being divergent, she was able understand it was not real and overcome the simulation.
Finally she had to go through a fear landscape.
It was a three dimensional simulation where she went through all of her fears.
This was overseen by a panel of the Dauntless leaders.
While these stages seem like training, there was more to it.
At each stage a certain number of initiates where sent away.
The Dauntless would only take ten new initiates.
(Roth 71) It was highly competitive, to the point a few initiates tried to kill their primary competition.
One, Peter, even tried to have Tris thrown into the chasm running beneath the Dauntless compound.
Upon first looking at these two young heroines, one may easily assume that Roth copied Collins' idea for a strong female character.
However, this is not so much the case.
It makes more sense that she extrapolated upon the qualities in Katniss.
She removed a lot of the weaknesses, while building the strengths.
When she was done she had created Tris.
Although a strong female character, she was still believable.
One way Roth improved upon the character was by giving her a stillness of mind.
Tris thinks through her situations in a more analytical way and controls her emotions.
In her second Hunger Games, Katniss has a breakdown when hearing the jabberjays scream like her family and friends (Catching Fire 339-345).
Tris, on the other hand, is forced to face all of her fears at the same time in the fear landscapes.
By using reasoning, she is able to overcome all of them.
Fortunately, one thing these young women have in common is they both protect their loved ones.
Katniss takes Prim's place in the dreaded Games, whereas Tris turns and faces a bullet rather than shoot her family in the fear landscape.
Their attitudes are also different.
Katniss continually focuses on what she cannot do and how things could go wrong.
Tris acknowledges her weaknesses; then she uses her skills to her advantage.
When she is forced to face Peter, know a guard in for the revolutionaries, she demonstrates this prowess.
"I can't win a fight, but if I can move fast enough, I won't have to fight.
" (Roth 462) With two strikes, she brought him to his knees and held his own gun to his head.
Both Divergent and The Hunger Games series are classified as young adult fiction.
The present fascination with dystopias is both a reflection of young adults' current concerns combined with older adult's worries for the future.
Michael Pryor, another author of young adult fiction, speculates why dystopias are presently so popular.
He says this literary form reflects the desire of teenagers to be liberated from authority and fend for themselves.
He mentioned that an unfortunate side effect of this mentality is to remove the parents from the storyline (Pryor).
Katniss's father died in a mining accident, and she has a dysfunctional relationship with her mother.
At the beginning of Divergent, on the other hand, Tris has both of her parents; but she leaves them when she chooses Dauntless.
At the end of the novel, they die violently as well.
Besides this, the more recent young adult fiction has taken place in a world similar to our own.
Neither of the series in question have mythological creaturesthey consist of believable people.
Mark Fisher makes this point when he says " and it is tempting to see the shift from wizards and lovelorn vampires to teenagers fighting for their lives in a state-organized spectacle as indicative of general change in the cultural temperature.
(Fisher 27)" Collins led this trend when she set her story in Panem, a North America many years in the future.
Roth followed this pattern even more closely, by placing her novel in a futuristic Chicago.
This is even easier for young adults to relate to, because they can imagine the specific location.
Fisher also brings another thing to mind.
Katniss is almost willing to give up, because she does not see the Capitol as being defeated (Fisher 30).
Tris, contrastingly, is willing to fight for her freedom when the Dauntless army is formed.
This swift reasoning is a definite improvement upon Katniss, who lacked this courage throughout the majority of her involvement in the Hunger Games.
One final thing that both books had in common was classification.
Meghan Cox Gurdon, while reviewing several recent books, mentioned this about Divergent: " the whole story is really an extended metaphor about the trials of modern adolescence: constantly having to take tests that sort and rank you among your peers " (Gurdon).
Examples from the book are the aptitude test, Choosing ceremony, and the rankings throughout initiation.
Similarly, The Hunger Games involves the reaping ceremony and the rankings of the individual contestants as projected winners by the Game makers.
When writing a young adult fiction novel, an important detail is to reflect the struggles and mindsets of the audience.
Teenagers are at an age where they want to be independent from their parents.
They want adventure in a setting similar to the one they know; it generally involves a "What if this were the case?
" factor.
They struggle with being compared constantly to everyone else.
Suzanne Collins may have captured this essence in her The Hunger Games trilogy, but Veronica Roth refined it.
In Divergent, she put Tris through as similar set of trials to the ones Katniss experienced.
The result, however, was the creation of an even more heroic character and a much more relatable novel.
Collins may have had the ingredients for success, but Roth had the proportions of the recipe down to a science.








Assignment Filename =  012final4.txt
Here is the recipe for literary success: Add segregation, tribulation, war, and romance; subtract individuality, consciousness, and the accepted male role.
Time the release for a date when the last "big thing" is beginning to fade.
Let it sit through the initial criticism, and then you have the next New York Times bestseller.
Young adults today are fascinated by these trends in either current or futuristic dystopias.
In order to accommodate the sudden surge in this literary genre, authors have experimented over the past decade with various combinations of these ingredients.
There were Harry Potter and Twilight.
Recently, the most significant has been Suzanne Collins' The Hunger Games series.
However Divergent by Veronica Roth is closely following it.
By comparing Katniss's Hunger Games experience with Tris's initiation process, we can see the progression and sophistication of the recipe in satisfying the current audience/readers' appetites; this is important because it reflects a better understanding of young adults' mindset.
When Prim's name was drawn during the reaping, Katniss stepped forward to take her place in the Seventy-fourth annual Hunger Games.
She was given a minimal amount of time to train for the ordeal before she was thrown into the arena and forced to fight for her death.
Fortunately, she had many things going in her favor.
She already knew how to trap and forage for food.
She could climb trees to get out of the reach of other tributes.
Most importantly, she had exceptional aim with a bow.
Except for the fact she did not want to kill anyone, she was an ideal competitor for the Hunger Games.
There was only one thing she did not expect: she was pretending to be in love with Peeta Mellark.
This was initially a rouse to gain the attention of the Sponsors, but it grew into genuine affection by the end of the Games.
At one point near the end, they share a kiss in a cave.
Katniss says, "This is the first kiss where I actually feel stirring inside my chest the first kiss that makes me want another.
" (The Hunger Games 298)

Tris's situation was not as much of an extreme battle, but it was easily just as fatal and possibly as much of a psychological challenge.
The city was divided into five factions, much as Panem was divided into twelve Districts.
Instead of being divided by labor, however, they were divided by ideology.
Her first challenge was an aptitude test to tell her which faction of the city she belonged in.
She was attached to a machine and presented with scenarios.
Her results showed her as being Divergent, meaning she could adapt to more than one faction.
Unfortunately, it also meant people would be willing to murder her to remove the nonconformity (Roth 257).
At the choosing ceremony, she picked Dauntless, which meant leaving her home of Abnegation and taking on a completely different personality.
Her first test was to jump off a moving train to reach the Dauntless compound.
Then she had to jump off the top of a building into a hole leading underground.
After this, the real training began.
It was divided into three stages.
First was combat training.
Not only did she fight the other initiates, she also learned to shoot a gun.
She states, "There is power in controlling something that can do so much damagein controlling something, period.
" (Roth 79) The second stage was similar to the aptitude test.
She was hooked back into the machine and forced to face her most horrible fears.
This was to teach her to overcome panic.
Fortunately, being Divergent, she was able understand it was not real and overcome the simulation.
Finally she had to go through a fear landscape.
It was a three dimensional simulation where she went through all of her fears.
This was overseen by a panel of the Dauntless leaders.
While these stages seem like training, there was more to it.
At each stage a certain number of initiates where sent away.
The Dauntless would only take ten new initiates.
(Roth 71) Anyone else became factionless, the equivalent to impoverished.
It was highly competitive, to the point a few initiates tried to kill their primary competition.
One, Peter, even tried to have Tris thrown into the chasm running beneath the Dauntless compound.
Like the Hunger Games, it became a competition of survival.
Upon first looking at these two young heroines, one may easily assume that Roth copied Collins' idea for a strong female character.
However, this is not the case so much as she extrapolated upon the qualities in Katniss.
She removed a lot of the weaknesses, while building the strengths.
When she was done she had created Tris.
Although a strong female character, she was still believable.
One way Roth improved upon the character was by giving her a stillness of mind.
Tris thinks through her situations in a more analytical way and controls her emotions.
In her second Hunger Games, Katniss has a breakdown when hearing the jabberjays scream like her family and friends (Catching Fire 339-345).
Tris, on the other hand, is forced to face all of her fears at the same time in the fear landscapes.
By using reasoning, she is able to overcome all of them.
Fortunately, one thing these young women have in common is they both protect their loved ones.
Katniss takes Prim's place in the dreaded Games, whereas Tris turns and faces a bullet rather than shoot her family in the fear landscape.
Their attitudes are also different.
Katniss continually focuses on what she cannot do and how things could go wrong.
Tris acknowledges her weaknesses; then she uses her skills to her advantage.
When the Erudite, another faction, and the Dauntless form an army to overthrow the existing government, she demonstrates this prowess.
She is forced to face her tormentor Peter, who is now a guard in for the revolutionaries.
"I can't win a fight, but if I can move fast enough, I won't have to fight.
" (Roth 462) With two strikes, she brought him to his knees and held his own gun to his head.
Both Divergent and The Hunger Games series are classified as young adult fiction.
The present fascination with dystopias is both a reflection of young adults' current concerns combined with older adult's worries for the future.
Adult authors are realizing what young people yearn for in literature and working to meet that demand.
Michael Pryor, another author of young adult fiction, speculates why dystopias are presently so popular.
He says this literary form reflects the desire of teenagers to be liberated from authority and fend for themselves.
He mentioned that an unfortunate side effect of this mentality is to remove the parents from the storyline (Pryor).
Katniss's father died in a mining accident, and she has a dysfunctional relationship with her mother.
At the beginning of Divergent, on the other hand, Tris has both of her parents; but she leaves them when she chooses Dauntless.
At the end of the novel, they die violently as well (Roth 443, 471).
Besides this aspect, the more recent young adult fiction has taken place in a world similar to our own.
Neither of the series in question have mythological creaturesthey consist of believable people.
Mark Fisher makes this point when he says " and it is tempting to see the shift from wizards and lovelorn vampires to teenagers fighting for their lives in a state-organized spectacle as indicative of general change in the cultural temperature.
" (Fisher 27) Collins led this trend when she set her story in Panem, a North America many years in the future.
Roth followed this pattern even more closely, by placing her novel in a futuristic Chicago.
This is even easier for young adults to relate to, because they can imagine the specific location.
Fisher also brings another factor to mind.
Katniss is almost willing to give up, because she does not see the Capitol as being defeated (Fisher 30).
Tris, contrastingly, is prepared to fight for her freedom when the Dauntless army is formed.
This swift reasoning is a definite improvement upon Katniss, who lacked this courage throughout the majority of her involvement in the Hunger Games.
One final thing that both books had in common was classification.
Meghan Cox Gurdon, while reviewing several recent books, mentioned this about Divergent: " the whole story is really an extended metaphor about the trials of modern adolescence: constantly having to take tests that sort and rank you among your peers " (Gurdon).
Examples from the book are the aptitude test, Choosing ceremony, and the rankings throughout initiation.
Similarly, The Hunger Games involves the reaping ceremony and the rankings of the individual contestants as projected winners by the Game makers.
Having compared all these characteristics from both novels, it is more applicable to see Tris as a projection of Katniss, not the clone most reader assume her to be.
When writing a young adult fiction novel, an important detail is to reflect the struggles and mindsets of the audience.
Teenagers are at an age where they want to be independent from their parents.
They want adventure in a setting similar to the one they know; it generally involves a "What if this were the case?
" factor.
They struggle with being compared constantly to everyone else.
Suzanne Collins may have captured this essence in her The Hunger Games trilogy, but Veronica Roth refined it.
In Divergent, she put Tris through as similar set of trials to the ones Katniss experienced.
The result, however, was the creation of an even more heroic character and a much more relatable novel.
Collins may have had the ingredients for success, but Roth had the proportions of the recipe down to a science.








Assignment Filename =  013draft1.txt
In The Hunger Games we can see a struggle between not just morality and immorality, but a power struggle that becomes a common theme throughout the series.
The Careers can represent those who are firm believers in The Capitol or even The Capitol itself, while the rest of the tributes can represent those districts who possess the potential to become rebellious.
This overall power struggle is made apparent when Thresh chooses to spare Katniss's life for the sake of Rue, Thresh's fellow district tribute.
When looking at this particular passage, we can see that there is a strong symbolism of the struggle between The Capitol and its surrounding Districts represented by the struggles first of Clove and Katniss, then Thresh and Katniss; this is imperative to the overall plot of The Hunger Games in that it sets up the foundation for this theme for the rest of the series.
Clove and Katniss are struggling for the upper hand, Clove being the one to finally gain it and use this position to her advantage.
What else could this closer symbolize than the way The Capitol governs, or more correctly, dictates its districts?
The Careers, more specifically in this passage, Clove, are a constant reminder of the extreme power and control that The Capitol possesses over the districts and the minute and un-important citizens that belong to said districts.
Katniss can be viewed as one of these citizens, having The Capitol crushing her control and restricting her almost to the point of death.
This portion of the passage is a perfect representation of an absolute dictatorship, when citizens have no choice but to listen to their leader who has complete control of every situation and scenario.
It is obvious that Katniss neither likes nor easily complies with the fact that her ultimate death is upon her, and while she puts up a struggle, it is a futile attempt at what was surely her last hope for living.
This is a common event throughout the districts as previously mentioned in the book; people not wanting to comply with The Capitol's rules and regulations and yet in the end, being forced to do it anyways.
Thresh, the big burly young man from district 11, is the solitary reason that Katniss lives, having easily dragged Clove off of Katniss and essentially beating Clove to death.
Thresh is another tribute who is thrown into the games as someone assumed to be a menial place-filler; someone who won't presumably do well but could possibly hold his own, as is every tribute who is not a Career.
This group of tributes can represent the districts and their feelings towards The Capitol, proven when, " Conflicting emotions cross Thresh's face.
He lowers the rock and points at me [Katniss], almost accusingly" (288).
He feels what is surely thankfulness that another tribute saw hope in someone so presumably hopeless as Rue, yet it is also noted that he is almost accusing Katniss for his feelings of morality.
Thresh feels a fellowship with Katniss for what she has done, yet knows that his thankfulness can only go so far in the games, for they must play by the rules.
Katniss even points out that " if Thresh wins, he'll have to go back and face a district that has already broken all the rules to thank me, and he is breaking the rules to thank me, too" (288).
What he has done is the biggest form of rebellion he dares to manage in the games, and it is a significant event when looking at the bigger picture of The Capitol being pitted against The Districts because it represents the apprehensive fellowship that the districts feel when they see The Capitol.
They dare not voice such fellowship against The Capitol in public though, because as Thresh surely felt, it could result in a horrible demise for them with all attempts at rebellion ending in complete failure.
The conflicts witnessed between Clove and Katniss, Katniss and Thresh are the turning points in the novel where the anger felt by the districts is sure to silently escalate into rebellion.
How could one witness such an event as Thresh sparing Katniss's life for the sake of this twelve-year old girl named Rue and not become filled with hatred at what The Capitol has made out of these young adults, Clove, Katniss, Thresh, and Rue alike?
The blame for what is being done is not to be put on the tributes, for they were raised to be objects in The Capitol's games.
It is all that the districts can do to fight back to the fullest extent by sending the bread that Katniss mentions in this passage.
An eerie symbolism we see between the amount of anger that the districts possess and the ability of The Capitol to retaliate to this anger is when Thresh first picks Clove up off of Katniss, he is described as " more massive, more powerful than I [Katniss] even recall" (286).
This in itself foreshadows a rebellion of the districts, and to what magnitude even, that this could occur.
The struggle between The Capitol and The Districts is strongly symbolized in this passage involving the struggles between Clove, Thresh, and Katniss.
We are able to assume that Thresh and Katniss represent the willpower and rebellious attitude of the districts while Clove represents The Capitol; Clove has been overthrown by Thresh, and Katniss saved by Thresh.
This passage is essential when thinking about the recurring theme of The Capitol versus The Districts, set up early in the book, as it foreshadows the doom of The Capitol.
The fire is sparked in this passage, a fire that is sure to burgeon into a blaze throughout the series as the anger of the districts at the immorality expressed by The Capitol escalates to an extreme magnitude. 






Assignment Filename =  013final1.txt
It is evident that in The Hunger Games there is a struggle between not just morality and immorality, but there is also a power struggle between The Capitol and The Districts that becomes a common theme throughout the series.
The Careers represent those who are adamant followers of The Capitol and hang on every word uttered by The Capitol; the rest of the tributes represent those districts who possess rebellious potential.
This power struggle that exists between The Capitol and The Districts is made apparent when Thresh spares Katniss's life for the sake of Rue, Thresh's fellow district tribute.
When looking at this particular passage, we can see that there is a strong symbolism of the struggle between The Capitol and its surrounding Districts represented by the physical struggles of Clove, Katniss, and Thresh; this is imperative to the overall plot of The Hunger Games in that it sets up the foundation for a "power war" theme for the rest of the series.
Clove and Katniss are struggling for the upper hand, Clove being the one to finally gain it and use this position to her advantage.
What else could this closer symbolize than the way The Capitol governs, or more correctly, dictates its districts?
The Careers, more specifically in this passage, Clove, are a constant reminder of the extreme power and control that The Capitol possesses over the districts and the minute and un-important citizens that belong to said districts.
Katniss can be viewed as one of these citizens, having The Capitol crushing her control and restricting her almost to the point of death, just as Clove did when she, " slammed into me [Katniss] pinning my [Katniss's] shoulders to the ground with her [Clove's] knees" (284).
This portion of the passage is a perfect representation of an absolute dictatorship, when citizens have no choice but to listen to their leader who has complete control of every situation and scenario.
It is obvious that Katniss neither likes nor easily complies with the fact that her ultimate death is upon her, as shown by her working up a " mouthful of blood and saliva" (284) and spitting it in Clove's face.
While she puts up a struggle, it is a futile attempt at what was surely her last hope for living.
This is a common event throughout the districts as previously mentioned in the book; people not wanting to comply with The Capitol's rules and regulations and yet in the end, being forced to do it anyways.
Thresh, the big burly young man from district 11, is the solitary reason that Katniss lives, having easily pulled Clove off of Katniss and "imprisoning" her in his arms (284).
Thresh is another tribute who is thrown into the games as someone assumed to be a menial place-filler; someone who won't presumably do well but could possibly hold his own, as is every tribute who is not a Career.
This group of tributes can represent the districts and their feelings towards The Capitol, proven when, " Conflicting emotions cross Thresh's face.
He lowers the rock and points at me [Katniss], almost accusingly" (288).
He feels what is surely thankfulness that another tribute saw hope in someone so presumably hopeless as Rue, yet it is also noted that he is almost accusing Katniss for his feelings of morality.
Thresh feels a fellowship with Katniss for what she has done, yet knows that his thankfulness can only go so far in the games, for they must play by the rules.
Katniss even points out that " if Thresh wins, he'll have to go back and face a district that has already broken all the rules to thank me, and he is breaking the rules to thank me, too" (288).
What he has done is the biggest form of rebellion he dares to manage in the games, and it is a significant event when looking at the bigger picture of The Capitol being pitted against The Districts because it represents the apprehensive fellowship that the districts feel when they see The Capitol.
They dare not voice such fellowship against The Capitol in public though, because as Thresh surely felt, it could result in a horrible demise for them with all attempts at rebellion ending in complete failure.
The conflicts witnessed between Clove and Katniss, Katniss and Thresh are the turning points in the novel where the anger felt by the districts is sure to silently escalate into rebellion.
How could one witness such an event as Thresh sparing Katniss's life for the sake of this twelve-year old girl named Rue and not become filled with hatred at what The Capitol has made out of these young adults, Clove, Katniss, Thresh, and Rue alike?
The blame for what is being done is not to be put on the tributes, for they were raised to be objects in The Capitol's games.
It is all that the districts can do to fight back to the fullest extent by sending the bread that Katniss mentions in this passage (288).
An eerie symbolism we see between the amount of anger that the districts possess and the ability of The Capitol to retaliate to this anger is when Thresh first picks Clove up off of Katniss, he is described as " more massive, more powerful than I [Katniss] even recall" (286).
This in itself foreshadows a rebellion of the districts, and to what magnitude even, that this could occur.
The struggle between The Capitol and The Districts is strongly symbolized in this passage involving the struggles between Clove, Thresh, and Katniss.
We are able to assume that Thresh and Katniss represent the willpower and rebellious attitude of the districts while Clove represents The Capitol; Clove has been overthrown by Thresh, and Katniss saved by Thresh.
This passage is essential when thinking about the recurring theme of The Capitol versus The Districts, set up early in the book, as it foreshadows the doom of The Capitol.
The fire is sparked in this passage, a fire that is sure to burgeon into a blaze throughout the series as the anger of the districts at the immorality expressed by The Capitol escalates to an extreme magnitude.






Assignment Filename =  014draft2.txt
People across the globe perceive the cultural phenomenon of The Hunger Games in vastly different manners.
There are multiple different views and opinions on how the characters of The Hunger Games should be portrayed in different media, such as the movie.
What stays consistent is how Katniss is portrayed by fans.
There are a vast array of fan art pictures that depict Katniss as a strong and confident individual, while also depicting her as compassionate and empathetic.
There is one particular picture that show Katniss as a sort of bridge between The Capitol and a burgeoning blaze that trails behind her, and in looking at this "bridge" we can see that Katniss is portrayed as the single determining factor in how out of hand or in control this fire becomes or stays; this is important because Katniss is, indeed, the one person who can determine how far this fire gets in terms of revolution against The Capitol.
The significance of Katniss facing The Capitol is not to be overlooked, because it is a statement that Katniss is "facing off" with The Capitol.
This is important in the overall scheme of Katniss being the bridge between revolution and normality between The Capitol and the districts in that it shows what side she is standing for.
It is also important to notice that she is standing on the edge of what is mean to be The Capitol, symbolizing how she is not quite to the point where she wants to revolt wholeheartedly against The Capitol.
When remembering how the people of the districts follow her every action, we can see that this position of Katniss on the edge of what is surely meant to be the separation between The Capitol and the districts is a sort of sign to the people of the revolution that they must hold off.
Another important aspect of the picture is how Katniss is drawing an arrow from her sheath, while facing The Capitol.
What could this more closely symbolize than her aggression towards the people of The Capitol and how she wishes to take them down?
It would be a different story had she just been standing there, facing The Capitol.
She would have seemed more compliant and willing to follow orders, but instead the artist depicts her as someone full of aggression and hatred who, in a sense, is willing to fight The Capitol under any circumstances.
This is imperative when considering how much her actions resound upon the people in the districts.
If she draws an arrow, the people will be quick to follow her.
Should she shoot that arrow, the people will follow suit.
She looks down upon The Capitol as if it is an obstacle on her way to freedom, almost as if The Capitol is the underdog in this revolution.
This is ironic considering how often she, as well as the people of the districts, are placed in the underdog position.
These people are the ones who have the injustices done to them, not the other way around.
It's as if Katniss is ready for this to change, to come out on top of The Capitol and dominate them.
Whereas the people of the districts look up to Katniss for leadership, she looks down on The Capitol, ready to fight, ready to revolt.
There is no other explanation for why Katniss is above The Capitol looking down upon them in a demeaning manner.
The blaze that trails behind Katniss is meant to symbolize the people of the revolution and their position in this burgeoning war against The Capitol.
It places Katniss as the people's leader of the revolution as she is the source of the flame and the flame follows her every move as do the people.
The flame is bright, as are the people of the districts with fire and rage against The Capitol for the injustices done to them.
The darkness behind the flame symbolizes the oppression of the people in the districts by The Capitol, and how that darkness still holds them captive at this point in the story.
The only hope that the oppressed have is Katniss, who leads this flame and who aims it towards The Capitol.
The hatred in the hearts of these people is either suppressed or set ablaze depending solely on the actions of Katniss, as proven by the positioning and coloring of the blaze attached to Katniss.
Katniss acts as the bridge and gate between revolution and normalcy in this picture, proven by her position in the picture in addition to the blaze she leads and controls; the symbolism of the fire representing the districts is important when considering that Katniss acts as the sole leader and controller of this blaze; she is the gate that determines whether this becomes a revolution, or remains normal.
The series itself does a decent job of portraying Katniss as the leader of the revolution, but what this fan art does is emphasize the extent to which she controls the revolution, even from the beginning.
Her every action is closely analyzed by the people of the districts and interpreted as a direct attack against The Capitol, no matter Katniss's true intentions.
It eventually gets to the point where Katniss becomes aware of, and embraces this role of leader and takes charge.
The fan art simply emphasizes this concept in that it directly places her and the districts as one force and unity against The Capitol.
Katniss is the source of the blaze, the leader of the flame that will become the revolution; she will accomplish what she wishes to achieve through any means possible, because the aggression and ferocity that she holds in her heart against The Capitol is amplified by the people of the districts who place all faith in her.






Assignment Filename =  014final2.txt
People across the globe perceive the cultural phenomenon of The Hunger Games in vastly different manners.
There are multiple different views and opinions on how the characters of The Hunger Games should be portrayed in different media, such as the movie.
What stays consistent is how Katniss is portrayed by fans.
There is no shortage of fan art pictures that depict Katniss as a strong and confident individual, while at the same time depicting her as compassionate and empathetic.
In the chosen picture, we can analyze the positioning of Katniss in relation to what is meant to be The Capitol and the flame behind her.
We can also analyze what each of these represent in terms of the revolution; the flame being the people of the districts and the skyline being The Capitol.
This picture shows that Katniss is a bridge between The Capitol and the blaze that trails behind her, and in looking at this "bridge" we can see that Katniss is portrayed as the single determining factor in the revolution; this is important because the people of the districts hang on her every word and action, and what she does will imminently set into motion a chain reaction in the districts.
Katniss facing The Capitol represents the strength and confidence that Katniss displays while essentially standing off with a greater power.
This is important in the overall "bridge" scheme in that it clearly emphasizes what side in the revolution that Katniss stands for.
It is also important to notice that she is standing on the edge of what is meant to be The Capitol, symbolizing the time it will take to actually attain access to The Capitol.
It's as if Katniss knows what she wants and is ready to attain it, she just needs the catalyst to catapult her through the barrier.
The people of the districts follow her every action, her every move; therefore, her standing on the barrier between The Capitol and the districts displays the necessity for the people of the districts to also wait for that catalyst alongside Katniss.
Another important aspect of the picture is how Katniss is drawing an arrow from her sheath, while facing The Capitol.
This is a clear statement of her aggression towards the people of The Capitol and how she wishes to overtake them.
It would be a different story had she just been standing there, facing The Capitol.
She would have seemed more compliant and willing to follow orders, but instead the artist depicts her as someone full of aggression and hatred who, in a sense, is willing to fight The Capitol under any circumstances.
This is imperative when considering how much her actions resound upon the people in the districts.
If she draws an arrow, the people will be quick to follow her.
Should she shoot that arrow, the people will follow suit.
She looks down upon The Capitol as if it is an obstacle, almost as if The Capitol is the underdog at this point in the revolution.
This is ironic considering how often she, as well as the people of the districts, are placed in the underdog position.
The people of the districts are the ones who have the injustices done to them, not the people of The Capitol.
It is as if Katniss is ready for this to change, to come out on top of The Capitol and dominate them.
Whereas the people of the districts look up to Katniss for leadership, she looks down on The Capitol, ready to fight, ready to revolt.
If Katniss acts like she dominates The Capitol, the people of the districts will also act as if they dominate The Capitol.
The blaze that trails behind Katniss is meant to symbolize the people of the revolution, the people of the districts, and their position in this burgeoning war against The Capitol.
It places Katniss as the people's leader of the revolution as she is the source of the flame and the flame follows her every move as do the people.
The amount of rage and hatred that the people possess for The Capitol can relate to the heat of the fire trailing Katniss.
The darkness behind the flame symbolizes the oppression of the people in the districts by The Capitol, and how that darkness still holds them captive at this point in the series.
The only hope that the oppressed have is Katniss, who leads this flame and who, alone, holds the ability to control it.
The hatred in the hearts of these people is either suppressed or set ablaze depending solely on the actions of Katniss, as proven by the positioning and coloring of the blaze attached to Katniss.
Katniss is the bridge between The Capitol and the blaze behind her, and we can see how she is portrayed as the leader in the revolution; this is important because it shows how the people of the districts rely on her to start the revolution.
There is significance behind why she faces The Capitol, is drawing an arrow, and leads a blaze; she is the leader and the picture makes no small attempt at portraying it.
It is clear that Katniss is the focal point and that the fire behind her is the people in the districts, all of whom are facing The Capitol, ready to revolt.
The novel may not specify it at this point in the series, but this picture does a wonderful job of displaying how Katniss is the determining factor in how the war will play out.
It portrays her stand-offish attitude as well as allowing its audience to see that she is fierce and does possess the potential to be a great leader.
This is a concept that, given the opportunity to be portrayed by a fan artist, results in a picture as foreshadowing to the series as this one.






Assignment Filename =  015draft3.txt
"Strategic bombing- a military strategy used in a total war with the goal of defeating an enemy nation-state by destroying its economic ability and public will to wage war rather than destroying its land or naval forces" (Wikepedia).
Suzanne Collins understands this concept and most definitely puts it to use in The Hunger Games with the bombing of District 12 and the bombing of The Capitol.
But is there really a difference between the bombings in Suzanne Collins' series and the many bombings that have been executed throughout world history?
Is it really possible to distinguish any discernible difference between the race of people in her series that commit such a heartless, callous, almost simple act and the race of people that the world has become today?
When thinking about how The Capitol uses strategic bombing to oppress its citizens we can see how Suzanne Collins paints humans as people who are no better than The Capitol; this is important because The Capitol is tenacious enough to throw children into an arena to fight to the death, and most people would not picture our race as a species who would do something similarly devastating and tragic.
Strategic bombing serves a multitude of purposes, one of which is the simplest of all; a retaliation towards opposing forces.
Suzzane Collins uses strategic bombing as a sort of retaliation from The Capitol towards the rebel forces of District 12.
There is no difference whatsoever between the race of people that Suzzane Collins created and humanity.
Both The Capitol's forces and human forces alike have used strategic, planned out bombings as a source of pain and suffering for the rivals.
One instance in American and German history occurred when the United States drenched the city of Dresden in "2,000 gallons of petrol" (Addison 30) and then proceeded to set this gasoline on fire with a parade of bombs, essentially causing a "Firestorm", as the attack was later entitled (Addison).
The impending, days long fires left a line of charred corpses and wounded citizens that, all in all, the city could no longer take care of due to the lack of resources ("Firebombing of Dresden").
The American troops thought that they were retaliating against a major source of industry and war-production, though they later learned different ("Firebombing of Dresden").
Just as The Capitol can so willingly demolish a city, so can humans, telling us that there is no boundary between morality and immorality when it comes to strategies in either The Hunger Games or real life.
Another connection to be made between what The Capitol and humans did was the futility of their efforts in serving their purpose.
To reiterate, the purpose of these bombings was to retaliate against the enemy or rebels.
In fact, The Capitol's efforts were purposeless because in their effort to retain the rebellion in District 12, they burgeoned an ever-growing blaze of hatred set forth by Gale who saves hundreds in the attacks.
And what purpose did the attacks on Dresden serve?
Well, Project  Thunderclap' (Addison 18) was also a futile effort in that the Germans were " already on the verge of surrender" when the attacks occurred ("Firebombing of Dresden").
The attacks were more or less just a mean of consolidating, hastening, and controlling the victory ensured by other means (Addison 18).
What the American troops did not know, however, is that Dresden was not home to war-production or major industry ("Firebombing of Dresden"), as previously thought, but instead it was home to wounded soldiers, women, and children, most of whom perished in the impending fires.
So not only were the attacks by The Capitol on District 12 and the attacks by allied forces on Dresden similar in the area of purpose, but they were similar in their futility of said purpose.
This paints humans as somewhat ignorant and horrific creatures, a species no different than The Capitol in The Hunger Games.
The almost simplistic manner with which the bombings are described in both The Hunger Games and in real life portrays the planning and execution of these bombings as easy and achievable, displaying the heartlessness that both cultures display when it comes to using strategic bombing as a war tactic.
In Mockingjay, the bombings are instantaneous and almost game-like in their execution.
The opposing forces come in, do what they came to do, and leave as if it's easy for them to bomb thousands of people and doom the masses to demise.
What is so different between The Capitol or Coin's execution of bombings from the human race's method of execution of strategic bombing?
The atomic bombing of Hiroshima " seems in many ways an event characterized by clarity and even simplicity" (Rotter 1)There was a single plane, piloted by one person, carrying a single bomb.
And this bomb was dropped, and the city was destroyed (Rotter 1).
Simple, right?
Describing events such as these as "simplistic" dehumanizes both cultures in a way that only war can bring about in humans.
It's spooky how Suzanne Collins describes the simplicity of the bombings in her series, and it paints an eerily similar picture to how humans go about executing strategic bombing.
The sheer amount of hatred that a group of people would have to possess in order to commit such a heinous crime is not to be overlooked.
It is a clear matter of hatred towards The Capitol by the districts in The Hunger Games, and it is a hatred that most would feel to be justifiable.
So when Coin retaliates with a bombing of The Capitol, it should be a matter of one's own opinion as to whether or not that's a justifiable act.
What about in the cases of the Dresden and Hiroshima bombings?
This is where one single difference between our races lies.
Dresden was, unarguably, one of the most unjustified acts of assumption in history, in which allied forces essentially assumed that the city was a major center of war-production that could hinder the allied forces' victory.
There was no proof to be had of such a claim, yet the bombings still occurred.
And when taking into consideration the fact that the German forces were on the verge of surrendering, one can see the complete audacity that the allied troops had to perform such an inexcusable act of cruelty.
Hiroshima, however, was a case of exact retaliation in which Americans retaliated with, essentially, the exact attack that they received from Japanese troops.
It is eerily similar to Coin's attack on The Capitol in The Hunger Games.
When asking if this is justifiable or not, one's own opinion comes into play.
Some will say that the sheer act of a bombing is in justifiable in itself, considering the horror and tragedy that ensues.
But it is also quite possible to say that if one is bombed, the opposing forces are just asking to be bombed back.
The connections made between The Hunger Games and world history on the topic of strategic bombing paint the human race as a group of people who are eerily similar to The Capitol; this is important because it shows the heartlessness with which Suzanne Collins is comparing the two races, portraying humans as people who commit heinous crimes just as The Capitol does.
It is in our nature to disagree and have opinions.
It is also in our nature to fight about such things, often creating wars.
But is it really all that natural to invent methods of horror and suffering as tragic as strategic bombing?
Can we really say that we are an evolved race because we bomb each other and commit crimes no different than The Capitol?
The Capitol may throw children into an arena to face their ultimate demise and bomb cities to control rebellion, but there is no difference between the execution of The Captiol's bombings and our bombings.
This proves that in the end, the human race is just as in excusable as The Capitol.
If one is to get mad about the atrocities committed in The Hunger Games, then why should that same person not be provoked to hate the same atrocities that humans commit?






Assignment Filename =  015final3.txt
The idea of strategic bombing began around the era of World War I, and Suzanne Collins applies it to the idea of a rebellion by the oppressed.
But is there really a difference between the bombings in Suzanne Collins' series and the many bombings that have been executed throughout world history?
Is it really possible to distinguish any discernible difference between the race of people in her series that commit such a heartless, callous, almost simple act and the race of people that the world has become today?
When thinking about how The Capitol uses strategic bombing to oppress its citizens we can see how Suzanne Collins paints humans as people who are no better than The Capitol; this is important because The Capitol is tenacious enough to throw children into an arena to fight to the death, and most people would not picture our race as a species who would do something similarly devastating and tragic.
Strategic bombing serves a multitude of purposes, one of which is the simplest of all; a retaliation towards opposing forces.
Suzzane Collins uses strategic bombing as a sort of retaliation from The Capitol towards the rebel forces of District 12.
"A month ago, the Capitol's firebombs obliterated the poor coal miners' houses in the Seam, the shops in town, even the Justice building" (Collins 3).
There is no difference whatsoever between the race of people that Suzzane Collins created and humanity.
Both The Capitol's forces and human forces alike have used strategic, planned out bombings as a source of pain and suffering for the rivals.
One instance in American and German history occurred when the United States drenched the city of Dresden in "2,000 gallons of petrol" (Addison 30) and then proceeded to set this gasoline on fire with a parade of bombs, essentially causing a "Firestorm", as the attack was later entitled (Addison).
The impending, days long fires left a line of charred corpses and wounded citizens that, all in all, the city could no longer take care of due to the lack of resources ("Firebombing of Dresden").
The American troops thought that they were retaliating against a major source of industry and war-production, though they later learned different ("Firebombing of Dresden").
Just as The Capitol can so willingly demolish a city, so can humans, telling us that there is no boundary between morality and immorality when it comes to strategies in either The Hunger Games or real life.
Another connection to be made between what The Capitol and humans did was the futility of their efforts in serving their purpose.
To reiterate, the purpose of these bombings was to retaliate against the enemy or rebels.
In fact, The Capitol's efforts were purposeless because in their effort to retain the rebellion in District 12, they burgeoned an ever-growing blaze of hatred set forth by Gale who saves hundreds in the attacks.
And what purpose did the attacks on Dresden serve?
Well, Project  Thunderclap' (Addison 18) was also a futile effort in that the Germans were " already on the verge of surrender" when the attacks occurred ("Firebombing of Dresden").
The attacks were more or less just a mean of consolidating, hastening, and controlling the victory ensured by other means (Addison 18).
What the American troops did not know, however, is that Dresden was not home to war-production or major industry ("Firebombing of Dresden"), as previously thought, but instead it was home to wounded soldiers, women, and children, most of whom perished in the impending fires.
So not only were the attacks by The Capitol on District 12 and the attacks by allied forces on Dresden similar in the area of purpose, but they were similar in their futility of said purpose.
This paints humans as somewhat ignorant and horrific creatures, a species no different than The Capitol in The Hunger Games.
The almost simplistic manner with which the bombings are described in both The Hunger Games and in real life portrays the planning and execution of these bombings as easy and achievable, displaying the heartlessness that both cultures display when it comes to using strategic bombing as a war tactic.
In Mockingjay, the bombings are instantaneous and almost game-like in their execution.
The opposing forces come in, do what they came to do, and leave as if it's easy for them to bomb thousands of people and doom the masses to demise.
What is so different between The Capitol or Coin's execution of bombings from the human race's method of execution of strategic bombing?
The atomic bombing of Hiroshima " seems in many ways an event characterized by clarity and even simplicity" (Rotter 1)There was a single plane, piloted by one person, carrying a single bomb.
And this bomb was dropped, and the city was destroyed (Rotter 1).
Simple, right?
Describing events such as these as "simplistic" dehumanizes both cultures in a way that only war can bring about in humans.
It's spooky how Suzanne Collins describes the simplicity of the bombings in her series, and it paints an eerily similar picture to how humans go about executing strategic bombing.
The sheer amount of hatred that a group of people would have to possess in order to commit such a heinous crime is not to be overlooked.
It is a clear matter of hatred towards The Capitol by the districts in The Hunger Games, and it is a hatred that most would feel to be justifiable.
So when Coin retaliates with a bombing of The Capitol, it should be a matter of one's own opinion as to whether or not that's a justifiable act.
What about in the cases of the Dresden and Hiroshima bombings?
This is where one single difference between our races lies.
Dresden was, unarguably, one of the most unjustified acts of assumption in history, in which allied forces essentially assumed that the city was a major center of war-production that could hinder the allied forces' victory.
There was no proof to be had of such a claim, yet the bombings still occurred.
And when taking into consideration the fact that the German forces were on the verge of surrendering, one can see the complete audacity that the allied troops had to perform such an inexcusable act of cruelty.
Hiroshima, however, was a case of exact retaliation in which Americans retaliated with, essentially, the exact attack that they received from Japanese troops.
It is eerily similar to Coin's attack on The Capitol in The Hunger Games.
When asking if this is justifiable or not, one's own opinion comes into play.
Some will say that the sheer act of a bombing is in justifiable in itself, considering the horror and tragedy that ensues.
But it is also quite possible to say that if one is bombed, the opposing forces are just asking to be bombed back.
The connections made between The Hunger Games and world history on the topic of strategic bombing paint the human race as a group of people who are eerily similar to The Capitol; this is important because it shows the heartlessness with which Suzanne Collins is comparing the two races, portraying humans as people who commit heinous crimes just as The Capitol does.
It is in our nature to disagree and have opinions.
It is also in our nature to fight about such things, often creating wars.
But is it really all that natural to invent methods of horror and suffering as tragic as strategic bombing?
Can we really say that we are an evolved race because we bomb each other and commit crimes no different than The Capitol?
The Capitol may throw children into an arena to face their ultimate demise and bomb cities to control rebellion, but there is no difference between the execution of The Captiol's bombings and our bombings.
This proves that in the end, the human race is just as in excusable as The Capitol.
If one is to get mad about the atrocities committed in The Hunger Games, then why should that same person not be provoked to hate the same atrocities that humans commit?






Assignment Filename =  016draft4.txt
The Hunger Games was a revolutionary series.
It was an idea that nobody had heard of before, something that nobody had ever thought of.
But was it?
The truth of the matter is that The Hunger Games is both a retelling of previous short stories and other choice print, while also being a revolutionary idea.
It's as if the novel was a turning point in which people realized the significance of such downright despicable deeds.
The main character, Katniss, is forced into circumstances that are beyond her control, and therefore has decisions made for her by her society and government.
She is driven by her familial bonds and relations back in District 12, and idea completely different than in Divergent, a novel thought to be closely related to The Hunger Games.
The society in Divergent establishes a clear sense of personal and psychological based decisions, in which personal preference takes precedent above government interference.
When we look at the contrast in societal circumstance between The Hunger Games and Divergent, we can see the variance in how decisions are made; Katniss's decisions in Panem are driven by uncontrollable circumstance while Tris's decisions are based purely on her personal preference.
The first point of contrast that the reader can see between Katniss's and Tris's societal differences is during both The Reaping and The Choosing Ceremony.
First addressing The Reaping, we can see the governmental interference in terms of how structured and rule-regulated the ceremony is.
There is no choice but for the citizens of the districts, whether being in the pool of names or not, to attend the ceremony.
While there lies a similarity to The Choosing Ceremony on this point, that is where the similarities end.
The Reaping is entirely focused on the unfortunate, and sadly, inescapable choosing of a tribute to compete in the games.
This is where the government interference that rules The Hunger Games comes into play.
The government makes all of the decisions in this case, and not one choice is left to the citizens of Panem.
In Diveregent, The Choosing Ceremony is primarily based on the choices of individuals.
Personal preference takes precedent in Divergent, no matter the repercussions of such decisions.
When considering if Divergent is a retelling of The Hunger Games, we should take into consideration the differences between each sub-sector of the larger community.
In The Hunger Games, Districts are split up and grouped according to how the government sees fit.
This means grouping districts by items of production, for example textiles, coal, luxury, and so on.
Each district is oppressed due to the level of government interference that takes place throughout Panem.
What is produced, as well as how the members of the districts live, is entirely dictated by the government.
In Divergent, the government does not dictate every aspect of everyday life to the extent that Panem does.
Though there is uniformity to how the factions act, dress, or live, there is still a level of personal choice that takes place every day.
The factions are not split up by production either; so much as they are split up according to personalities.
The common theme in Divergent is how personalities affect a person's choices, and it therefore makes sense that the factions would be dominated by personality types instead of production.
Another contrast is that of the familial bonds in both novels.
The Reaping, though unfortunate, strengthens Katniss's sense of familial bond to her mother, sister, and Gale.
What else does she have to hang on to but the strong relationships that she has back home?
She is going to, what she thinks, is her imminent demise and the strongest semblance of reality that she can retain is that of her family back home.
Tris, on the other hand, holds no ties to her family as she deliberately severs the bonds that existed when she chooses Dauntless.
It is tradition for Abnegation to stay with their community.
They have a strong sense of selflessness and big hearts, and it is highly unusual for someone to leave Dauntless and successfully transfer into a different faction.
When Tris does this, she instills a sense of betrayal among her parents.
Adding salt to an already deep wound, her brother did the same in choosing to transfer factions.
The repercussions of decisions based on personal preference in Divergent takes the form of a clear destruction in familial bonds, while the bonds formed in The Hunger Games are strong and existent throughout a majority of the novel.
If we analyze the revolutions in both The Hunger Games and Divergent, we see a clear contrast between control.
The revolution in The Hunger Games is a clear statement of revolt by the rebels who are attempting to overthrow the government.
It's a classic case of overthrowing the government and gaining back control of their lives.
But in Divergent, the revolution starts out with the government attempting to overthrow itself.
How is that possible?
Well, the government has leaders in Abnigation who they believe are not satisfactory and who they believe only listen to the selfless aspect of their personalities instead of the personalities of everyone in the society.
This, in turn, sparks a revolution by the government to overthrow the leaders in Abnigation.
So the revolutions are two completely different situations; the oppressed attempting to control the government versus the government taking back control from its leaders.
Psychological torture also takes a different form in the two novels.
One is government inflicted, the other is inflicted by choice.
The Hunger Games is a clear case of the government using psychological torture as blackmail in order to get what they want or need.
It's used in more cases than one in the novel, and is purely a means of torture.
Divergent uses psychological torture as a form of training, preparing the prospective initiates to face their fears in any situation.
As the initiates chose the faction, it is their choice to participate in all of the activities and training exercises.
They also have the choice to become factionless, and though it's not a favorable alternative, it is still an option given to them by Dauntless.
So when we speak of how psychological torture is used, we can see the variance between government inflicted torture and self chosen torture.
We can see the varied levels of government interference and control between The Hunger Games and Divergent when we look at how decisions are made; this is important because it shows how Divergent contrasts The Hunger Games on the exact points that The Hunger Games makes so prominent.
Divergent, though considered to be a form of retelling of The Hunger Games, is indeed very different from The Hunger Games.
The idea of a dystopian oppression came about long before The Hunger Games, and was just made more applicable to modern day life by Suzanne Collins.
Divergent is a novel based more on personal choices and preferences than it is based on a government-overthrow.
The novel prefers personal choice over familial bonds and, though that may seem heartless, it is different than what takes precedent in The Hunger Games, which are those familial bonds.
It's as if the government oppression forces those familial bonds to become stronger, while personal choice weakens them.
These two novels prove this in their varied view on relationships versus personal choice.
Katniss has a very small span of personal choice, and this in turn allows her to strengthen her relationships back home.
Tris, on the other hand, chooses something completely out of the normal, and loses what bonds she had with her family.
On top of that, her brother added to the sense of severed bonds.
It is imperative to realize that Tris and Katniss differ in terms of government interference when it comes to decisions.






Assignment Filename =  016final4.txt
The Hunger Games is a revolutionary series.
It is an idea that nobody had heard of before, something that nobody had ever thought of.
But was it?
The truth of the matter is that The Hunger Games is both a retelling of previous short stories and other choice print, while also being a revolutionary idea.
It's as if the novel was a turning point in which people realized the significance of such downright despicable deeds.
Divergent is a novel thought to be a closely related "re-telling" of The Hunger Games, though the two novels differ on many major points.
Katniss's choices are primarily made for her by her government while Tris's choices are strictly based on personal preference.
The Hunger Games emphasizes a separation of districts by production, while Divergent chooses to put even more focus on personal choice by separating factions by personality.
Familial bonds in the The Hunger Games that were previously weak and destructed are made stronger by The Reaping.
The exact opposite is the case of the familial bonds in Divergent, where the bonds are almost severed completely because of Tris's choice to change factions.
One of the few similarities between major concepts in the two novels is that of the revolts making these familial bonds stronger in the case of both Katniss and Tris.
By looking at how prominent personal choice and the severing of familial bonds are in Divergent, we can see how affected a community and family can be by one person's choice; this is important because it shows how Divergent contrasts The Hunger Games on the exact points that The Hunger Games makes so prominent.
The first point of contrast that the reader can see between Katniss's and Tris's societal differences is during both The Reaping and The Choosing Ceremony.
First addressing The Reaping, we can see the governmental interference in terms of how structured and rule-regulated the ceremony is.
There is no choice but for the citizens of the districts, whether being in the pool of names or not, to attend the ceremony.
While there lies a similarity to The Choosing Ceremony on this point, that is where the similarities end.
The Reaping is entirely focused on the unfortunate, and sadly, inescapable choosing of a tribute to compete in the games.
This is where the government interference that rules The Hunger Games comes into play.
The government makes all of the decisions in this case, and not one choice is left to the citizens of Panem.
In Diveregent, The Choosing Ceremony is primarily based on the choices of individuals.
Personal preference takes precedent in Divergent, no matter the repercussions of such decisions.
When considering if Divergent is a retelling of The Hunger Games, we should take into consideration the differences between each sub-sector of the larger community.
In The Hunger Games, Districts are split up and grouped according to how the government sees fit.
This means grouping districts by items of production, for example textiles, coal, luxury, and so on.
Each district is oppressed due to the level of government interference that takes place throughout Panem.
What is produced, as well as how the members of the districts live, is entirely dictated by the government.
In Divergent, the government does not dictate every aspect of everyday life to the extent that Panem does.
Though there is uniformity to how the factions act, dress, or live, there is still a level of personal choice that takes place every day.
The factions are not split up by production either; so much as they are split up according to personalities.
The common theme in Divergent is how personalities affect a person's choices, and it therefore makes sense that the factions would be dominated by personality types instead of production.
Another contrast is that of the familial bonds in both novels.
The Reaping, though unfortunate, strengthens Katniss's sense of familial bond to her mother, sister, and Gale.
What else does she have to hang on to but the strong relationships that she has back home?
She is going to, what she thinks, is her imminent demise and the strongest semblance of reality that she can retain is that of her family back home.
Tris, on the other hand, holds no ties to her family as she deliberately severs the bonds that existed when she chooses Dauntless.
It is tradition for Abnegation to stay with their community.
They have a strong sense of selflessness and big hearts, and it is highly unusual for someone to leave Dauntless and successfully transfer into a different faction.
When Tris does this, she instills a sense of betrayal among her parents.
Adding salt to an already deep wound, her brother did the same in choosing to transfer factions.
The repercussions of decisions based on personal preference in Divergent takes the form of a clear destruction in familial bonds, while the bonds formed in The Hunger Games are strong and existent throughout a majority of the novel.
One of the few similarities between Divergent and The Hunger Games is how strong familial bonds become either during or after the revolutions in both novels.
The bonds that are formerly considered severed in Divergent, become reinforced and stronger than ever once the revolution against Abnegation leaders begins.
This is partially because Tris's faction is brainwashed to hunt and kill the group of leaders to which Tris's father belongs, but the strengthening of their familial bonds also comes from the realization by Tris that personal choices are trivial when everybody is forced to look at the bigger picture.
Tris seems to believe that she severed all ties to her family in choosing Dauntless as her faction, but what she failed to realize, until the point of the revolution, is that no matter what personal choices a member of her family makes, she will always be her mother and father's child.
Familial bonds take precedent over all, and one of Divergent's key concepts is the process that Tris goes through to realize this.
Katniss, however, has fully grasped the idea that familial bonds take precedent over whatever trivial situations may come her way.
She easily takes her sister's place at The Reaping, knowing that the odds are not in her favor.
Even having such a strong sense of belonging and love with her family, their bonds are made that much stronger by a revolution and the idea that any member of her family could be ripped away from her in a heartbeat.
Her mother comes to a sense of "consciousness", compared to her formerly vegetative state, and begins to heal again.
Her sister even pitches in with these efforts.
It takes a revolt and the possibility of losing their families for Katniss and Tris to realize that familial bonds take precedent above all and should never be severed or lost as a result of one person's decisions.
When we look at just how much personal choice and the severing of familial bonds takes the spotlight in Divergent, we can see how personal choices affect an entire family and community; this is important because it allows the reader to see the contrast between Divergent and The Hunger Games that may not be so obvious.
The idea of a dystopian oppression came about long before The Hunger Games, and was just made more applicable to modern day life by Suzanne Collins.
Divergent is a novel based more on personal choices and preferences than it is based on a government-overthrow.
The novel prefers personal choice over familial bonds and, though that may seem heartless, it is different than what takes precedent in The Hunger Games, which are those same familial bonds.
It's as if the government oppression forces those familial bonds to become stronger, while personal choice weakens them.
These two novels prove this in their varied views on relationships versus personal choice.
Katniss has a very small span of personal choice, and this in turn allows her to strengthen her relationships back home.
Tris, on the other hand, chooses something completely out of the normal, and loses what bonds she had with her family.
On top of that, her brother added to the sense of severed bonds by choosing to be an Erudite.
When comparing the precedence that personal choice may or may not take in both novels, it is evident to see the comparison that one can make about how personal choices can wreck a home, as well as a community.






Assignment Filename =  017draft1.txt
In Suzanne Collins's The Hunger Games, certain rules of the powerful Capitol are often overlooked in District 12, such as hunting and betting; however, the annual Hunger Games represents the harsh power the Capitol possesses over Panem's inhabitants.
The male and female tributes from each district must risk their lives for sport to prove to the Capitol they are totally at their mercy.
During Katniss's individual skills session, prior to the Hunger Games, she manages to undermine the power of the gamemakers and therefore the Capitol by letting her anger control her actions and shooting at the gamemakers for their lack of interest.
Katniss's infatuation with the capitol's weapons and her pride in her shooting contrasted with her outrage against the capitol's disrespect for human life shows Katniss following the rules yet challenging the system; this is important because it reveals the complicated human nature of sacrifice for the goal of survival.
Collins uses weapons as representation of strength and control, and Katniss's excitement over the Capitol's impressive bow and arrow overrides her disapproval of the overall purpose the weapons have- to partake in the training of the Hunger Games.
In the moment, she lets her emotions control her mind much like she did dressing up for the opening ceremonies.
Using the exclamation point in, "Oh, the weapons!
(Collins 100)" seems to refer to the weapons, which are used to train for murder in the games, as toys.
However, there was also a plan set in place that Katniss would impress the gamemakers with her shooting skills, so although she realizes the inhumanity of the Hunger Games, she is willing to follow the Capitol's rules and use their weapons as practice.
Although she's in the Capitol's game and has her rights stripped of her, Katniss is wrapped up in the thought of showing off her strength in order to get ahead.
Allowing herself to become somewhat comfortable in the Capitol is vital for Katniss's overall survival in the games; this contradiction between what Katniss believes and is forced to do is brought on by the unbalance of power between the people and the capitol.
Katniss's annoyance at the gamemakers who are more interested in the roasted pig than her performance in her skills session is an example of her dissonance with the Capitol's disregard of human life.
Her reaction to their indecency sets the tone for the second half of the passage.
It's as if Katniss suddenly woke up from the spell of the weapons and impressing the gamemakers; she decided to fight for her life in another way.
Her angry and rebellious act towards the gamemakers represents far more than her disagreement with the process of the skills session and the gamemaker's rudeness towards her, it shows her true feelings towards the shallowness of the Capitol.
Katniss states she is furious by their offensive dismissal of her; showing this type of emotion towards the all powerful Capitol tells the reader that Katniss is short tempered, has rebellious tendencies, and demands attention.
This single act provides the reader with more information about Katniss on a deeper level than direct characterization could; however, these characteristics don't coincide with what the Capitol expects a tribute to be like.
Going against the Capitol's anticipations sets Katniss apart, but this could hurt her chances of survival in the games if the Capitol feels threatened.
At the peak of Katniss's anger she says "my heart starts to pound", "my face burning" and "my quiver" (Collins 101-102).
These descriptions add a sense of emotion to the passage and bring the character of Katniss to life; she is no longer following the rules set by the gamemakers and the Capitol.
Instead, she's literally fighting for her right to live.
She shot her arrow across the room and into the mouth of the dead pig that was the fascination of the gamemaker's attention.
The dramatics of this scene prove that Katniss is infuriated with the disrespect the gamemaker's have for her fight for life and the importance they place only on things that satisfy or entertain them.
The roasted pig is feeding the gamemaker's attention just like the horrible games provide amusement for the people in the Capitol and Katniss is fed-up.
There is a connection in the fact that Katniss strips the gamemakers of their meal just like the Capitol takes away the tributes' right for food in the Hunger Games.
The disbelief the gamemakers have towards Katniss's revenge towards them is hypocritical since they condone a system in which a group of citizens' human rights are taken from them in order for one to survive.
The idea of human survival coincides with what one is willing to sacrifice.
In the Hunger Games, tributes are forced to surrender their rights and their freedom to fight for their life and the eventual death of 23 others.
Although Katniss is in the Capitol coinciding with their rules and traditions, she proves in this passage she doesn't agree with the system the Capitol puts forth.
The one-dimensional and superficial viewpoint of those in charge doesn't represent the feelings of all the districts or all those who struggle to live.
Shooting her arrow at the gamemaker's table and ripping their meal from their eyes proves that Katniss is not willing to sacrifice her beliefs in order to play a game set forth by the Capitol; she goes along with preparing for the games, but she obviously continues to stick up for what she sees as right.
Katniss was willing to sacrifice her life for her sister's, but when it comes to the Capitol she's fighting with her life on the line in her own way, proving to be a fearless and extraordinary competitor, not only against the other tributes, but the Capitol as well.






Assignment Filename =  017final1.txt
In Suzanne Collins's The Hunger Games, the powerful Capitol controls all facets of Panem life in its 12 districts; however, the annual Hunger Games represents the harshest power the Capitol possesses over Panem's inhabitants- their survival.
The male and female tributes from each district must risk their lives for sport and entertainment to prove to the Capitol they are totally at their mercy to fight for their lives in a televised game of survival.
To prepare for this physical endurance, the tributes are allotted skill sessions prior to the games and then are given time to impress the gamemakers and certain advisors in the Capitol in order to receive their rankings before the games begin.
During Katniss's individual skills session, she is infatuated with the technology present for her use and finds herself lost in the moment of doing what comes most natural to her- shooting, only to see the gamemakers have moved their attention elsewhere.
Katniss's infatuation with the capitol's weapons and her pride in her shooting contrasted with the gamemakers lack of interest shows the capitol's disrespect for human life; this is important because in order to gain the attention of the Capitol and achieve what she wants Katniss must sacrifice her safety for her survival.
Collins uses weapons as representation of strength and control, and Katniss's exhilaration over the Capitol's state of the art bow and arrow overrides her disapproval of the overall purpose the weapons have- to partake in the training of the Hunger Games.
In the moment, she lets her emotions control her mind much like she did dressing up for the opening ceremonies.
Using the exclamation point in, "Oh, the weapons!
(Collins 100)" seems to refer to the weapons, which are used to train for murder in the games, as toys.
However, there was also a plan set in place that Katniss would impress the gamemakers with her shooting skills, so although she realizes the inhumanity of the Hunger Games, she is willing to follow the Capitol's rules and use their weapons as practice.
Although she's in the Capitol's game and has her rights stripped of her, Katniss is wrapped up in the thought of showing off her strength in order to get ahead.
Allowing herself to become somewhat comfortable in the Capitol is vital for Katniss's overall survival in the games; this contradiction between what Katniss believes and is forced to do is brought on by the unbalance of power between the people and the capitol.
Katniss's annoyance at the gamemakers who are more interested in the roasted pig than her performance in her skills session is an example of her dissonance with the Capitol's disregard of human life.
Her reaction to their indecency sets the tone for the second half of the passage.
It's as if Katniss suddenly woke up from the spell of the weapons and impressing the gamemakers; she decided to fight for her life in another way.
Her angry and rebellious act towards the gamemakers represents far more than her disagreement with the process of the skills session and the gamemaker's rudeness towards her, it shows her true feelings towards the shallowness of the Capitol.
Katniss states she is furious by their offensive dismissal of her; showing this type of emotion towards the all powerful Capitol tells the reader that Katniss is short tempered, has rebellious tendencies, and demands attention.
This single act provides the reader with more information about Katniss on a deeper level than direct characterization could; however, these characteristics don't coincide with what the Capitol expects a tribute to be like.
Going against the Capitol's anticipations sets Katniss apart, but this could hurt her chances of survival in the games if the Capitol feels threatened.
At the peak of Katniss's anger she says "my heart starts to pound", "my face burning" and "my quiver" (Collins 101-102).
These descriptions add a sense of urgency to the passage and bring the character of Katniss to life; she is no longer following the rules set by the gamemakers and the Capitol.
Instead, she's literally fighting for her right to live.
She shot her arrow across the room and into the mouth of the dead pig that was the fascination of the gamemaker's attention.
The dramatics of this scene prove that Katniss is infuriated with the disrespect the gamemaker's have for her fight for life and the importance they place only on things that satisfy or entertain them.
The roasted pig is feeding the gamemaker's attention just like the horrible games provide amusement for the people in the Capitol and Katniss is fed-up.
There is a connection in the fact that Katniss strips the gamemakers of their meal just like the Capitol takes away the tributes' right for food in the Hunger Games.
The disbelief the gamemakers have towards Katniss's revenge is hypocritical since they condone a system in which a group of citizens' human rights are taken from them in order for one to survive.
The idea of human survival coincides with what one is willing to sacrifice.
In the Hunger Games, tributes are forced to surrender their rights and their freedom to fight for their life and the eventual death of 23 others.
Although Katniss is in the Capitol coinciding with their rules and traditions, she proves in this passage she doesn't agree with the system the Capitol puts forth.
The one-dimensional and superficial viewpoint of those in charge doesn't represent the feelings of all the districts or all those who struggle to live.
Shooting her arrow at the gamemaker's table and ripping their meal from their eyes proves that Katniss is not willing to sacrifice her beliefs in order to play a game set forth by the Capitol; she goes along with preparing for the games, but she obviously continues to stick up for what she sees as right.
Katniss was willing to sacrifice her life for her sister's, but when it comes to the Capitol she's fighting with her life on the line in her own way, proving to be a fearless and extraordinary competitor, not only against the other tributes, but the Capitol as well.






Assignment Filename =  018draft2.txt
In Suzanne Collins's The Hunger Games' movie adaptation, a visual depiction of the novel introduces a totalitarian system in which twenty four victims from the country Panem are sacrificed for the purpose of a televised game of survival.
The visual representation of Panem's District 12 allows viewers to witness the struggles the citizens must endure, mostly brought on by the controlling government, which is located in the Capitol.
For example, the reaping scene works to form a divide between the capitol and the audience, which is clear to the viewer by things such as the camera placement, sound effects, and plot.
The innocent and anxious looks on the children in the audience's faces contrasted with Effie Trinket's eager and boisterous presence creates an intense and almost uncomfortable atmosphere during the reaping scene, this shows us an unequal regime in which even children are sacrificed at the dispense of the all-powerful Capitol; this is important because the emotions of the scene sets a cruel tone for the Capitol and an empathetic one for the tributes.
The reaping scene begins with the Capitol representative, Effie Trinket, dressed in a rosy and fashion forward outfit paired with a bold hairstyle, outlandish make up, and a ridiculously large bow on her head, on stage speaking to the dreary and washed out audience.
The camera spans across the audience several times, focusing only on Katniss and Gale once.
This focus on individual faces in the audience of potential victims creates an emotional bond between them and the viewer, as there is an anxious atmosphere concerning who will be chosen as the tributes.
The drastic physical contrast between Effie and the audience is what begins to represent the divide between the Capitol and the districts.
Effie has extensive make up and perfectly curled hair, while the children are dressed very modestly as if they were from a past generation and definitely from a different social class than Effie.
The cheery tone in her voice compared with the apprehensive and uneasy faces staring back at her builds sympathy for the audience as they are seen as the victims even before a name has been called.
The viewer empathizes with the audience because, like them, the movie watcher is just a witness to the reaping- neither has control over what is to come.
The sound effects during the reaping scene also build tension between the audience and the Capitol.
As Effie is welcoming everyone to the reaping, the pride and strength in her voice is the only thing heard.
Then as she makes her way over to the glass to choose the name of the first tribute, her footsteps and her cough to clear her throat build anticipation for the announcement of the tributes.
As she moves her hand around the glass, the audience is silent, and she swishes a paper out.
Her footsteps are again the only thing heard as she walks back to the microphone and fumbles to uncrumble the slip of paper.
All of these sound effects intensify the scene because the audience is waiting patiently and anxiously for the first name to be called, while Effie takes her time and doesn't seem to realize the heaviness of the situation.
The cheerfulness in her voice proves her and the Capitol's views differ from those of District 12's because she doesn't comprehend that the Hunger Games are seen as a death sentence for them.
The viewer can see the look of fear on the audience's faces coupled with the amusement Effie Trinket has during the reaping and chooses to side with the innocent bystanders.
When Primrose's name is called, the camera moves around the crowd and their worn down faces; although no one makes a sound, their eyes tell a story of compassion that a twelve year old is chosen.
The camera focuses only on Katniss and Prim's faces, showing disbelief on both.
The crowd allowing Prim a path to pass through shows empathy and respect for the tribute.
However, the emotional appeal is highest when Prim tucks her shirt back into her skirt, because it reminds the viewer that this is a child that is being sent to her death, one that isn't even used to fending for herself.
Heightening the emotions of the scene, Katniss makes her way through the crowd and once she sees Prim, cries out that she volunteers herself as tribute.
Replacing her sister as tribute is basically seen as suicide for Katniss, but this surge of emotion is the climax of the scene as Prim is so upset she must be carried away by Gale.
This system of support is automatically understood by the viewer because the love Katniss has for her sister runs so deep she is willing to risk her life for her.
Combining the genuine and frightened screams from Prim as she is carried away with the calm and collected response of Effie deepens the contrast between the government and those living under their rules and regulations.
As Katniss walks towards the stage, obviously scared and vulnerable, the greatest difference between the district and the Capitol is presented.
Effie Trinket sees having a volunteer as an exciting turn of events and continues to put on a show for the cameras; however, instead of clapping, the audience signals a sign of respect towards Katniss for her sacrifice.
Continuing the reaping with no sign of any deep emotion displays the Capitol's disrespect for human life and their concentration on just providing a show.
As the audience appears traumatized, especially Prim and her mother, Effie ignores this and proceeds to call the name of the male tribute, Peeta Mellark, who proceeds to the stage in shock and with his emotions written all over his face.
Instead of acknowledging the feelings of the tributes as they are scared to death, Effie genuinely seems excited for the games to begin.
The conclusion of the reaping scene leaves the viewer to await the beginning of the games, frightened for the tributes and appalled by the decisions of the Capitol.
The emotion presented in the reaping scene in the form of sounds, expressions, and actions heightens the drama and suspense for the viewer; however, the difference of emotions between the Capitol's representatives and the audience of district 12 is vastly different.
This suggests the differing mindsets of those in power and those without power.
The children at risk during the reaping and the chosen tributes have no control over their future and are scared to death, while Effie is excited for the games to begin.
This imbalance of power and equality presented during the reaping validate the idea that the totalitarian government is cruel to their people based on their lack of understanding their point of view and emotions.






Assignment Filename =  018final2.txt
In the movie adaptation of Suzanne Collins's The Hunger Games, a visual depiction of the novel introduces a totalitarian system in which twenty four children from the country Panem are sacrificed for the purpose of a televised game of survival.
The visual representation of Panem's District 12 allows viewers to witness the struggles the citizens must endure with no help, only hindrance, from the government, which is located in the Capitol.
The first introduction of the Capitol in the film is during the Reaping scene, which is where a male and female tribute is each chosen from District 12 to partake in the annual Hunger Games.
This is a very somber scene, filled with emotion and tension from the district, but this silence is interrupted by the representative from the Capitol, Effie Trinket, whose job it is to announce the tributes.
By looking at the innocent and anxious looks on the children in the audience's faces contrasted with Effie's eager and boisterous presence during the reaping scene, we can see that Collins chose to have a ridiculous character be a stand in for the Capitol in carrying out the job of leading the reaping; this is important because it creates a comedic tone by a character that should bear significance in the government which hints at the cracks in the oppressive regime.
The reaping scene begins with the Capitol representative, Effie Trinket, dressed in a rosy and fashion forward outfit paired with a bold hairstyle, outlandish make up, and a ridiculously large bow on her head, on stage speaking to the dreary and washed out audience.
The camera spans across the audience several times, focusing only on Katniss and Gale once.
This focus on individual faces in the audience of potential victims creates an emotional bond between them and the viewer, as there is an anxious atmosphere concerning who will be chosen as the tributes.
The drastic physical contrast between Effie and the audience is what begins to represent the divide between the Capitol and the districts.
Effie has extensive make up and perfectly curled hair, while the children are dressed very modestly as if they were from a past generation and definitely from a different social class than Effie.
The cheery tone in her voice compared with the apprehensive and uneasy faces staring back at her builds sympathy for the audience as they are seen as the victims even before a name has been called.
The viewer empathizes with the audience because, like them, the movie watcher is just a witness to the reaping- neither has control over what is to come.
The sound effects during the reaping scene also build tension between the audience and the Capitol.
As Effie is welcoming everyone to the reaping, the pride and strength in her voice is the only thing heard.
Then as she makes her way over to the glass to choose the name of the first tribute, her footsteps and her cough to clear her throat build anticipation for the announcement of the tributes.
As she moves her hand around the glass, the audience is silent, and she swishes a paper out.
Her footsteps are again the only thing heard as she walks back to the microphone and fumbles to uncrumble the slip of paper.
All of these sound effects intensify the scene because the audience is waiting patiently and anxiously for the first name to be called, while Effie takes her time and doesn't seem to realize the heaviness of the situation.
The cheerfulness in her voice proves her and the Capitol's views differ from those of District 12's because she doesn't comprehend that the Hunger Games are seen as a death sentence for them.
The viewer can see the look of fear on the audience's faces coupled with the amusement Effie Trinket has during the reaping and chooses to side with the innocent bystanders.
When Primrose's name is called, the camera moves around the crowd and their worn down faces; although no one makes a sound, their eyes tell a story of compassion that a twelve year old is chosen.
The camera focuses only on Katniss and Prim's faces, showing disbelief on both.
The crowd, allowing Prim a path to pass through, shows empathy and respect for the tribute.
However, the emotional appeal is highest when Prim tucks her shirt back into her skirt, because it reminds the viewer that this is a child that is being sent to her death, one that isn't even used to fending for herself.
Heightening the emotions of the scene, Katniss makes her way through the crowd and once she sees Prim, cries out that she volunteers herself as tribute.
Replacing her sister as tribute is basically seen as suicide for Katniss, but this surge of emotion is the climax of the scene as Prim is so upset she must be carried away by Gale.
This system of support is automatically understood by the viewer because the love Katniss has for her sister runs so deep she is willing to risk her life for her.
Combining the genuine and frightened screams from Prim as she is carried away with the calm and collected response of Effie deepens the contrast between the government and those living under their rules and regulations.
Bringing Effie's involvement into this emotion filled scene seems to bring an air of ridiculousness that doesn't belong in the somber event, or to the controlling government, which first introduces the idea that the Capitol breeds shallow people.
As Katniss walks towards the stage, obviously scared and vulnerable, the greatest difference between the district and the Capitol is presented.
Effie Trinket sees having a volunteer as an exciting turn of events and continues to put on a show for the cameras; however, instead of clapping, the audience signals a sign of respect towards Katniss for her sacrifice.
Continuing the reaping with no sign of any deep emotion displays the Capitol's disrespect for human life and their concentration on just providing a show.
As the audience appears traumatized, especially Prim and her mother, Effie ignores this and proceeds to call the name of the male tribute, Peeta Mellark, who proceeds to the stage in shock and with his emotions written all over his face.
Instead of acknowledging the feelings of the tributes as they are scared to death, Effie genuinely seems excited for the games to begin.
The conclusion of the reaping scene leaves the viewer to await the beginning of the games, frightened for the tributes and appalled by the decisions of the Capitol.
The emotion presented in the reaping scene in the form of sounds, expressions, and actions heightens the drama and suspense for the viewer; however, the difference of emotions between the Capitol's representative and the audience of district 12 is extremely apparent.
This suggests the differing mindsets of those in power, those without power, and those brainwashed by power.
The children at risk during the reaping and the chosen tributes have no control over their future and are scared to death for the Hunger Games that the Capitol is forcing them to play, while Capitol-bred Effie is genuinely excited for the games to begin and oblivious to the intense tension in the scene.
The imbalance of power between district and Capitol is worrying, not only because Katniss and Peeta, as tributes from District 12, have almost no chance of survival, but also because the manipulative government in the Capitol raises a race of people that cannot see the terrible truth that surrounds them, represented by Effie.
Although this sort of character creates a comedic relief in the novel and movie, I think Collins is making it apparent that it is not always in humanity's best interest to do as we're told and remain within the status-quo, but instead be the voice that stands up for what they believe in.






Assignment Filename =  019draft3.txt
In Susanne Collins's Catching Fire, a new Head Peacekeeper is sent by the Capitol to oversee District 12 and enforce the strict laws the Capitol has set in order to maintain control over the district the Huger Games victor, Katniss Everdeen, resides.
This puts the actions of Katniss and those around her under a microscope by the all-controlling Capitol in order to cease any more threat of rebellion in Panem.
Consequently, Katniss' best friend Gale Hawthorne falls victim to the new, stricter regime in their district when he was caught trying to sell a wild turkey he illegally shot; his penalty is public punishment in the town square by whipping.
The historic act of whipping as used in District 12 contrasted with the ability the advanced Capitol actually has for holding a trial for one of its citizens symbolizes the imbalance of power and respect between the districts of Panem and the Capitol; this is important because it depicts that a government should be leading its people to prosperity, not weakening them to fall victim to their power as the roles of victim and culprit are reversed in this form of corporal punishment.
This history of corporal punishment has been around since ancient civilizations, but its recorded history goes from the Middle Ages until the 1800-1900s.
The act of whipping was in response to "minor crimes and unlawful acts" where "a person is whipped with a rod or whip" ("Buzzle").
Similarly, Gale's sentence was given to him for shooting a wild turkey in the woods, which is illegal yet largely ignored in District 12 until this scene.
The new Head Peacekeeper exercises his power over the people of District 12 by creating an example of Gale.
In a very public event, the district gathered in the main square to witness Gale's punishment.
As he was help up by his wrists, everyone watched as the whip repeatedly lashed him across his back.
Although, legally, Gale was in the wrong by bringing the illicitly hunted turkey into the market, his punishment exceeded that of proving a point; the Capitol and its workers went above and beyond to show everyone not to question their power and limits, which especially scared District 12 out of any thoughts of rebellion.
This type of authoritative influence creates victims of the citizens emotional and physically affected by this control.
This scene creates an emotional appeal of those involved in the scene and the reader.
The people of the square hissed at Katniss to leave because they were scared for Gale's safety if her involvement came to play.
The emotions of those watching include scared, panicked and pity for the corporal punishment they are forced to gather and observe.
Allowing others to view this type of physical reprimand creates a victim out of the person who did the wrongdoing in the first place, yet no one can help but watch what he is enduring.
It isn't until Katniss cries from the audience and throws herself "directly between the whip and Gale" that his pain can be put to a halt (Collins 106).
Inflicting physical pain on an individual before a crowd breaks down the person not only physically, but also emotionally.
He goes from breaking the law to becoming the victim of his punishment as he is bared to the crowd as helpless and weak.
The crowd in turn is scared for his wellbeing, but also too feared by the event to say anything against the abuse of power the government is portraying.
This scene perfectly represents the extent of authority the Capitol has against the people when one Peacekeeper is controlling the emotions of a crowds of people; this definitely creates a greater distinction between the two parties.
The most obvious result of corporal punishment is the physical effect it leaves on the person enduring this trauma.
Since whipping is seen in today's world as an ancient punishment, it is extreme that in the futuristic setting of The Hunger Games series, the powerful government would bring it back.
Because of the awful physical effects on the body from this punishment, the Capitol only gains strength by using whipping.
Gale "slumps unconscious on his knees" held by his wrists with his back described as "a raw, bloody slab of meat".
As Katniss throws herself to cover Gale's body she notices "Gale's blood, the air heavy with its scent" (Collins).
As the picture of the scene is created in the reader's mind, the whipping comes to life and brings a new light to this punishment.
As the lashes of the whip broke down Gale physically he eventually passes out, yet is continued to be punished; this creates an atmosphere of indecency as a once strong man loses all his strength to the one person in charge at the scene.
Gale inadvertently becomes the martyr for breaking the law with the new Peacekeeper in charge.
The setting of The Hunger Games trilogy is in the country of Panem, hundreds of years after the demise of what was once known as North America; yet instead of being a modern and revolutionary nation, the districts of Panem revert back to what seem to be medieval times, while the Capitol thrives financially and socially.
During the colonial period of the United States, whipping was a punishment well into the 1900s for crimes including "forgery, counterfeiting, Sabbath breaking, blasphemy, witchcraft" and other offences (Window on Cecil County's Past).
Cecil County, Maryland was one of the last in colonial times to get away with whipping as a corporal punishment; only in 1882 did they specify only wife beaters could be whipped and in 1940 they gave their last punishment of ten whippings to a carpenter who beat his wife (Window on Cecil County's Past).
As one of the last places to allow this practice in the United States, it is strange that in a novel set hundreds of years from this time period would bring it back; this shows the reader that this new country has its own flaws and is reverting back to primalistic ways of physically controlling its people.
The physical torture of whipping as a type of corporal punishment is first illustrated in Catching Fire by the new Head Peacekeeper against Gale for poaching.
Exerting his control over the district provided by the Capitol, the new Peacekeeper breaks Gale down emotionally and physically in a public event; however this is an abuse of power on the side of the government.
Although this kind of punishment has been mentioned in the series of novels, this is the first time it is witnessed by Katniss which makes it a turning point in the plot.
Even though this scares the people in the district from rebelling against the powerful figures in charge of them, it only fuels the hate that Katniss has for the Capitol.
In an emotionally and physically extreme scene, another power struggle between the people and the government is seen.
Weakening the citizens by exposing this historic form of punishment actually presents the Capitol as the suppressers and as the party in the wrong, which eventually overturn s the role of who is the convict in the situation to who s the victim.






Assignment Filename =  019final3.txt
In Susanne Collins's Catching Fire, a new Head Peacekeeper is sent to oversee District 12 and enforce the authoritarian laws the Capitol has set in order to maintain control over the district the Huger Games victor, Katniss Everdeen, resides.
This puts the actions of Katniss and those around her under a microscope by the all-controlling Capitol in order to cease any more threat of rebellion in Panem; this is not a coincidence considering President Snow has made it apparent he is keeping an eye on his new victor whose actions seem to be making a defiant impact on the rest of the nation.
The first to fall victim to the new, stricter regime in District 12 is Katniss' best friend Gale Hawthorne when he is caught selling an illegally shot turkey in the town square.
The bloodthirsty new Head Peacekeeper, Thread, issued Gale over 40 lashes as part of a public punishment which creates a sense of vulnerability and helplessness for the strong and masculine Gale.
By looking at the historic act of whipping used in District 12 against citizens by those in power contrasted with the technologically and socially advanced Capitol, we can see the oppressor gains the upper hand in this form of punishment by instilling fear in the perpetrator; this is important because it not only depicts the use of ancient chastisement in a supposedly progressive society but also the infantilizing of the victim in a parent-child dynamic.
This history of corporal punishment has been around since ancient civilizations, but its recorded history goes from the Middle Ages until the 1800-1900s.
The act of whipping was in response to "minor crimes and unlawful acts" where "a person is whipped with a rod or whip" ("Buzzle").
Similarly, Gale's sentence was given to him for shooting a wild turkey in the woods, which is illegal yet largely ignored in District 12 until this scene.
The new Head Peacekeeper exercises his power over the people of District 12 by creating an example of Gale.
In a very public event, the district gathered in the main square to witness Gale's punishment.
As he was help up by his wrists, everyone watched as the whip repeatedly lashed him across his back.
Although, legally, Gale was in the wrong by bringing the illicitly hunted turkey into the market, his punishment exceeded that of proving a point; the Capitol and its workers went above and beyond to show everyone not to question their power and limits, which especially scared District 12 out of any thoughts of rebellion.
This type of authoritative influence creates victims of the citizens emotional and physically affected by this control, weakening them to a submissive state.
This scene creates an emotional appeal of those involved in the scene and the reader.
The people of the square hissed at Katniss to leave because they were scared for Gale's safety if her involvement came to play.
The emotions of those watching include scared, panicked and pity for the corporal punishment they are forced to gather and observe.
Allowing others to view this type of physical reprimand creates a victim out of the person who did the wrongdoing in the first place, yet no one can help but watch what he is enduring.
It isn't until Katniss cries from the audience and throws herself "directly between the whip and Gale" that his pain can be put to a halt (Collins 106).
Inflicting physical pain on an individual before a crowd breaks down the person not only physically, but also emotionally.
He goes from breaking the law to becoming the victim of his punishment as he is bared to the crowd as helpless and weak.
The crowd in turn is scared for his wellbeing, but also too scared by the event to say anything against the abuse of power the government is portraying.
This scene perfectly represents the extent of authority the Capitol has against the people when one Peacekeeper is controlling the emotions of a crowds of people; this definitely creates a greater distinction between the two parties.
The most obvious result of corporal punishment is the physical effect it leaves on the person enduring this trauma.
Since whipping is seen in today's world as an ancient punishment, it is extreme that in the futuristic setting of The Hunger Games series, the powerful government would bring it back.
Because of the awful physical effects on the body from this punishment, the Capitol only gains strength by using whipping because the other party is too weak to fight back.
Gale "slumps unconscious on his knees" held by his wrists with his back described as "a raw, bloody slab of meat".
As Katniss throws herself to cover Gale's body she notices "Gale's blood, the air heavy with its scent" (Collins 106).
As the picture of the scene is created in the reader's mind, the whipping comes to life and brings a new light to this punishment.
As the lashes of the whip broke down Gale physically he eventually passes out, yet is continued to be punished; this creates an atmosphere of indecency as a once strong man loses all his strength to the one person in charge at the scene.
By losing all his power in this one scene Gale's status regresses to that of a helpless infant who has no chance of defending himself.
The setting of The Hunger Games trilogy is in the country of Panem, hundreds of years after the demise of what was once known as North America; yet instead of being a modern and revolutionary nation, the districts of Panem revert back to what seem to be medieval times, while the Capitol thrives financially and socially.
During the colonial period of the United States, whipping was a punishment well into the 1900s for crimes including "forgery, counterfeiting, Sabbath breaking, blasphemy, witchcraft" and other offences (Window on Cecil County's Past).
Cecil County, Maryland was one of the last in colonial times to get away with whipping as a corporal punishment; only in 1882 did they specify only wife beaters could be whipped and in 1940 they gave their last punishment of ten whippings to a carpenter who beat his wife (Window on Cecil County's Past).
As one of the last places to allow this practice in the United States, it is strange that in a novel set hundreds of years from this time period would bring it back; this shows the reader that this new country has its own flaws and is reverting back to primalistic ways of physically controlling its people.
Weakening citizens by this historic form of punishment actually presents the Capitol as the suppressers and as the party in the wrong, which eventually overturns the role of who is the convict in the situation to who is the victim.
Regressing back to this punishment represents a dynamic in which one side bears all the power and one is completely vulnerable.
This is the perfect punishment for the oppressor to use because it makes it impossible for the other to fight back, much like that of a child; the victim is forced to lie and take his punishment.
However, no one can stay an infant forever; eventually everyone grows and learns from experiences, either obediently or rebelliously.
As Collins represents by the tyrannical Capitol breaking down Gale and the eventual growing uprising in the country of Panem, we can see that she believes society can grow out from under an oppressive state and has the chance to change what was done to them, much like a child must grow up to face their parent.






Assignment Filename =  020draft4.txt
When looking at Veronica Roth's Divergent as a retelling of Suzanne Collins' Hunger Games series, the dystopian, futuristic Chicago which breeds a society that splits its people into five factions based on personality characteristics is much like the post-apocalyptic setting of the country Panem which is divided into 13 districts and a Capitol each with their own set of skills and jobs.
Even Roth's female heroine Beatrice Prior shares many characteristics with Collins' protagonist Katniss Everdeen- both sixteen year olds living in a world in which they do not belong or wish to change, meeting a love interest along the way, and using their strength, intelligence and natural abilities to get ahead of the game to fight for their survival.
Both of these characters challenge the system around them, either curiously or defiantly, demanding the attention of those in power; however this is where a major difference in the novels takes place: the leader of the power greedy Erudite faction is Jeanine Matthews while Panem's cruel and authoritative president is Coriolanus Snow, one leader female and one male.
When looking at the interactions of Roth's protagonist Beatrice and antagonist Jeanine and Collins' Katniss and President Snow, we can see a deceiving, manipulative relationship between the female in power and the divergent female contrasted with a, although evil, honest relationship between the male in power and the female victor; this is important because these relationships depict a 21st century outlook on the differences in the dynamic of female-female and male-female relationships.
The first time President Snow and Katniss sit face to face is in the beginning of Collins' Catching Fire, after Katniss wins the 74th annual Hunger Games; this is a tradition in Panem to remind its citizens that all power lies in the hands of the Capitol by forcing 24 tributes from the 12 districts to have a fight to the death televised competition in which only one victor is granted the prize of living as a hint of hope given to them by the Capitol.
In a turn of events, Katniss influenced the gamemakers in a moment of intense emotion into allowing there to be two victors, a decision President Snow had not approved and strongly disagreed with.
The tension in their meeting is obvious as Katniss "outsmarted his sadistic Hunger Games, made the Capitol look foolish, and consequently undermined his control (Collins 18)".
In an attempt to cease the beginnings of uprisings in several districts as a result of Hunger Games, President Snow travels to Katniss's home in Victor Village to let her know her options: convince the people of the nation her undying love of Peeta made her act irrationally in the games or face the execution of her friends and family.
Although President Snow rules with an iron fist, manipulating the districts and executing those who act against him, his only redeeming quality in this scene is his honesty.
Upon seeing Katniss he states "I think we'll make this whole situation a lot simpler by agreeing not to lie to each other.
What do you think?
(Collins 19)".
It is shocking that the man who rules thousands of people in an authoritatively inhumane style can identify the influence one teenage girl has on others and speaks to her in a way that he acknowledges her intelligence and abilities.
He makes it clear that her actions will have the ability to prevent uprisings, and as she is the "girl who was on fire" who sparked rebellion in Panem he cannot just execute her because it would "add fuel to the flames (Collins 23)".
In recognizing the effect and abilities Katniss has, it is actually very smart of President Snow to speak with her honestly in order to get his point, and threat, across to her; this leaves Katniss with only one choice- obey the president to save the people she loves and the people she actually fights for.
In a of a similar scene of the meeting of the one in power with the one who challenges the system, Beatrice Prior and Jeanine Matthews in Roth's Divergent find themselves at odds.
When Beatrice leaves the Dauntless compound to visit her brother in Erudite, their leader Jeanine sees this as her chance to test the concerns she senses in Beatrice's behavior that hint at her divergent aptitude results.
In the world Beatrice lives in, it is very dangerous to receive results like hers on the aptitude testing day- inconclusive; she doesn't belong to one faction, rather several.
And as the Erudite faction is growing from their curiosity for knowledge to their thirst for power, their leader is the one who developed the simulations which determine the test results which she describes as her "greatest achievement as a scientist (Roth 356)" so she takes a special interest in why Beatrice's results were never recorded.
During the conversation between Beatrice and Jeanine, both try to manipulate the other; Beatrice lied in order to protect her identity at all costs and Jeanine hid her real motives in investigating Beatrice by questioning the aptitude results and her presence on the Erudite compound.
Since the book is written in first person in Beatrice's view, we can see that from one side of this female-female dynamic she can sense she is being lied to.
When Jeanine claims she is worried about Beatrice's results because she wants to make sure the technology is working correctly Beatrice thinks "she is lying to me.
She doesn't care about the technology- she suspects that something is awry with my test results (Roth 358).
" By the looks Jeanine is giving Beatrice, it seems that she can tell something is  skewed with the girl sitting across from her, yet unlike President Snow she doesn't outright express her concerns, instead manipulating the conversation until Beatrice must agree with what the Erudite report which she knows to be false; however, the fault in this leadership method is while Jeanine seems to have won the battle at hand, she has not confirmed Beatrice's divergence and does not scare her enough to actually do anything she wants.
It is interesting to compare these two scenes, since they have so many similarities yet they turn to two opposite directions- one brutally honest and one conniving to the end.
In the male-female dynamic, Snow presented to Katniss in the beginning he wishes for only the truth from her and in turn he will never lie to her and this promise follows them to the end of the Hunger Games series.
In the female-female dynamic, Beatrice and Jeanine both lie to one another in order to out-manipulate the other; this eventually leads to their betrayal of each other shortly in the novel.
In a study done it was found that "women seem more transparent in exhibiting feelings about their messages whether being truthful or deceptive ("University of Miami Scholarly Repository")" which would explain why Beatrice was able to tell Jeanine was deceiving her, yet she lied as well, but it is not known for sure if the Erudite leader was onto her.
The argument to be made here is not that one sex is more deceiving than the other, but rather the interaction between sexes leads to deceit.
This does not necessarily mean that one sex is more apt to lead than the other, but it represents that the relationships between the female gender are more willing to manipulate each other in this day and age.
Analyzing the relationships and interactions between these duos shows the reader two completely different routes that the leadership fighting against rebellion can take.
On one hand, Snow presents his case with honesty, and although the eventual overturn of his reign does take place, Katniss follows through on their promise of honesty and rejects his replacement as well.
In the other case, Beatrice lies and manipulates Jeanine's system which quickly leads to the fallout between the two and the rebellion takes places in the first novel of the Divergent trilogy while in Hunger Games it was the third.
While it is a stretch to say, in a twisted way Katniss and Snow develop a slight father-daughter role while Beatrice and Jeanine defy each other like teenage girls do.
In order for the effectiveness of leadership to take place, it isn't a question of whether men or women are better, but rather that "a better balance between assertiveness and receptivity (Wiliams)" is achieved by who is in power.






Assignment Filename =  020final4.txt
When looking at Veronica Roth's Divergent as a retelling of Suzanne Collins' Hunger Games series, the dystopian, futuristic Chicago which breeds a society that splits its people into five factions based on personality characteristics is much like the post-apocalyptic setting of the country Panem which is divided into 13 districts and a Capitol each with their own set of skills and jobs.
Even Roth's female heroine Beatrice Prior shares many characteristics with Collins' protagonist Katniss Everdeen- both sixteen year olds living in a world in which they do not belong or wish to change, meeting a love interest along the way, and using their strength, intelligence and natural abilities to get ahead of the game to fight for their survival.
Both of these characters challenge the system around them, either curiously or defiantly, demanding the attention of those in power; however this is where a major difference in the novels takes place: the leader of the power greedy Erudite faction is Jeanine Matthews while Panem's cruel and authoritative president is Coriolanus Snow, one leader female and one male.
When looking at the interactions of Roth's protagonist Beatrice and antagonist Jeanine and Collins' Katniss and President Snow, we can see a deceiving, manipulative relationship between the female in power and the divergent female contrasted with a, although evil, honest relationship between the male in power and the female victor; this is important because these relationships depict a 21st century outlook on the differences in the dynamic of female-female and male-female relationships.
The first time President Snow and Katniss sit face to face is in the beginning of Collins' novel, Catching Fire, after Katniss wins the 74th annual Hunger Games.
The Hunger Games are a tradition in Panem to remind its citizens that all power lies in the hands of the Capitol by forcing 24 tributes from the 12 districts to have a fight to the death televised competition in which only one victor is granted the prize of living which serves as a hint of hope given to the districts by the Capitol.
In a turn of events, Katniss influenced the gamemakers in a moment of intense emotion into allowing there to be two victors, a decision President Snow had not approved and strongly disagreed with.
The tension in their meeting is obvious as Katniss "outsmarted his sadistic Hunger Games, made the Capitol look foolish, and consequently undermined his control (Collins 18)".
In an attempt to cease the beginnings of uprisings in several districts as a result of Hunger Games, President Snow travels to Katniss's home in Victor Village to let her know her options: convince the people of the nation her undying love of Peeta made her act irrationally in the games or face the execution of her friends and family.
Although President Snow rules with an iron fist, manipulating the districts and executing those who act against him, his only redeeming quality in this scene is his honesty.
Upon seeing Katniss he states "I think we'll make this whole situation a lot simpler by agreeing not to lie to each other.
What do you think?
(Collins 19)".
The man who rules in an authoritatively inhumane style identifies the influence one teenage girl has on others and acknowledges her intelligence and abilities, which he demonstrates while conversing with her.
He makes it clear that her actions will have the ability to prevent uprisings, and as she is the "girl who was on fire" who sparked rebellion in Panem he cannot just execute her because it would "add fuel to the flames (Collins 23)".
In recognizing the effect and abilities Katniss has, it is actually very smart of President Snow to speak with her honestly in order to get his threatening point across to her.
This leaves Katniss with only one choice- obey the president to save the people she loves and the people she actually fights for.
In a similar scene of the meeting of the one in power with the one who challenges the system, Beatrice Prior and Jeanine Matthews in Roth's Divergent find themselves at odds.
When Beatrice leaves the Dauntless compound to visit her brother in Erudite, their leader Jeanine sees this as her chance to test the concerns she senses in Beatrice's behavior that hint at her divergent aptitude results.
In the world Beatrice lives in, it is very dangerous to receive divergent results through the aptitude test.
Those who receive divergent results, such as Beatrice, do not predominantly fit the characteristics of a single faction, rather the divergent display characteristics of multiple factions equally.
The Erudite faction, who are traditionally curious for knowledge, are becoming power thirsty.
Their leader developed the simulations which determine the test results which she describes as her "greatest achievement as a scientist (Roth 356)" which leads her to take a special interest in why Beatrice's results were manually recorded.
During the conversation between Beatrice and Jeanine, both try to manipulate the other; Beatrice lied in order to protect her identity at all costs and Jeanine hid her real motives in investigating Beatrice by questioning the aptitude results and her presence on the Erudite compound.
Since the book is written in first person in Beatrice's view, we can see that from one side of this female-female dynamic she can sense she is being lied to.
When Jeanine claims she is worried about Beatrice's results because she wants to make sure the technology is working correctly Beatrice thinks "she is lying to me.
She doesn't care about the technology- she suspects that something is awry with my test results (Roth 358).
" By the looks Jeanine is giving Beatrice, it seems that she can tell something is skewed with the girl sitting across from her, yet unlike President Snow she doesn't outright express her concerns.
Jeanine manipulates the conversation until Beatrice must agree with what the Erudite report which she knows to be false.
The fault in this leadership method is while Jeanine seems to have won the battle at hand, she has not confirmed Beatrice's divergence and does not scare her enough to actually do anything she wants.
It is interesting to compare these two scenes, since they have so many similarities yet they turn to two opposite directions- one brutally honest and one conniving to the end.
In the male-female dynamic, Snow presented to Katniss in the beginning he wishes for only the truth from her and in turn he will never lie to her and this promise follows them to the end of the Hunger Games series.
In the female-female dynamic, Beatrice and Jeanine both lie to one another in order to out-manipulate the other; this eventually leads to their betrayal of each other shortly in the novel.
In a study it was found that "women seem more transparent in exhibiting feelings about their messages whether being truthful or deceptive ("University of Miami Scholarly Repository")" which would explain why Beatrice was able to tell Jeanine was deceiving her, yet she lied as well.
However, it is not known for sure if the Erudite leader was onto her.
The relationship between Beatrice and Jeanine in contrast to that of Katniss and Snow demonstrates that females are more willing to be deceitful in order to accomplish their own personal goals.
Analyzing the relationships and interactions between these duos shows the reader two completely different routes that the leadership fighting against rebellion can take.
In one case, Snow presents his case with honesty, and although the eventual overturn of his reign does take place, Katniss follows through on their promise of honesty and rejects his replacement as well.
In the other case, Beatrice lies and causes Jeanine to fail to extract information about Beatrice's divergence.
With neither Beatrice nor Jeanine willing to cooperate with each other, it creates a paradigm of distrust, deceit and power lust which ultimately leads to the attack of the Abnegation faction by the Erudite faction.
Rebellion takes places in the first novel of the Divergent trilogy while in Hunger Games it was the third which demonstrates that Snow's tactic of honesty was more effective.
While it is a stretch to say, in a twisted way Katniss and Snow develop a slight father-daughter role while Beatrice and Jeanine defy each other like teenage girls do.
In order for the effectiveness of leadership to take place, it isn't a question of whether men or women are better, but rather that "a better balance between assertiveness and receptivity (Wiliams)" is achieved by who is in power.








Assignment Filename =  021draft1.txt
As showcased by The Hunger Games, contradictions appear to be a staple of Suzanne Collins' writing.
The plot of the novel is a paradox in itself: a gruesome death match between starving children provides "tasteful" entertainment for the wealthy citizens of The Capitol.
Looking deeper into the text, the contrasts between what can be expected and what transpires reveal themselves often, specifically during Katniss Everdeen's interview with Caesar Flickerman.
On pages 128-129 ("As the audience oohs and ahs  a subtle thumbs up"), a plethora of contrasts between characters and ideas are exposed.
By looking at the interactions between Katniss, the Gamemakers, Cinna, and Caesar, we can see the lies and deception that ensure the success in the Capitol's celebration of the Hunger Games.
This is important because the theme of appearance versus reality is echoed as a major motif throughout the novel.
In her pre-Hunger Games interview with Caesar Flickerman, Katniss reveals a side of herself that she never has shown to anyone, not even herself.
This may lie in the fact that during her dialogue with Caesar, she isn't being completely genuine.
She realizes that she has a game to win; and she can't win unless she plays.
In order to gain an advantage over her fellow tributes, she must impress the general public of the Capitol.
After she charms the audience by twirling around the stage in her fiery dress, she starts giggling, which she claimed she had done "never in my lifetime" (128).
The real Katniss Everdeen does not giggle, but she has to make sponsors fall in love and is willing to be whoever they want her to be.
Residents of the Capitol would not believe that the playful girl making jokes with Caesar Flickerman is the headstrong and somewhat cold Katniss the reader has come to know.
She continues to deceive the crowd with her newfound bubbly personality by bantering light-heartedly with Caesar throughout the rest of her interview.
Katniss is not the only one who is not being completely honest during this scene of the novel.
The Gamemakers must also take part in the fraudulence that is the Hunger Games.
When Caesar comments on Katniss' training score of eleven, the cameras find them in the crowd "chuckling and nodding" along with Katniss like they're old friends (128).
The reader knows that Katniss angered many of the Gamemakers during her training session with her radical display.
But, to keep the residents of the Capitol at peace about the Tributes' inevitable slaughter, the Gamemakers keep up the illusion of an amiable relationship between them.
It makes it easy to forget that they are the ones plotting the most exciting way for Katniss and the other Tributes to die.
Caesar Flickerman sustains the charade more than anyone else in this passage.
As the Capitol spectators select their favorites and become attached to the Tributes, it is Caesar's duty to assure their safety.
The façade of the Games relies on Flickerman's radiating positivity that could make one believe that all of the kids will return home.
Collins obviously chose her words very carefully when writing Caesar's role as somewhat of a guardian to the tributes.
When Katniss nearly falls off the stage after twirling around in her dress, "Caesar wraps a protective arm" around her (128).
The use of the word "protective" is ironic because he can't really protect Katniss from the atrocity that awaits her in the arena.
This idea is repeated when Caesar reassures the crowd, "She's safe with me" (128).
In reality, Katniss will never really be safe again.
The only refuge Katniss finds after arriving at the Capitol lies in the arms of Cinna, her assigned stylist and temporary security blanket.
Even though Katniss was introduced as naturally cynical, she recognizes from the start that she can trust Cinna and does wholeheartedly.
Throughout her interview, Katniss looks to him for support and encouragement.
While showing off her dress, Cinna makes "the tiniest circular motion with his finger" that signals Katniss to twirl for the crowd (128).
She flawlessly executes his instructions, and the audience reaction is enough to know Cinna is acting in her best interest.
Katniss' newfound faith in others is inconsistent with the idea that she has become more independent while preparing for the Games.
From the reader's perspective, she actually appears to be more vulnerable and in need of the comfort that Cinna offers her.
When Caesar implores about Prim, Katniss is petrified and focuses on Cinna again.
He's the only one in the Capitol she would actually want to share her love of Prim with and he knows this, as shown by the deepest sympathy on his face.
Even at the end of her interview, she looks to Cinna for reassurance and he gives her a subtle thumbs up (129).
The confidence that Katniss finds in herself when she looks to Cinna gives the audience a picture of a strong tribute, even though she has never been more nervous in her life.
The Hunger Games provides an example of extreme propaganda.
Even though most of the outlying Districts don't buy it, the people of the Capitol look past how barbaric the Games are and only see harmless entertainment.
The producers of the Hunger Games do a fantastic job at masking the massive heartbreak that accompanies the brutal death of with each individual Tribute.
To Capitol viewers, it is just a game and these kids aren't real.
The dehumanization of the Tributes when they enter the arena make it all seem like an insignificant scuffle between wild animals.
This just goes to show that you can't believe everything the media tells you.






Assignment Filename =  021final1.txt
As showcased by The Hunger Games, contradictions appear to be a staple of Suzanne Collins' writing.
The plot of the novel is a paradox in itself: a gruesome death match between starving children provides "tasteful" entertainment for the wealthy citizens of The Capitol.
Looking deeper into the text, the contrasts between what can be expected and what transpires reveal themselves often, specifically during Katniss Everdeen's interview with Caesar Flickerman.
She spends the duration of the scene doing whatever it takes to please the Capitol audience, regardless of how she would behave under regular circumstances.
All of the characters contribute to the charade; so much so that the reader almost forgets that Katniss is preparing to be thrown into an arena to be brutally murdered on live TV.
By looking at the contrasting interactions of Katniss with Caesar Flickerman and the Gamemakers, as opposed to Katniss with Cinna, we can see the lies and deception that ensure the success of the Capitol's celebration of the Hunger Games.
This is important because even though it appears like Katniss is getting swept up by her newfound fame and popularity, she reveals that this is not the case in her subtle strategizing with Cinna and pure honesty regarding her relationship with Prim.
In her pre-Hunger Games interview with Caesar Flickerman, Katniss reveals a side of herself that she never has shown to anyone, not even herself.
This may lie in the fact that during her dialogue with Caesar, she isn't being completely genuine.
She realizes that she has a game to win; and she can't win unless she plays.
In order to gain an advantage over her fellow tributes, she must impress the general public of the Capitol.
After she charms the audience by twirling around the stage in her fiery dress, she starts giggling, which she claimed she had done "never in my lifetime" (128).
This behavior raises the question of whether Katniss has actually softened into this playful teenage girl.
The real Katniss Everdeen does not giggle, but she has to make sponsors fall in love and is willing to be whoever they want her to be.
Based on her characterization throughout the novel, the reader would not expect her to be corrupted by the Capitol so easily.
But, her desire to stay alive overpowers her inclination to stay true to herself.
Katniss had previously proven herself to be very honest and never made it a priority to hide how she felt from anyone.
The act of deception she displays in this scene with her newfound bubbly personality and light-hearted bantering with Caesar showcases her adaptability to her surroundings.
She never truly stops being the headstrong 16-year-old from District 12.
Even more so than Katniss, Caesar Flickerman sustains the charade in this passage.
As the Capitol spectators select their favorites and become attached to the tributes, it is Caesar's duty to assure their safety.
The façade of the Games relies on Flickerman's radiating positivity that can make one believe that all of the kids will return home.
Collins chooses her words very carefully when writing Caesar's role as somewhat of a guardian to the tributes.
When Katniss nearly falls off the stage after twirling around in her dress, "Caesar wraps a protective arm" around her (128).
The use of the word "protective" is ironic because he can't really protect Katniss from the atrocity that awaits her in the arena.
This idea is repeated when Caesar reassures the crowd, "She's safe with me" (128).
He knows this is not the case but chooses to say it anyway for the sake of the naivety of the crowd.
If he reiterates the idea enough, the Capitol viewers will forget that all but one these kids who are so full of life now will be dead by the end of the month.
Caesar doesn't forget this and the inner turmoil that he must deal with year after year of laughing along with the doomed tributes during their interviews is unimaginable.
But, he never falters and there is never any evidence of guilt or remorse from his character.
He can't let these emotions get to him or he wouldn't be able to do his job.
Katniss appreciates that "he tries to help you [the tributes] out" (127), in the midst of their interviews.
That's all he can really do.
Even though Katniss and Caesar are not being completely honest during this scene of the novel, the Gamemakers contribute to the fraudulence of the Hunger Games the most.
They are the ones designing the arena that dehumanizes the tributes into practically wild animals.
In this scene however, the Gamemakers and tributes poke fun at each other like they're best friends.
When Caesar comments on Katniss' training score of eleven, the cameras find them in the crowd "chuckling and nodding" along with Katniss (128).
The reader knows that Katniss angered many of the Gamemakers during her training session with her radical display; but it appears that all has been forgiven and they share a laugh.
To keep the residents of the Capitol at peace about the Tributes' inevitable slaughter, the Gamemakers keep up the illusion of an amiable relationship between them.
Everyone may be friendly in front of the cameras, but as soon as they enter the Gameroom, the Gamemakers are relentless.
The laughter they share makes it easy to forget that they are the ones plotting the most exciting way for Katniss and the other tributes to die.
After watching Katniss, Caesar, and the Gamemakers deceive all of Panem on live TV, it's hard to believe that there is any truth left in the Capitol.
Cinna, Katniss' assigned stylist and temporary security blanket, is the one person who can bring out the honesty in this scene.
Even though it's against her nature, Katniss recognizes the realness in Cinna and trusts him wholeheartedly from the start.
His advice to her before she goes on stage is to just be herself (123).
He knows this will make her accessible to the audience and have people falling in love with her.
They continue to work as a team throughout the scene to make Katniss as appealing as possible to sponsors.
Throughout her interview, Katniss looks to him for support and encouragement.
While showing off her dress, Cinna makes "the tiniest circular motion with his finger" that signals Katniss to twirl for the crowd (128).
She flawlessly executes his instructions, and the audience reaction is enough to know Cinna is acting in her best interest.
They are secretly working together to pull off the pretense.
Every action is part of a strategy to keep Katniss alive.
This reminds the reader that she never strays from her number one priority of staying alive.
The subtlety of their interactions is the main contribution to her success in her interview.
She's getting coached from the sidelines to be the perfect tribute.
Even at the end of her interview, she looks to Cinna for reassurance and he gives her a subtle thumbs up (129).
The confidence that Katniss finds in herself when she looks to Cinna gives the audience a picture of a strong tribute, even though she has never been more nervous in her life.
When Caesar implores about Prim, Katniss is petrified and focuses on Cinna again.
He's the only one in the Capitol she would actually want to share her love of Prim with and he knows this, as shown by the deepest sympathy on his face.
Remembering what Cinna said earlier, she decides that she should just be honest.
The Capitol loves the real emotion displayed by Katniss in this scene.
It shows that her motivation from the start has not strayed and that she'll do whatever it takes for Prim's sake.
In making this decision, the reader is reassured that Katniss is still herself.
The Hunger Games provides a perfect example of extreme propaganda.
Even though most of the outlying Districts don't buy it, the people of the Capitol look past how barbaric the Games are and only see harmless entertainment.
The producers of the Hunger Games do a fantastic job at masking the massive heartbreak that accompanies the brutal death of each individual tribute.
It's hard to blame the people of the Capitol because everyone plays a part in hiding the reality of the Games with a harmless appearance.
However, they choose to accept the lies and allow themselves to give in to the deception because in their eyes, there is no problem.
Even if there were, there isn't anything they can do about it.
To Capitol viewers, it is just a game and these kids aren't real.
The dehumanization of the tributes when they enter the arena makes it all seem like an insignificant scuffle between robots.
It just goes to show how much power the media really has.






Assignment Filename =  022draft2.txt
Rarely do people find themselves rooting for the other team.
In The Hunger Games movie, the audience is coaxed into supporting Katniss and Peeta: the underdog Tributes from District 12.
Viewers become emotionally attached to the "star crossed lovers" because they have seen all the trials and tribulations that brought them to the finale of the Games.
However, Cato, the Career tribute from District 2, is given an opportunity in his final moments to win over the audience in his own way.
After displaying relentless brutality towards Katniss and Peeta on top of the Cornucopia, he gets trapped and knows that his time to die has come.
The contrast between the battle of the remaining Tributes and Cato's last monolog reveals a new perspective for the audience.
Cato's animalistic qualities that have been showcased throughout the film are overshadowed by a pitiful speech of a scared little boy.
By looking at how the filmmakers portray Cato's death scene and how much time was allotted for it, we can see that even though he appeared dehumanized by The Hunger Games, Cato was still a vulnerable kid.
This is important because the audience is left with no choice but to sympathize for him even though he was previously viewed as a villain.
To understand the shift in Cato's character during this scene, it is vital to not only regard the action on screen, but the use of background noise.
The music in the battle sequence is familiar to that of any action movie.
Suspense builds as the volume of the music rises and sets a tone of impending doom for one unlucky Tribute.
When the fight breaks, the music stops simultaneously.
Throughout Cato's monolog, the background music is barely audible, placing the focus on him and his words.
Now, the audience stops being influenced by the intensity of the music and is left wanting to listen to what Cato has to say.
The music is not the only thing the audience hears in the background of this scene.
The barking of the Muttations is cleverly used by the filmmakers to reveal Cato's evolving role.
The growls of the monsters at the foot of the Cornucopia blend with Cato's grunts: turning them into a collective enemy opposing Katniss and Peeta.
The difference between Cato and the Mutts is barely distinguishable.
This displays the already familiar animalistic Cato.
But, just as the music dies down when Cato starts to speak in the second half of the scene, the dogs become drowned out by his voice.
While he speaks, his previous impression as a monster is overcome by the weakness that he previously hid so well.
The distinction between the two halves of this scene can also be exhibited in the camerawork.
The battle is very fast: with a quickly moving camera and choppy cuts between the Tributes and the dogs below.
It's hard to focus on a single character because everything is moving so suddenly.
However, when it reaches the second part of the scene, the frantic movements of the camera abruptly stop.
The editing becomes much cleaner as the focus shifts to the actual faces of the Tributes.
This gives the viewer a chance to get a good look at who these people are and what they are feeling.
Cato's exhaustion is revealed in his eyes, which the viewer never had the opportunity to see.
The positive connection formed between Cato and the audience at this stage in the Games is unlikely because of his antagonistic role to Katniss and Peeta.
But, now that they are given the opportunity to get more than just a glimpse of his face during a battle, the audience pities him rather than anxiously anticipating his death like they had with the previous Tributes (excluding Rue).
The transformation from a vengeful monster to frustrated teenager can be observed in this contradiction set up in this scene.
The filmmakers made a clear decision to spend more time focusing on Cato's death than the other Tributes.
His final monolog vocalizes what can already be seen all over his face.
For the first time, he appears weak: with blood smeared across his forehead and tears in his eyes.
His voice cracks as he admits to Katniss and Peeta that he's "dead anyway" and that he "always was".
This is not the Cato seen earlier in the film who laughed as he drew his sword to effortlessly murder another Tribute.
He has Peeta in a headlock during his speech, and even though he could snap his neck at any moment, he doesn't.
Cato knows there isn't a point because he's already lost.
The humanity left inside him holds him back and allows his death to be that much more noble.
His own demise is inevitable, so why should he add to the death count?
And with this, the viewers no longer see Cato as a ruthless killing machine, but a terrified teenager: much like the beloved Katniss and Peeta.
The goal of this scene is to remind the audience that each Tribute was a kid with real emotions and feelings: even the ones they didn't like.
By the time Cato's death actually occurs, the audience doesn't end up excited.
They won't cheer because Katniss and Peeta are finally the victors.
They are left feeling somber and confused.
It becomes understood that Cato was never really the enemy; there was a force much larger working against all the Tributes in the Games: The Capitol.
The injustice of the Hunger Games seemed less obvious before because of the universal acceptance by all of the characters.
However, Cato hints to the oppression of the Capitol and his District in his last words and it is immediately recognized that they should have all be on the team: one united against the Capitol.






Assignment Filename =  022final2.txt
From the very beginning of The Hunger Games movie, the audience is coaxed into supporting Katniss and Peeta: the underdog tributes from District 12.
Viewers become emotionally attached to the "star crossed lovers" because they witness all the trials and tribulations that bring them to the finale of the Games.
However, Cato, the Career tribute from District 2, is given an opportunity in his final moments to win over the audience in his own way.
After displaying relentless brutality toward Katniss and Peeta on top of the Cornucopia, he gets trapped and knows that his time to die has come.
The contrast between the battle of the remaining tributes and Cato's last monolog reveals a new perspective for the audience.
Cato's animalistic qualities that have been showcased throughout the film are overshadowed by a pitiful speech of a scared teenage boy.
By looking at how the filmmakers portray Cato's death scene and how much time they allot for it, we can see that even though he appears dehumanized by the Hunger Games, Cato is just another vulnerable tribute.
This is important because the audience is left sympathizing with him even though he was previously viewed as a villain.
To understand the shift in Cato's character during this scene, it is vital to not only pay attention to the action on screen, but also the use of background noise.
The music used in the battle sequence between the three remaining tributes is familiar to that of any action movie.
Suspense builds as the volume of the music rises and sets a tone of impending doom for one unlucky tribute.
When the fight breaks, the music stops simultaneously.
Throughout Cato's monolog, the background music is barely audible, placing the focus solely on his speech.
At this point in the film, the audience stops being influenced by the intensity of the music and is left hanging on Cato's every word.
The music is not the only audio in the background of this scene.
The filmmakers cleverly use the barking of the Muttations to reveal Cato's evolving role.
At the introduction of this scene, the growls of the monsters at the foot of the Cornucopia blend with Cato's grunts: turning them into a collective enemy opposing Katniss and Peeta.
The difference between Cato and the Mutts is barely distinguishable.
This displays the already familiar animalistic Cato.
But just as the music dies down when Cato starts to speak in the second half of the scene, the dogs become drowned out by his voice.
While he speaks, his previous impression as a monster is overcome by the vulnerability he previously hid so well.
Even though the sounds from the dogs were so overwhelming before, his voice ends up overpowering them.
The significance in this context reveals that not only he is a strong character that he can take focus away from terrifying monsters, but also that he is more than just an animal.
He is better than the Muttations and proves that in his final goodbye.
The distinction between the two parts of this scene can also be exhibited in the camerawork.
The battle is very fast: with a quickly moving camera and choppy cuts between the tributes and the dogs below.
It's hard to focus on a single character because everything is moving so suddenly.
However, when it reaches the second half of the scene, the frantic movements of the camera abruptly stop.
The editing becomes much cleaner as the focus shifts to the actual faces of the tributes.
This gives the viewer a chance to get a good look at who these people are and what they are feeling.
Cato's exhaustion is revealed in his eyes, which the viewer never had the opportunity to really see.
A positive connection between Cato and the audience at this stage in the Games is unlikely because of his antagonistic role toward Katniss and Peeta.
However, now that they are given the opportunity to get more than just a quick glimpse of his face during a battle, the audience pities him rather than anxiously anticipating his death like they had with the previous Career Tributes with whom they did not become emotionally attached to.
Through the contradiction set up in this scene, Cato is transformed from a vengeful monster to frustrated teenager.
The filmmakers made a conscious decision to spend more time focusing on Cato's death than most of the other tributes.
His final monolog vocalizes what can already be seen all over his face.
For the first time, he appears weak: with blood smeared across his forehead and tears in his eyes.
His voice cracks as he admits to Katniss and Peeta that he's "dead anyway" and that he "always was".
This is not the Cato seen earlier in the film who laughed as he drew his sword to effortlessly murder another tribute.
He has Peeta in a headlock during his speech, and even though he could snap his neck at any moment, he doesn't.
If the roles were reversed and Peeta had Cato trapped, he wouldn't have hesitated and Cato would be dead in an instant: not because Peeta is a heartless killer, but in the fact that he is still a player and would do anything to win.
But Cato doesn't.
He knows there isn't a point because he already lost.
Katniss has him cornered and regardless of whether he kills Peeta, he's a dead man.
The humanity left inside him holds him back and allows his death to be much more noble.
His own demise is inevitable, so why should he add to the death count?
And with this, the viewers no longer see Cato as a ruthless killing machine, but a terrified teenager: much like the beloved Katniss and Peeta.
The goal of this scene is to remind the audience that each tribute is a kid with real emotions: even the ones they didn't like.
By the time Cato's death actually occurs, the audience isn't necessarily excited.
They won't cheer because Katniss and Peeta are finally the victors.
They are left somber and confused.
They realize that Cato was never really the enemy.
There was a force much larger working against all the tributes in the Games: The Capitol.
The injustice of the Hunger Games seemed less obvious before because of the universal acceptance by all of the characters.
However, Cato hints to the oppression of the Capitol and his District in his last words and it is immediately recognized that they should have all been on the same team: one united against the Capitol.






Assignment Filename =  023draft3.txt
Anxiety, suicidal thoughts, alienation, cynicism, distrust of authority, isolation, hypersensitivity to injustice, tendency to fits of rage, all-or-nothing thinking, fear of trauma returning these are only a few of the symptoms of PTSD as defined by Post-Traumatic Stress Disorder: A Complete Treatment Guide (Matsakis, Tilley 19).
In Mockingjay, Katniss Everdeen displays each of these and more.
She has suffered so much anguish throughout the series that by the end of the trilogy, the effects of the trauma culminate in the form of a complete mental breakdown.
At this point, she has suffered through two Hunger Games, a bloody revolution, and most importantly, the death of her beloved sister, Prim.
When placed in solitary confinement after shooting the new president of Panem, she is practically incapacitated by the fragileness of her sanity.
At her breaking point, she goes through stages of PTSD similar to those of veterans who returned home from Vietnam.
By looking at Katniss' psychological state after shooting President Coin, we can see that the accumulation of her trauma has left her with significant neurological damage, similar to the Post Traumatic Stress Disorder experienced by Vietnam Veterans; this is important because the similarities shared in their depression, alienation, and anger result from betrayal by their respective governments.
Suicide is the first thing on Katniss' mind after she is imprisoned.
She is depressed and convinced that things will only continue to get worse.
She's exhausted and the one person that always kept her going, Prim, is gone.
After listing potential ways to actively kill herself, she resolves on just giving up completely, "What I can do is give up.
I resolve to lie on the bed without eating, drinking, or taking my medications.
I could do it, too.
Just die" (Collins 375-376).
Despite her complete lack of desire to carry on, Katniss manages to survive her imprisonment.
Unfortunately, many sufferers of PTSD haven't been so lucky and the outcomes have been tragic.
Vietnam Veterans underwent the same feelings of being hopeless, dejected, isolated, vulnerable, and emotionally constricted upon their return from service (Ochberg 235).
In the midst of the former soldiers' search for meaning after the war, they lost their identities in their depression.
Many succeeded in their attempts to escape their grief and distorted reality.
By looking at Katniss' behavior in Mockingjay, I'm sure she would have done the same if she didn't have so many people working to keep her alive.
Even though there were so many people who continually supported Katniss during her imprisonment, she thought she was completely isolated and alone.
She felt abandoned by all of her loved ones and alienated by the government that she had placed her trust in.
When she realizes that her captors aren't going to let her die, she fears that they are planning to continue to use her when she eventually gets out.
She mulls over this potential punishment, "And then a terrible thought hits me: What if they're not going to kill me?
What if they have more plans for me?
A new way to remake, train, and use me?
" (Collins 377).
To Katniss, this is a punishment worse than death.
She is so blinded by her paranoia that she believes they want to continue to torture her rather than just execute her.
She assumes that the government will continue to exploit her for their own agenda even though she has already been completely humiliated.
Ochberg talks about the feelings of victimization in Vietnam Veterans in a similar way.
He writes: 
The victim often feels diminished, pushed down in a hierarchy of dominance, exploited and invaded  Victimization should suggest a transient state of personal disequilibrium, beginning with unanticipated trauma and ending with survivor status or reequilibration (Ochberg 227).
Draftees could not have anticipated the horror that awaited them in Vietnam and were greeted upon their return with hatred from their society and rejection by their government (Ochberg 228).
There is no greater betrayal than complete abandonment by those you were loyally fighting to protect.
This in conjunction with the emotional scarring put on by the trauma itself contributes to the severity of PTSD.
Katniss has been taken advantage of throughout the Hunger Games trilogy.
It has always upset her, but there was no way of foreseeing Katniss' anger by the end.
She is not only furious at the authority figures that blatantly abused her, but also the people she felt she could trust.
Her hatred doesn't stop at the people she knows.
She expresses her disgust for the whole human race, "I no longer feel any allegiance to these monsters called human beings, despise being one myself" (Collins 377).
Her frustration is undeniable and is what fuels her thoughts and actions.
After returning home from their service in Vietnam, soldiers were infuriated by the sense that they were used as a pawn (Ochberg 235).
This rage is considered a symptom of PTSD that places blame on not only those who were involved, but those who chose not to act.
Denying the countless injustices in both the Hunger Games and Vietnam War is an impossible feat.
The effects of the trauma on those who were involved caused unimaginable pain and realization of how terrible the world can be.
In many cases, the damage to the minds of the young who endure the incredible suffering of war and death cannot be undone.
The effects linger in ways that destroy the victims from the inside out.
Katniss and Vietnam Veterans experienced these symptoms as they lost hope in everyone, including themselves.






Assignment Filename =  023final3.txt
Anxiety, suicidal thoughts, alienation, cynicism, distrust of authority, isolation, hypersensitivity to injustice, tendency to fits of rage, all-or-nothing thinking, fear of trauma returning these are only a few of the symptoms of PTSD as defined by Post-Traumatic Stress Disorder: A Complete Treatment Guide (Matsakis, Tilley 19).
In Suzanne Collins's Mockingjay, Katniss Everdeen displays each of these and more.
She has suffered so much anguish throughout the Hunger Games series that by the end of the trilogy, the effects of the trauma culminate in the form of a complete mental breakdown.
She has suffered through two Hunger Games, a bloody revolution, and probably most significantly, the death of her beloved sister, Prim.
When placed in solitary confinement after shooting the new president of Panem, she is practically incapacitated by the fragility of her sanity.
At her breaking point, she goes through stages of Post Traumatic Stress Disorder (PTSD) similar to those of veterans who returned home from the Vietnam War.
By looking at Katniss' psychological state after shooting President Coin, we can see that the accumulation of her trauma left her with significant neurological damage, similar to the PTSD experienced by Vietnam Veterans.
This is important because the similarities shared in their feelings of depression, alienation, and anger result from betrayal by their respective governments.
Suicide is the first thing on Katniss' mind after she is imprisoned.
She is depressed and convinced that things will only continue to get worse.
She's exhausted and the one person that always kept her going, Prim, is gone.
After listing potential ways to actively kill herself, she resolves on just giving up completely.
At her darkest hour, Katniss thinks to herself, "What I can do is give up.
I resolve to lie on the bed without eating, drinking, or taking my medications.
I could do it, too.
Just die" (Collins 375-376).
Despite her complete lack of desire to carry on, Katniss manages to survive her imprisonment.
Unfortunately, many who suffer from PTSD have not been so lucky and the outcomes have been tragic.
Vietnam Veterans underwent the same feelings of hopelessness, dejection, isolation, vulnerability, and emotional constriction upon their return from service (Ochberg 235).
In the midst of the former soldiers' search for meaning after the war, they lost their identities within their depression.
Many succeeded in their attempts to escape their grief and distorted reality.
Based on Katniss' behavior in Mockingjay, she would have done the same had she not had so many people working to keep her alive.
During her imprisonment, Katniss thinks she is completely isolated and alone despite the fact that there are so many people continuously supporting her.
She feels abandoned by all of her loved ones and alienated by the government she had once placed her trust in.
When she realizes her captors aren't going to let her die, she fears they are planning to continue to use her when she eventually is released.
She mulls over this potential punishment: "And then a terrible thought hits me: What if they're not going to kill me?
What if they have more plans for me?
A new way to remake, train, and use me?
" (Collins 377).
To Katniss, this is a punishment worse than death.
She is blinded by her paranoia and believes they would rather continue torturing her than execute her.
She assumes that the government will continue to exploit her for their own agenda even though she has already been completely humiliated.
Frank Ochberg talks about the feelings of victimization in Vietnam Veterans in a similar way.
He writes: 
The victim often feels diminished, pushed down in a hierarchy of dominance, exploited and invaded  Victimization should suggest a transient state of personal disequilibrium, beginning with unanticipated trauma and ending with survivor status or reequilibration (Ochberg 227).
Draftees could not have anticipated the horrors that awaited them in Vietnam and were greeted upon their return with hatred from their society and rejection by their government (Ochberg 228).
There is no greater betrayal than complete abandonment by those you were loyally fighting to protect.
This, in conjunction with the emotional scarring brought on by the trauma itself, contributes to the severity of PTSD.
It is important to note the similarities in the situations of the men drafted to serve in Vietnam and the tributes of the Hunger Games.
The Districts have no choice but to turn over two tributes to compete.
Katniss had already experienced the rejection of being a tribute twice before being prodded into the war in Mockingjay.
The monstrosities she had to endure in all these situations parallel any war zone.
It is one thing to volunteer.
But as any soldier knows, including Katniss, there is nothing worse than being forced into that position against your will.
Katniss has been taken advantage of throughout the Hunger Games trilogy.
It always upset her, but there was no way of foreseeing the extent of Katniss' anger by the end.
She is not only furious at the authority figures that blatantly abused her, but also the people who she felt she could trust.
Her hatred doesn't stop at the people she knows.
She expresses disgust for the whole human race.
In the midst of an internal rant, she declares, "I no longer feel any allegiance to these monsters called human beings, despise being one myself" (Collins 377).
Her frustration is undeniable and fuels her thoughts and actions.
After returning home from their service in Vietnam, soldiers were infuriated by the similar sense that they had been used as a pawn (Ochberg 235).
This rage is considered a symptom of PTSD that places blame on not only those who were involved, but those who stood idly by and chose not to act.
Denying the countless injustices in both the Hunger Games and Vietnam War is an impossible feat.
The effects of the trauma on those involved caused unimaginable pain.
The effects linger in ways that destroy the victims from the inside out.
In many cases, the damage to the minds of the young who endure the incredible suffering of war and death cannot be undone.
However, PTSD does not always leave its victims incapacitated.
There is always hope for recovery.
At the very end of Mockingjay, Katniss speaks of the flashbacks and nightmares that she and Peeta still endure: "There are still moments when he clutches the back of a chair and hangs on until the flashbacks are over.
I wake screaming from nightmares of mutts and lost children" (Collins 388).
In many PTSD cases, these are both lasting problems that persist through the remainder of the sufferer's lives (Matsakis 32-33).
Even though the memories still remain, with the support of each other, they can move forward with their lives.
In the end, Peeta gives Katniss "the promise that life can go on" (Collins 388) and it does.






Assignment Filename =  024draft4.txt
Destruction, death, and corruption have always attracted audiences in incredible magnitudes.
From the beginning of human history, people went out by the thousands to watch gladiators fight to the death in glorified battles against fierce competitors.
Today, the daily news is plastered with corrupt politicians and foreign nations slowly imploding as their governments lose control.
It only makes sense that dystopian societies have become an increasingly popular focus of modern literature, especially among young adults.
Suzanne Collins's The Hunger Games series and Veronica Roth's Divergent are perfect examples of this.
In these novels, the heroine is living in a corrupt, authoritarian society and they, along with their recruited followers, are assigned to save the day.
A noticeable characteristic of this reemerging genre is the innovative idea that a girl is the hero.
Weak, female characters are no longer waiting around to be saved by knights in shining armor.
By looking at the characteristics and behaviors exhibited by Katniss in The Hunger Games and Tris in Divergent, we can see that there has been a shift in dystopian literature that has allowed heroines to dominate the genre.
This is important because these females can be characterized by their innate abilities and strong wills rather than be automatically placed into the traditional category of "damsel in distress".
Katniss and Tris share a lot of similar personality traits.
From the beginning of both books, the reader knows that these are no ordinary teenage girls.
They are smart, powerful, but also extremely caring.
It doesn't take long to discover that these girls are special.
As their respective coming-of-age stories progress, the reader watches them become less naïve and more in touch with themselves and the evil that is going on around them.
Katniss and Tris start out trying to ignore the bigger enemy at the start.
However, after their experiences, they realize who the bigger problem is and that it needs to be stopped: no matter what harm comes to them.
This is where they share the importance of sacrifice.
In The Hunger Games, every decision Katniss makes is for the sake of her little sister, Prim.
She sacrifices herself for her from the start by volunteering for the Games at the Reaping in place of her sister.
In Divergent, it appears that most of the people are sacrificing themselves for Tris.
Both of her parents die so she can continue on in the fight.
But, she chose to join the counterattack and knew she had to carry on for the sake of the victims in Abnegation and Dauntless.
She learned from the example her parents both set as well as the values she obtained in her training at the Dauntless compound.
She knew she would probably die, but she continued to rescue those under attack.
The selflessness exhibited by Tris here echoes the same value that Katniss displays when she becomes the Mockingjay.
In both The Hunger Games and Divergent, the government's biggest threat was a 16-year-old girl.
Katniss was the Mockingjay that stood for the revolution throughout the Hunger Games series.
Tris was Divergent and, even though there was more than one of these, she was vital to the downfall of the uprising against Abnegation.
Katniss and Tris play essentially the same character just in a different setting.
Even though the plots differ greatly, they are each able to lead the fight against corruption in "the system".
The Capitol was unable to control Katniss' popularity because she was thrust into the public eye from the start.
Because she had sparked the revolution within the Districts, they couldn't kill her without it being suspicious.
However, the majority of citizens in Divergent did not know of the rebels, let alone Tris.
She was able to evade detection as a Divergent for long enough that they couldn't get to her.
Given the opportunity, leaders of the Dauntless, or any, faction would have silenced her on the spot.
Tris was lucky enough to avoid this fate just as Katniss did from the Capitol.
Even though Katniss and Tris are exceptionally strong and brave teenage girls, they are still teenage girls.
And what's a teenage girl without her stud of a boyfriend?
The romance subplot greatly affects Katniss and Tris in The Hunger Games and Divergent.
Katniss and Peeta rely on each other throughout the series and (spoiler alert!
) end up together by the end of the series.
Katniss and Tobias also work as a team to hurdle all the obstacles thrown at them.
Rather than the girl being rescued by the boy, in these "feminist critical dystopias", it is often the other way around.
In both novels, there are a number of times where Katniss and Tris have to save their male counterparts.
It is also interesting to look at the importance of these relationships to these girls.
To them, their romances are the things they are fighting for.
This often gets them into dangerous situations that they could have avoided had they just been apathetic towards their feelings.
But they both are naturally protective and are willing to do whatever it takes to protect the ones they love.
However, the most important thing about these relationships are that it proves to these heroines that there is still a possibility of love and support in a war torn world.
In the past century specifically, there has been an obvious transformation in society that has allowed women to become their own force in the world.
There are so many strong women that can lead through revolutions and wars every day.
They are no longer only seen as helpless and always needing to be saved.
There has been an increase in feminist literature and female authors have taken this opportunity to showcase girls as a force to be reckoned with.
The characters that have come out of this are admirable examples that people should strive to mirror.
Their strength and values are things to be admired.






Assignment Filename =  024final4.txt
In the early 20th century, dystopian fiction was a genre dominated by male authors and male protagonists.
A few of the most popular novels of this time are centered around dystopian societies, including Aldous Huxley's Brave New World, George Orwell's 1984, and Ray Bradbury's Fahrenheit 451 (Grossman).
In modern literature, this genre has become increasingly more popular and its appeal has shifted toward young adult readers.
Suzanne Collins's The Hunger Games and Veronica Roth's Divergent are perfect examples of this.
However, there is a radical difference between the most recent dystopian stories and their predecessors.
A noticeable characteristic of this reemerging genre is the innovative idea that a girl is the hero.
In The Hunger Games and Divergent, the heroine is living in a corrupt, authoritarian society and they, along with their recruited followers, are assigned to save the day.
Weak, female characters are no longer waiting around to be saved.
By looking at the characteristics and behaviors exhibited by Katniss in The Hunger Games and Tris in Divergent, we can see that there has been a shift in dystopian literature that has allowed heroines to dominate the genre as opposed to the traditional male protagonist.
This is important because these females can be characterized by their innate abilities and strong wills rather than be automatically placed into the traditional category of "damsel in distress.
"

Katniss and Tris share a lot of similar personality traits.
From the beginning of both books, the reader knows that these are no ordinary teenage girls.
They are smart, powerful, but also extremely caring.
It does not take long to discover that these girls are special.
As their respective coming-of-age stories progress, the reader watches them become less naïve and more in touch with themselves and the evil going on around them.
Katniss and Tris start out trying to ignore the bigger enemy at the start.
However, after their experiences, they realize who the bigger problem is and that it needs to be stopped: no matter what harm comes to them.
This is where they share the importance of sacrifice.
In The Hunger Games, every decision Katniss makes is for the sake of her little sister, Prim.
She volunteers as tribute for the Hunger Games in place of her sister even though "the word tribute is pretty much synonymous with the word corpse" (Collins 22).
In Divergent, it appears that most people are sacrificing themselves for Tris.
She watches as both of her parents die so she can continue on in the fight.
From these selfless examples, she discovers that she must power through for the sake of the innocent victims remaining in Abnegation and Dauntless.
By carrying on with the counterattack, she knows she will either die or worse, become factionless.
Regardless, she leads the way: "I watch the others run in the opposite direction  toward safety, toward Amity  for a few seconds, and then I turn away, toward the city, toward the war.
We stand next to the railroad tracks, which will carry us into danger" (Roth 455).
This value of self-sacrifice is something that Katniss and Tris share and make them strong heroes.
In both The Hunger Games and Divergent, the government's biggest threat is a 16-year-old girl.
Katniss is the Mockingjay that stands for the revolution throughout the Hunger Games series.
After successfully cheating the system with the nightlock berries in The Hunger Games, the Capitol becomes nervous from such a public act of rebellion.
When Haymitch discusses why this is so dangerous with Katniss, he says, "Listen up.
You're in trouble.
Word is the Capitol's furious about you showing them up in the arena.
The one thing they can't stand is being laughed at and they're the joke of Panem" (Collins 356-357).
It is right for the Capitol to be so terrified of the backlash of the berries because they do end up being the spark for a revolution.
In Divergent, Tris is Divergent.
Her mom describes what this means and why she is vital to the downfall of the uprising against Abnegation: 
Every faction conditions its members to think and act a certain way.
And most people do it.
For most people, it's not hard to learn, to find a pattern of thought that works and stay that way But our minds move in a dozen of different directions.
We can't be confined to one way of thinking, and that terrifies our leaders.
It means we can't be controlled.
And it means that no matter what they do, we will always cause trouble for them (Roth 441).
Katniss and Tris play essentially the same character just in a different setting.
Even though the plots differ greatly, they are each able to lead the fight against corruption in "the system".
The Capitol is unable to control Katniss' popularity because she was thrust into the public eye from the start.
Because she sparked the revolution within the Districts, they can't kill her without it being suspicious.
However, the majority of citizens in Divergent did not know of the rebels, let alone Tris.
She is able to evade detection as a Divergent for long enough that they don't get to her.
Given the opportunity, leaders of the Dauntless, or any, faction would have silenced her on the spot.
Tris was lucky enough to avoid this fate just as Katniss did from the Capitol.
Even though Katniss and Tris are exceptionally strong and brave teenage girls, they are still teenage girls.
And what's a teenage girl without her stud of a boyfriend?
The romance subplot greatly affects Katniss and Tris in The Hunger Games and Divergent.
Katniss and Peeta rely on each other throughout the series and (spoiler alert!
) end up together by the end of the series.
Katniss and Tobias also work as a team to hurdle all the obstacles thrown at them.
Rather than the girl being rescued by the boy, in these feminist critical dystopias, it is often the other way around.
In both novels, there are a number of times where Katniss and Tris have to save their male counterparts.
In The Hunger Games, Katniss goes to the point of drugging Peeta so that she can go to the Feast to get the medicine to keep him alive (Collins 277).
In Divergent, Tris pulls Tobias from a mind-controlling trance just by the sound of her voice (Roth 477-478).
It is interesting to look at the importance of these relationships to these girls.
Their romances are often what drag them into the most dangerous situations.
The danger they encounter could have been easily avoided had they been apathetic towards their feelings.
However, Katniss and Tris are naturally protective and will do whatever it takes to protect the ones they love.
It proves to these heroines that there is still a possibility of love and support in a war torn world (Grossman).
In the past century specifically, there has been an obvious transformation in society that has allowed women to become their own force in the world.
There are so many strong women that can lead through revolutions and wars every day.
In Pakistan, a 15-year-old girl, Malala Yousafzai, was shot by the Taliban for campaigning for girls' education.
Now, a revolution is being led in her name and she is the face of a movement raising billions of dollars to ensure that all girls go to school by 2015 (AFP).
Girls are no longer helpless both in stories and in the real world.
Female authors have taken advantage of the increase in popularity in feminist literature to showcase that girls are a force to be reckoned with.






Assignment Filename =  025draft1.txt
A tribute years earlier than the 74th Hunger Games turned savage within the arena and ate a dead tribute's heart.
Blood dripping down the face of a young boy, a mangled body lying at his feet, and an animalistic look in the eyes of this boy is a perfect symbol of the dehumanization process that takes place from the Hunger Games.
By studying Peeta's internal warfare over how he will retain his identity while in the arena, we can see how Peeta differs from all other tributes.
Peeta's quest for identity and humanity is important because the Capitol's hopes are to dehumanize the tributes, and these tributes are willing to do anything to survive, even sacrificing their moral beliefs.
First off, there lies the question of whether Peeta has accepted death and given up, or maybe there is more to it.
Peeta leads the reader to believe he has completely given up when he says, "I've never been a contender in these Games anyway" (141).
Hopelessness seems to have set in on Peeta as he sees his imminent death approaching.
On the surface it really seems like Peeta is giving up, he even talks about dying as himself, meaning he has accepted death.
Although it seems he has completely given up, if the reader looks closer he/she will see Peeta's true motive.
Peeta knows he will die, because he will protect Katniss and try to help her win.
To Peeta, protecting Katniss is how he will die as himself, it gives his death meaning.
When Peeta says, "[ ] what else am I allowed to care about at this point?
" (142), he realizes Katniss is what he should care about at this point.
Peeta's plan to save Katniss is not known to the reader, because the scene is in Katniss's point of view and Katniss always thinks Peeta is scheming and looking for a way to gain advantage over her.
Had it been in Peeta's point of view the reader could see his intentions.
Through Katniss, the reader sees Peeta's remark, "Give my mother my best when you make it back, will you?
" (142), as a sign that he has given up all hope of winning.
In all reality though, Peeta is saying that Katniss will live and he will die, because her life is more important than his.
So yes, Peeta has accepted death, but it is a death chosen by him and it will be a noble death.
Now, to comprehend why Peeta's thoughts are an anomaly from other tributes' thoughts the reader must understand what Peeta wishes to maintain.
Peeta is fighting to maintain his purity, humanity, and identity.
The Games are known for turning players into "savages" who are blood thirsty for their competitors lives.
Just look at Titus who turned cannibalistic in the arena.
Peeta wants to maintain his humanity, not become a "beast" like Titus.
The fear that surges in Peeta's mind is the worry that the Games will turn him into a soulless monster hell bent on killing everyone in his way to survive, "I don't want them to change me in there.
Turn me into some kind of monster that I'm not" (141).
Identity is who we are, and Peeta wants to prevent the loss of his identity in the arena.
Also, Peeta doesn't want to die as a forgettable tribute in the 74th Hunger Games, he wants to make a statement with his death, "Only I keep wishing I could think of a way to .
.
.
to show the Capitol they don't own me.
That I'm more than just a piece in their Games" (142).
The Capitol has made everyone a piece in their Games for the past 73 years, but Peeta wants to send a message by showing everyone that he is Peeta Mellark, a sixteen year old boy, a human being.
Furthermore, Peeta wishes to maintain his purity.
This doesn't mean he won't kill anyone, even Peeta says he will, "[ ] I'm sure I'll kill just like everybody else" (142).
Peeta's purity would only be destroyed if he broke his own moral code, and lost sight of what he saw as right and wrong.
Peeta's thoughts are very noble; he is willing to sacrifice his life for his morals, something no other tribute would do.
Since the scene is in the point of view of Katniss, the reader can see the mindset of a tribute that is simply focused on how they will survive in the arena in comparison to a tribute who is focused on how their legacy and humanity will survive.
Katniss even sees the contradictions as she speaks with Peeta, "While I've been ruminating on the availability of trees, Peeta has been struggling with how to maintain his identity.
His purity of self" (142).
Katniss like the twenty-two other tributes is worrying about how she will survive, while Peeta is worrying about how he will die, as himself, in an honorable way.
Although at first Katniss feels a little "inferior" for only thinking about how she will survive, she soon sees Peeta's view point as useless, "Only .
.
.
no offense, but who cares, Peeta" (142)?
Katniss believes that it is useless to worry about what other people believe or see, so the idea of maintaining morals is not a worry of hers.
What Katniss doesn't understand is that Peeta is worried about the perception of himself through his own eyes, not others.
Katniss proves she is only worried of survival when she tells Peeta, "Look, if you want to spend the last hours of your life planning some noble death in the arena, that's your choice.
I want to spend mine in District Twelve" (142).
Katniss is convinced that Peeta is just being self-righteous, and this infuriates her.
For the rest of the night Katniss just thinks about how she loathes Peeta Mellark and how he won't stay true to his mindset, "We will see how high and mighty he is when he's faced with life and death" (143).
Like the other tributes, Katniss knows she will do anything to survive when death approaches her, and she believes Peeta will too.
It is the point of view of Katniss that convinces the reader that Peeta doesn't truly plan on dying a noble death; that it is all smoke and mirrors to help his chances.
If this scene had been from Peeta's point of view, the reader could have known his plan was to protect Katniss in the arena, thus not playing by the Capitol's ways and preserving his humanity through caring about another person's life more than his own.
By studying Peeta's internal warfare over how he will retain his identity while in the arena, we can see how Peeta differs from all other tributes.
Peeta's quest for identity and humanity is important because the Capitol's hopes are to dehumanize the tributes, and these tributes are willing to do anything to survive, even sacrificing their moral beliefs.
The uniqueness of Peeta is what makes him such a great character.
While everyone is worried about how they will survive, including Katniss, Peeta is worried about how his morals and humanity will survive in the hell he is about to enter.
Peeta does find a way to protect his morals and his purity by not worrying about his life, but the life of Katniss.
All in all, the boy with the bread has cast aside being the tribute from District 12 and is becoming Peeta Mellark, a free man.
Peeta shall think freely and act freely, not cave to the pressure of the Capitol, Gamemakers, and other tributes.
Peeta Mellark is a game changer.






Assignment Filename =  025final1.txt
A tribute years earlier than the 74th Hunger Games turned savage within the arena and ate a dead tribute's heart.
Blood dripping down the face of a young boy, a mangled body lying at his feet, and an animalistic look in the eyes of this boy is a perfect symbol of the dehumanization process that takes place from the Hunger Games.
By looking at the tense argument Katniss has with Peeta on the roof, we can see how Peeta is searching for his identity as a person and how he will act within the arena; which is important, because this scene shows that Peeta Mellark is the true rebel, not Katniss.
First off, there lies the question of whether Peeta has given up, accepting death, or maybe there is more to it.
Peeta leads the reader to believe he has completely given up when he says, "I've never been a contender in these Games anyway" (141).
Hopelessness seems to have set in on Peeta as he sees his imminent death approaching.
On the surface it really seems like Peeta is giving up, he even talks about dying as himself, meaning he has accepted death.
Although it seems he has completely given up, if the reader looks closer he/she will see Peeta's true motive.
Peeta knows he will die, because he will protect Katniss and try to help her win.
To Peeta, protecting Katniss is how he will die as himself, it gives his death meaning.
When Peeta says, "[ ] what else am I allowed to care about at this point?
" (142), he realizes Katniss is what he should care about at this point.
Peeta's plan to save Katniss is not known to the reader, because the scene is in Katniss's point of view and Katniss always thinks Peeta is scheming and looking for a way to gain advantage over her.
Had it been in Peeta's point of view the reader could see his intentions.
Through Katniss, the reader sees Peeta's remark, "Give my mother my best when you make it back, will you?
" (142), as a sign that he has given up all hope of winning.
In all reality though, Peeta is saying that Katniss will live and he will die, because her life is more important than his.
So yes, Peeta has accepted death, but it is a death chosen by him and it will be a noble death.
So, how is it rebellious that Peeta is going to die in The Hunger Games?
What difference does it make that he is willing to sacrifice himself?
Peeta is a martyr.
That is why he is rebellious.
The Games are supposed to make each contestant desperate; willing to do anything to survive.
This desperation is what transforms tributes from teenagers to "monsters.
"  The prime example is Titus of District 6 who Katniss informs us turned cannibalistic in a past Game.
Katniss describes Titus as a "beast tribute.
"  These adjectives, monster and beast, illustrate the humanity lost when tributes play The Game.
Katniss and Peeta could use adjectives like awful, terrible, scary, or insane, but those words are too human to describe the results of what happens to tributes that play this Game.
Play, is also a key word here.
Every other tribute has played the Game by the rules of the Game so they can win the Game.
Peeta doesn't want to play their Games, "I keep wishing I could think of a way to to show the Capitol they don't own me.
That I'm more than just a piece in their Games" (142).
Peeta's refusal to play the Game the way the Gamemakers want him to play it is rebellion.
The Gamemakers expects him to fight savagely to save his life so their audience gets a good show, and to keep the Districts in their place.
By refusing to be selfish and by dying with honor, Peeta will prove a point to everyone.
His point is that the Capitol does not own him or any other human being within Panem.
Peeta says, "I want to die as myself" (141), meaning he is going to die a free man proving to all District members across Panem that they needn't follow the rules of the Capitol.
Peeta is willing to die for his beliefs.
Peeta Mellark is a martyr.
Peeta Mellark is a rebel.
The girl on fire, Katniss, a symbol of rebellion against the oppressive Capitol.
I think the opposite.
Katniss is a selfish girl who is complying with the Capitol's Game so she can save her life.
She wasn't planning rebellion, it wasn't a thought when she entered the Games, her life was.
Katniss even admits that she is only thinking of herself when Peeta asks if she has been thinking about her family, "'No,' I admit a bit guiltily.
All I can do is wonder about tomorrow'" (141).
The girl on fire simply thinks about how she will fight tomorrow, while the boy with bread plans on how to prove a point to the Capitol.
Katniss even accepts that she will be a piece in the Game, she doesn't look for another way to play.
When Peeta is figuring out how to show everyone he is more than just a piece in the Game, Katniss says, "'But you're not,' I say.
None of us are.
That's how the Games work'" (142).
Katniss just submits to the Capitol, sacrificing any freedom or individuality like the Districts have for years.
On the other hand, Peeta, is a revolutionist fighting for what is right and not submitting to oppression and evil.
Even though Peeta's intentions are honorable and brave, Katniss tries to shoot down his rebellious thoughts.
When Peeta talks about being an individual, a human, Katniss says, "who cares, Peeta?
" (142).
Katniss doesn't care about freedom, just survival so she can live in a mundane dystopia for the rest of her life, while Peeta wants to die so that his people will have a happier free life devoid of oppression.
By looking at the tense argument Katniss has with Peeta on the roof, we can see how Peeta is searching for his identity as a person and how he will act within the arena; which is important, because this scene shows that Peeta Mellark is the true rebel, not Katniss.
All proof shows that Peeta actually wanted to change the world for the better and revolt against Capitol oppression.
Somehow though, Katniss becomes the Mockingjay and the leader of the revolution.
Also, Katniss has to be convinced to be the Mockingjay, because her selfishness makes her want to not have that kind of responsibility.
Katniss is seen as the one who starts it all with the berries, but days before the berries the seed of rebellion is planted with Peeta's decision.
This decision to play by his own rules and die for his beliefs is what makes Peeta the true rebel in The Hunger Games.
Peeta Mellark is a game changer.






Assignment Filename =  026draft2.txt
Author, Suzanne Collins, and director, Gary Ross, combined together to make the moments after Rue's death into an impactful and truly moving scene.
Both Katniss and District 11 have very interesting reactions to Rue's death that can relate to how the audience feels.
By examining all of the elements that make up this scene of the Hunger Games, we can see that the author and director wanted to make the movie audience into the audience of Panem which is important because it spurs the audience into either wanting to stand up against atrocities like District 11 or change their own terrible views.
It is through the use of sounds such as dialogue and music that make the scene impactful and able to make the audience examine themselves.
Music during this scene sets the mood for Katniss with Rue and the riot.
As the scene begins, the music starts low and slowly builds up.
When the music meets its most powerful crescendo, the riot starts, symbolizing that what happened with Rue and Katniss inspired the riot.
The moment was so impactful, that the District 11 viewers were driven to finally go against the oppressive Capitol and Peacekeepers.
As the scene switches to the District 11 riot, the music switches with it.
The music becomes more eerie and unsettling as chaos ensues.
It gives the moment a very serious and aggressive element.
Also, I wanted to test whether the music really did make a difference in the impact of the scene, so I muted the scene and watched it through again.
When the scene is without sound, it is nowhere near as impactful.
I had chills when I watched it with sound, but without it the scene changed dramatically.
I wasn't pulled in as much without music, and this time no chills.
I even watched it another time through with sound again, and here again came the chills.
There really is no true dialogue in this scene, and I believe this was done for a great purpose.
The lack of dialogue makes it more feeling through imagery and music or silence: The lack of dialogue makes us feel more through imagery, music, and silence.
It is so emotional that there is nothing to be said, only actions to be completed and emotions to be felt.
The only dialogue is Katniss whispering "Im sorry" to Rue as she sobs over her little dead body.
This small dialogue makes is the perfect amount, because nothing needs to be said.
Katniss wishes she could save Rue, but ultimately it is the Capitol's fault Rue is dead.
Another element that helps the makers of the movie complete their purpose is the filming of the scene.
The simplicity of different shots really creates an impactful experience by getting us close to the scene, putting us in the scene, and putting us in the seats of Panem audience members.
The usage of close up angles of Katniss holding and crying over Rue shows the true anguish of Katniss and the close relationship Katniss had developed over Rue.
You can read the emotions on Katniss' face, and connect with her emotions.
Connecting with Katniss on an emotional level has been so difficult most of the movie due to her harsh personality, but here you truly do share her sorrow.
The scene has a few high angles that when you stop to think about it, are the cameras that are within the trees in the arena.
Thus we become the audience of the Hunger Games, watching these kids fight for their life and rooting on the characters we like just as Panemians would.
For example, the shot of Katniss holding the three fingers up transitions us to District 11 as they see the same shot on their screen, connecting us with the District 11 audience.
The use of point of view angles creates a great affect to the scene.
Instead of watching the riot from afar, we are in the midst of it.
We are watching people tip over metal containers of grain, break Capitol property, and attack Peacekeepers from the eyes of a person in the riot.
We gain the emotions of the rioters then, and sympathize with them.
The final element that accomplishes the mission of the director and writers is the visual aspects of the scene.
The simple image of a young little girl lying on the ground dead is enough to bring emotions out of any human being.
It is the innocence and purity of children that makes us cringe when those qualities are disrupted or those children are mistreated.
In this scene it is the death of this sweet, pure, young girl that causes her district to riot against the corrupt government that caused her early death.
Just like these rioters, we should continue to be moved by any atrocities upon children, and never let abuse to children go by without a word or action.
Also, the action of this movie is pretty exciting; fighting, chasing, the use of weapons all add to the excitement.
Then a moment like Rue's death happens.
All of sudden, the Hunger Games have become hard to watch, unenjoyable, and infuriating.
How could anyone let a little girl die like this?
These feelings are exactly what this scene should bring out.
We shouldn't enjoy any of the bloodshed, we should be disgusted and against it.
When we watch people rioting and taking to action, it is inspiring.
The rioters have been moved to action, they aren't just sitting around anymore.
So as the audience watches this, they should be inspired to action over what they view is wrong.
If District 11 will oppose an all-powerful government with a sliver of hope of actually changing anything for the better, then so should we.
The riot scene is definitely meant to connect the audience to real life moments, like civil rights protesting.
The Peace Keepers come to District 11 with swat teams and hoses.
As mass chaos ensues the Peace Keepers hose down the district dwellers and beat them back with batons and shields.
The image of civil rights protesters being hosed down and having dogs set on them caused the world to throw up in their mouth a little and then speak out against the brutal acts.
These strong visuals really cause us as an audience to be spurred to action against the evil and sad situations of our own world.
The elements and direction that Suzanne Collins and Gary Ross used and went created the best scene of the movie.
Placing us into the Panem audience and making us feel the emotions of Katniss, District 11, and Capitol viewers was astounding.
The scene varied from the earlier scenes to make this scene noticeable since it is the most important one of the movie.
No other scene can convince us to examine ourselves the way this one did.
In earlier scenes there was really no music and most of the issues were how to look good or stay alive, but this one changed direction quickly.
We become more aware of our own viewpoints and look internally into ourselves as Katniss and District 11 inspire us.
These elements inserted into this scene created an incredible scene that touched much deeper than surface level and was not for shear entertainment.






Assignment Filename =  026final2.txt
Author, Suzanne Collins, and director, Gary Ross, collaborated to make the moments during and after Rue's death into an impactful and truly moving scene.
Both Katniss and District 11 have very interesting reactions to Rue's death that can relate to how the audience feels.
By examining all of the elements that make up this scene of the Hunger Games, we can see that the author and director wanted to make the movie audience into the audience of Panem which is important because it spurs the audience into either wanting to stand up against atrocities like District 11 or change their own terrible views.
It is through the use of sounds such as dialogue and music that make the scene impactful and able to make the audience examine themselves.
Music during this scene sets the mood for Katniss with Rue and the riot.
As the scene begins, the music starts low and slowly builds up.
When the music meets its most powerful crescendo, the riot starts, symbolizing that what happened with Rue and Katniss inspired the riot.
The moment was so impactful, that the District 11 viewers were driven to finally go against the oppressive Capitol and Peacekeepers.
As the scene switches to the District 11 riot, the music switches with it.
The music becomes more eerie and unsettling as chaos ensues.
It gives the moment a very serious and aggressive element.
There really is no true dialogue in this scene, and I believe this was done for a great purpose.
The lack of dialogue makes it more feeling through imagery and music or silence: The lack of dialogue makes us feel more through imagery, music, and silence.
It is so emotional that there is nothing to be said, only actions to be completed and emotions to be felt.
The only dialogue is Katniss whispering "Im sorry" to Rue as she sobs over her little dead body.
This small dialogue makes is the perfect amount, because nothing needs to be said.
Katniss wishes she could save Rue, but ultimately it is the Capitol's fault Rue is dead.
Another element that helps the makers of the movie complete their purpose is the filming of the scene.
The simplicity of different shots really creates an impactful experience by getting us close to the scene, putting us in the scene, and putting us in the seats of Panem audience members.
The usage of close up angles of Katniss holding and crying over Rue shows the true anguish of Katniss and the close relationship Katniss had developed over Rue.
You can read the emotions on Katniss' face, and connect with her emotions.
Connecting with Katniss on an emotional level has been so difficult most of the movie due to her harsh personality, but here you truly do share her sorrow.
The scene has a few high angles that when you stop to think about it, are the cameras that are within the trees in the arena.
Thus we become the audience of the Hunger Games, watching these kids fight for their life and rooting on the characters we like just as Panemians would.
For example, the shot of Katniss holding the three fingers up transitions us to District 11 as they see the same shot on their screen, connecting us with the District 11 audience.
The use of point of view angles creates a great affect to the scene.
Instead of watching the riot from afar, we are in the midst of it.
We are watching people tip over metal containers of grain, break Capitol property, and attack Peacekeepers from the eyes of a person in the riot.
We gain the emotions of the rioters then, and sympathize with them.
The final element that accomplishes the mission of the director and writers is the visual aspects of the scene.
The simple image of a young little girl lying on the ground dead is enough to bring emotions out of any human being.
It is the innocence and purity of children that makes us cringe when those qualities are disrupted or those children are mistreated.
In this scene it is the death of this sweet, pure, young girl that causes her district to riot against the corrupt government that caused her early death.
Just like these rioters, we should continue to be moved by any atrocities upon children, and never let abuse to children go by without a word or action.
Also, the action of this movie is pretty exciting; fighting, chasing, the use of weapons all add to the excitement.
Then a moment like Rue's death happens.
All of sudden, the Hunger Games have become hard to watch, unenjoyable, and infuriating.
How could anyone let a little girl die like this?
These feelings are exactly what this scene should bring out.
We shouldn't enjoy any of the bloodshed; we should be disgusted by it.
When we watch people rioting and taking to action, it is inspiring.
The rioters have been moved to action, they aren't just sitting around anymore.
So as the audience watches this, they should be inspired to action over what they view is wrong.
If District 11 will oppose an all-powerful government with a sliver of hope of actually changing anything for the better, then so should we.
The riot scene is definitely meant to connect the audience to real life moments, like civil rights protesting.
The Peace Keepers come to District 11 with swat teams and hoses.
As mass chaos ensues the Peace Keepers hose down the district dwellers and beat them back with batons and shields.
The image of civil rights protesters being hosed down and having dogs set on them caused the world to throw up in their mouth a little and then speak out against the brutal acts.
These strong visuals really cause us as an audience to be spurred to action against the evil and sad situations of our own world.
The elements and direction that Suzanne Collins and Gary Ross used and went created the best scene of the movie.
Placing us into the Panem audience and making us feel the emotions of Katniss, District 11, and Capitol viewers was astounding.
The scene varied from the earlier scenes to make this scene noticeable since it is the most important one of the movie.
No other scene can convince us to examine ourselves the way this one did.
In earlier scenes there was really no music and most of the issues were how to look good or stay alive, but this one changed direction quickly.
We become more aware of our own viewpoints and look internally into ourselves as Katniss and District 11 inspire us.
These elements inserted into this scene created an incredible scene that touched much deeper than surface level and was not for shear entertainment.






Assignment Filename =  027draft3.txt
Did you know that sex slavery was recognized as a war crime under international law in 2002?
How did it take us so long to recognize this as a crime against human nature?
Suzanne Collins uses her The Hunger Games trilogy to shed light on a number of real world atrocities that have occurred or are taking place today in our own world.
We see allusions to today's economic inequalities, traumatized war veterans, corrupt governments, and another atrocity that Collins finally touches on in Mockingjay, human trafficking.
Human trafficking is the selling of people for sexual exploitation, and is a very real issue.
The character that is the symbol of human trafficking in The HungerGames is Finnick Odair.
By looking at Finnick's past of sexual slavery, we can see that Collins is trying to show the prominence of human trafficking that is present and how we must take more action against it; this is important because sex slavery has existed for thousands of years and is not viewed as big an issue as other crimes.
The people of Panem have such a lack of respect for human beings that they are simply looking for their selfish wants to be met.
Panemians want power, feasts, money, clothes, drugs, and the instant gratification of sexual intercourse.
To the beasts of Panem, sex is simply for pleasure not a beautiful act saved for a married couple.
The people of the Capitol simply want the feeling that comes with sex, but is that so unheard of?
Don't many people in the world want atleast some of these wants.
Society today chases money, power, and sex.
Just look at some students that go to the University of South Carolina; some want to get an education so they can make the big bucks, some want the education so they can run a company or be important in the world, and some are looking for sex with as many partners as possible when they go out to party.
Not all students do that, but there is definitely a decent amount of students who want that.
We read The Hunger Games and say, "this could never happen," but a number of these atrocities actually do take place.
Human trafficking is a very real subject in today's world and in past times.
An interesting connection between Finnick's situation and the history of human trafficking is that in human trafficking children are sought after, and Finnick won the Games as a young boy and was forced into sexual slavery.
Collins is trying to show how child trafficking is a scary and very real issue in the world, and also in the United States.
According to (place source) the United States is statistically one of the top three places in the world where sex trafficking takes place.
Statistics are tough to gage because it is such an underground business, but I have read estimated numbers that the profit from human trafficking is between 7 billion U.S. dollars and 31.6 billion U.S. dollars.
That kind of uncertain gap shows just how shady and unknown human trafficking is, and those large figures shows how large of a crime industry it really is.
It is said the human trafficking is the third largest crime industry behind arms and drug trafficking.
Not to mention it is the fastest growing criminal industry as we speak, and one of the most dehumanizing.
A very real connection can be placed between a woman, Melissa Woodward, who had been forced into sex slavery as a young girl and Finnick Odair.
Melissa at the age of 12 was sold to clients on a daily basis and describes the experience in a similar fashion to Finnick.
Melissa describes the way she was treated by those who bought her, "You get lavished with so many gifts and get treated like you're a piece of property.
"  Finnick says something similar, "To make themselves feel better, my patrons would make presents of money or jewelry [ ]" (page 170).
This is a very valid description Finnick has given about being a sex slave, and the connections don't stop there.
Finnick describes why he was forced into prostitution; "'President Snow used to sell me  my body, that is,' Finnick begins in a flat, removed tone.
I wasn't the only one.
If a victor is considered desirable, the president gives them as a reward or allows people to buy them for an exorbitant amount of money.
If you refuse, he kills someone you love.
So you do it'" (page 170).
Finnick was forced through the threat of harm to his loved ones if he didn't comply so he had to agree with President Snow's sick decree.
Melissa like Finnick was threatened, but not towards her loved ones, just herself.
Melissa was beaten, burned, and drugged during her life as a slave.
She only complied because she feared for her life.
It is scary how this dystopia of Panem is seen as fiction, but is truly very tangible.






Assignment Filename =  027final3.txt
Did you know that sex slavery was recognized as a war crime under international law in 2002?
How did it take us so long to recognize this as a crime against human nature?
Suzanne Collins uses her The Hunger Games trilogy to shed light on a number of real world atrocities that have occurred or are taking place today in our own world.
We see allusions to today's economic inequalities, traumatized war veterans, corrupt governments, and another atrocity that Collins finally touches on in Mockingjay, human trafficking.
Human trafficking is the selling of people for sexual exploitation, and is a very real issue.
The character that is the symbol of human trafficking in The HungerGames is Finnick Odair.
By looking at Finnick's past of sexual slavery, we can see that Collins is trying to show the prominence of human trafficking that is present and how we must take more action against it; this is important because sex slavery has existed for thousands of years and is not viewed as big an issue as other crimes.
Disgust is easy to find when looking at the Capitol from the outside, but when you pull back the curtain you'd probably vomit.
Finnick is the one who brings to light all of the hidden evils of the Capitol through his payment as a sex slave.
Secrets, are what Finnick receives for his nights of being used, and he finally gets his revenge as he spills these secrets to all of Panem, "Tales of strange sexual appetites, betrayals of the heart, bottomless greed, and bloody power plays [ ] charges of incest, back-stabbing, blackmail, and arson" (171).
The crimes that were "whispered over damp pillow cases in the dead of night" (171), are appalling and unbelievable.
Yet, they are believable.
Humans have committed these crimes for years, and Collins makes the Capitol-polians a more obvious version of the dark side of people.
Tiger Woods, a world famous golfer, was a married man who had it all, turns out he was cheating on his wife with tons of women and in weird ways.
Tiger would fall into the strange sexual appetites, as well as betrayals of the heart category of a Capitol member.
Bernie Madoff, scammed thousands of investors out of billions of dollars for his own greed.
These are just two examples of real life people who commit crimes like those in the Capitol.
All of these terrible accusations are existant in our world now, including the worst one, human trafficking.
It is through Finnick that Collins points out to the reader that human trafficking is an appalling crime that we need to fight.
Most readers would look at The Hunger Games and say, "this could never happen," but a number of these atrocities actually do take place.
Human trafficking is a very real subject in today's world, and in times past.
An interesting connection between Finnick's situation and the history of human trafficking is that in human trafficking children are sought after, and Finnick as a young teenage boy was forced into sexual slavery.
Collins is illustrating how child trafficking is a frightening and very real issue throughout the world, even in the United States.
According to Weave Inc the United States is statistically one of the top three places in the world where sex trafficking takes place.
Statistics are tough to gage since human trafficking is an underground business, but there are estimated numbers that the profit from human trafficking is between 7 billion U.S. dollars and 32 billion U.S. dollars.
That kind of uncertain gap shows just how shady and unknown human trafficking is, and those large figures shows how large of a crime industry it really is.
It is said the human trafficking is the third largest crime industry behind arms and drug trafficking.
Not to mention it is the fastest growing criminal industry as we speak, and one of the most dehumanizing.
Finnicks revelation to the reader is one of shock and anguish.
It hurts the reader to hear Finnick tell us, "'President Snow used to sell me  my body, that is,' Finnick begins in a flat, removed tone.
I wasn't the only one.
If a victor is considered desirable, the president gives them as a reward or allows people to buy them for an exorbitant amount of money.
" (page 170).
Every reader's heart cries out in pity as we can see just by the way Finnick says he was sold is so damaging and painful for Finnick.
Finnick has been keeping this secret of his in for so long, and when he finally reveals it he slowly says it and is described as talking in a removed tone.
A moment like this is so powerful, that it is a great way for Collins to gain the readers sympathy for not only Finnick but everyone who falls victim to a similar situation.
And in our world, there are similar stories to Finnicks.
A very real connection can be placed between a woman, Melissa Woodward, who had been forced into sex slavery as a young girl and Finnick.
Melissa at the age of 12 was sold to clients on a daily basis and describes the experience in a similar fashion to Finnick.
Melissa describes the way she was treated by those who bought her, "You get lavished with so many gifts and get treated like you're a piece of property.
"  Finnick says something similar, "To make themselves feel better, my patrons would make presents of money or jewelry [ ]" (page 170).
The way both Melissa and Finnick talk about their experience shows how human trafficking is an issue that turns people into an item for another's pleasure.
Not only was it awful that Finnick was forced into sexual slavery, but the manipulation that took place is just as bad.
First, it must be clear that Finnick was not the only winner of the Games to be sold, and that he and his fellow winners were frightened into complying with Snow's selling of them.
Threats against family and loved ones is how Snow manipulated his prized possesions, and Haymitch was the perfect example of what would happen if they crossed Snow.
Haymitch's family and girlfriend were killed two weeks after he won the Games in which he had used the arena's force field as a weapon which didn't sit well with Snow, "I was the example.
The person to hold up to the young Finnicks and Johannas and Cashmeres.
Of what could happen to a victor who caused problems" (172-173).
Haymitch really was the perfect person to scare the winners into Snow's submission.
A man who lost everyone he loved, turned to alcohol, and became a man who obviously had no reason to live anymore, that is what the winners saw.
Melissa, like all of the winners, was threatened, but not towards her loved ones, just herself.
Melissa was beaten, burned, and drugged during her life as a slave.
She only complied because she feared for her life.
It is scary how this dystopia of Panem is seen as fiction, but is truly very tangible.
If Suzanne Collins wants to get her audience to support the fight against human trafficking the question is how can the reader help?
There are organizations that can help save these children and adults who are forced into human trafficking, so the reader can help join or just donate.
Also, if a reader would like to start up their own organization that would be incredible as well.
As a whole everyone must stand up against the allowance of human trafficking anywhere within the world and to support a stronger fight against this crime.
Stories like Finnicks and the movie Taken are symbols to their audience that push for this fight, and thankfully it has made these issue more known to the public.  








Assignment Filename =  028draft4.txt
We are all afraid of something; death, failure, intimacy, pain, darkness.
No matter how brave someone appears, there is something in their world that can scare the living daylights out of him/her.
Fear is gripping, it can immobilize us in an instant, but in life we learn to deal with our fears.
By looking at Roth's and Collins' use of fear in Divergent and The Hunger Games, we can see how Tris learns to conquer fear through fear landscapes while Katniss lives in fear and rationality disappears by the jabberjays; which is important, because Roth retells Collins' use of fear with her own twist that teaches the reader to conquer his/her fear, not to fall victim to it.
There are many similarities between the jabberjay scene and the fear landscape scene that makes Roth's scene resemble a retelling of Collins'.
Both of the scenes deal with a fear that is not actually happening, but a simulation instead.
In Catching Fire, Katniss and Finnick face the fear of a loved one in peril, but these loved ones are not actually there being tortured.
It is through the use of jabberjays that these sounds of terror are elicited to Collins' characters, and Katniss must convince herself and Finnick it isn't real, "It's just a jabberjay.
They're playing a trick on us, [ ] It's not real" (Catching Fire, 342).
The screams are just a simulation performed by a mutated bird, yet they are so real to Katniss and Finnick.
It seems that Roth then wanted to use simulations to show the fear a character has so they can fight those fears.
In Divergent, the simulated fear takes place in the fear landscapes which are developed for initiates to fight their fears and be brave.
Tris while in the fear landscape says, "Simulation.
This is a simulation.
My heart hammering in my chest" (Divergent, 391), so even though she knows the danger is not real the fear is still happening which is shown by her heart pounding.
The biggest fear Katniss has is that harm or death will come to her little sister Prim.
It is obvious as she is always protecting her sister, especially when she first takes Prim's place in the Hunger Games.
This fear is so strong that when Katniss hears Prim's screams in the woods, she loses all rationality and chases the sound into the woods.
When Katniss finds out that the jabberjays copy sounds and Katniss believes that they must have tortured Prim she is crushed, "My knees turn to water and I sink to the ground.
Finnick is trying to tell me something, but I can't hear him" (Catching Fire 342).
Katniss is breaking in front of the audience in Panem and in front of the readers.
So not only are the readers getting the message that fear should crush you, but all rebellious district members looking for hope see their symbol of hope losing herself to fear.
Katniss is supposed to be a symbol of strength, so why would Collins show fear crush her this much instead of showing Katniss regain control of herself and keep fighting on.
Collins even shows the weakness in Katniss mind as Katniss thinks, "I have an image of Prim in a white room, strapped to a table, while masked, robed figures elicit those sounds from her" (Catching Fire 342).
Katniss is fully affected by these jabberjays, they have paralyzed her both mentally and physically through fear.
Collins use of fear is effective, but Roth retells it in a much more inspirational way.
Within Divergent, there are many scenes that show a character facing their fears.
When Tobias climbs the ferris wheel with Tris he is facing his fear of heights.
Tori tatoos a black bird on her to remind her of her fear of darkness.
Tris, has to face her fears in real life and in a number of simulations.
The best scene to examine Tris fighting fear is during her fear landscapes.
That scene provides us with Roth's point that we can overcome fear despite how paralyzing or scary fear can be to us.
While in the fear landscape, Tris encounters her seven biggest fears and must overcome each of them.
Bird swarm, drowning in a tank, drowning in a raging ocean, burned at the stake, kidnapping with intent of murder, intimacy, and having to shoot her parents and brother.
Fears like these are insanely frightening, and somehow Tris has to overcome these fears in a short amount of time.
Roth shows us through Tris fighting her fears that if this little girl can overcome her biggest fears, so can anyone else.
David R. Saliba has a perfect definition of fear that matches to our main characters, "Fear is the emotional response to the perception of an alternating loss of control and regaining of control.
By 'control' I mean any conscious act of mind and body.
The alternation between control and lack of it must occur in varying degrees of intensity and inconsistent periods of time.
This alternation insures an element of surprise and keeps the perceiver off balance emotionally so that he cannot construct a set of mental expectations and thereby reimpose control.
"

Both Katniss and Tris face perfect examples of Saliba's description of fear.
Katniss is surprised by the screams of Prim that come without warning.
Her being surprised causes her to lose control of her situation and she runs towards the screams to regain control.
Sadly, by trying to regain control, she puts Finnick and herself in a life threatening situation.
Fear has gripped Katniss and lead her into a probable death; Collins shows how fear has hindered Katniss and caused Katniss to fall victim to the surprise.
Roth's use of fear is much more inspiring in how Tris deals with her fears.
Tris can assume a few of her fears, but a few of them are surprising and new to her in the fear landscape.
So, if anyone were to argue that Tris knew what she was up against and Katniss was just thrown into her fear randomly, that is valid but false.
Yes, there a few situations that Tris faced during the simulations, but there are a few completely new ones as well.
When Tris opposes the faceless mangled men that try to kidnap her at her Abnegation home Tris says, "I have never faced this fear before" (390).
This new fear doesn't cause Tris to crumple like Katniss did, she regains control and beats her fear.
No matter the fear, Tris finds a way to conquer her fears and regain control.








Assignment Filename =  028final4.txt
We are all afraid of something; death, failure, intimacy, pain, darkness.
No matter how brave someone appears, there is something in their world that can scare the living daylights out of him/her.
Fear is gripping, it can immobilize us in an instant, but in life we learn to deal with our fears.
By looking at Roth's and Collins' use of fear in Divergent and The Hunger Games, we can see how Tris learns to conquer fear through fear landscapes while Katniss lives in fear and rationality disappears by the jabberjays; which is important, because Roth retells Collins' use of fear with her own twist that teaches the reader to conquer his/her fear, not to fall victim to it.
There are many similarities between the jabberjay scene and the fear landscape scene that makes Roth's scene resemble a retelling of Collins'.
Both of the scenes deal with a fear that is not actually happening, but a simulation instead.
In Catching Fire, Katniss and Finnick face the fear of a loved one in peril, but these loved ones are not actually there being tortured.
It is through the use of jabberjays that these sounds of terror are elicited to Collins' characters, and Katniss must convince herself and Finnick it isn't real, "It's just a jabberjay.
They're playing a trick on us, [ ] It's not real" (Catching Fire, 342).
The screams are just a simulation performed by a mutated bird, yet they are so real to Katniss and Finnick.
It seems that Roth then wanted to use simulations to show the fear a character has so they can fight those fears.
In Divergent, the simulated fear takes place in the fear landscapes which are developed for initiates to fight their fears and be brave.
Tris while in the fear landscape says, "Simulation.
This is a simulation.
My heart hammering in my chest" (Divergent, 391), so even though she knows the danger is not real the fear is still happening which is shown by her heart pounding.
The biggest fear Katniss has is that harm or death will come to her little sister Prim.
It is obvious as she is always protecting her sister, especially when she first takes Prim's place in the Hunger Games.
This fear is so strong that when Katniss hears Prim's screams in the woods, she loses all rationality and chases the sound into the woods.
When Katniss finds out that the jabberjays copy sounds and Katniss believes that they must have tortured Prim she is crushed, "My knees turn to water and I sink to the ground.
Finnick is trying to tell me something, but I can't hear him" (Catching Fire, 342).
Katniss is breaking in front of the audience in Panem and in front of the readers.
So not only are the readers getting the message that fear should crush you, but all rebellious district members looking for hope see their symbol of hope losing herself to fear.
Katniss is supposed to be a symbol of strength, so why would Collins show fear hinder her this much instead of showing Katniss regain control of herself and keep fighting on.
Collins even shows the weakness in Katniss mind as Katniss thinks, "I have an image of Prim in a white room, strapped to a table, while masked, robed figures elicit those sounds from her" (Catching Fire, 342).
Katniss is fully affected by these jabberjays, they have paralyzed her both mentally and physically through fear.
Collins use of fear is effective, but Roth retells it in a much more inspirational way.
Within Divergent, there are many scenes that show a character facing their fears.
When Tobias climbs the ferris wheel with Tris he is facing his fear of heights.
Tori tatoos a black bird on her to remind her of her fear of darkness.
Tris, has to face her fears in real life and in a number of simulations.
The best scene to examine Tris fighting fear is during her fear landscapes.
That scene provides us with Roth's point that we can overcome fear despite how paralyzing or scary fear can be to us.
While in the fear landscape, Tris encounters her seven biggest fears and must overcome each of them.
Bird swarm, drowning in a tank, drowning in a raging ocean, burned at the stake, kidnapping with intent of murder, intimacy, and having to shoot her parents and brother.
Fears like these are insanely frightening, and somehow Tris has to overcome these fears in a short amount of time.
Tris knows she can't be hindered by her fears saying, "I have to face the fear.
I have to take control of the situation and find a way to make it less frightening" (Divergent, 394).
Tris knows she can thrive in the face of fear because she never lets it control her.
Not only does she show bravery by fighting fear, but also by being brave and selfless.
Tris reveals her biggest fear, "My worst fear: that my family will die, and that I will be responsible" (Divergent, 395).
Tris under this fear is given the option to kill her family or die, instead she turns the gun on herself and pulls the trigger.
Sacrificing herself for her family is one of the bravest things anyone can do, and it is her Tris shows her selflessness.
Roth shows us through Tris fighting her fears that if this little girl can overcome her biggest fears, so can anyone else.
David R. Saliba has a perfect definition of fear that matches to our main characters, "Fear is the emotional response to the perception of an alternating loss of control and regaining of control.
By 'control' I mean any conscious act of mind and body.
The alternation between control and lack of it must occur in varying degrees of intensity and inconsistent periods of time.
This alternation insures an element of surprise and keeps the perceiver off balance emotionally so that he cannot construct a set of mental expectations and thereby reimpose control" (Psychology of fear 5).
Both Katniss and Tris face perfect examples of Saliba's description of fear.
Katniss is surprised by the screams of Prim that come without warning.
Her being surprised causes her to lose control of her situation and she runs towards the screams to regain control.
Sadly, by trying to regain control, she puts Finnick and herself in a life threatening situation.
Fear has gripped Katniss and lead her into a probable death; Collins shows how fear has hindered Katniss and caused Katniss to fall victim to the surprise.
Roth's use of fear is much more inspiring in how Tris deals with her fears.
Tris can assume a few of her fears, but a few of them are surprising and new to her in the fear landscape.
So, if anyone were to argue that Tris knew what she was up against and Katniss was just thrown into her fear randomly, that is valid but false.
Yes, there a few situations that Tris faced during the simulations, but there are a few completely new ones as well.
When Tris opposes the faceless mangled men that try to kidnap her at her Abnegation home Tris says, "I have never faced this fear before" (Divergent, 390).
This new fear doesn't cause Tris to crumple like Katniss did, she regains control and beats her fear.
No matter the fear, Tris finds a way to conquer her fears and regain control.
President Franklin Roosevelt in his first inaugural address said, "We have nothing to fear but fear itself.
"  Roth seems to have taken Roosevelt's words and applied it to Divergent.
Readers must learn that the only fear he/she should have is being hindered in life by a fear.
Katniss and Collins taught the reader otherwise, but thankfully Roth was able to send a much better message.
So anyone who fears something in this world, go out and conquer it.
And even if you can't conquer it, atleast fight it.
Never let fear control life, instead control fear and enjoy life. 








Assignment Filename =  029draft1.txt
There are many obvious reasons as to why Suzanne Collins' The Hunger Games has rapidly swept across the nation.
The basic premise is enough to draw in even the most apathetic of readers.
However, a novel idea is not enough to permit books flying off the shelf at such an expeditious pace.
What sets, The Hunger Games, apart from many other novels are the brilliant levels of complexity Collins has built into every aspect of her writing.
Not only does she go into great detail about their world and surroundings, but also about the person that lies within every character she creates.
One sequence that truly reveals the complexity within the primary character Katniss Everdeen are the events that unfold during the feast at the cornucopia.
By looking at the contradictions and similarities that exist within Katniss' demeanor, we gain immeasurable insight into the truth that underlies her character; this is important because the different levels that exist within basic human nature and instinct are unfolded.
Anyone that knows of Katniss Everdeen knows her to be a fighter, one who is driven by the will to survive.
For the first part of the passage it is abundantly clear that a survivor is how Collins meant for her to be portrayed.
There are not many who could run and "position [their] next arrow automatically.
"(284) Yet, when it comes to a character like Katniss, the will to survive is a second nature.
One could argue that her ability to position an arrow and run simultaneously is merely proof of her ability to hunt.
In spite of this, the ability to apply hunting skills while you yourself are being hunted, proves nothing short of a keen human instinct to utilize any and every chance you have of survival.
Even when death under the blade of a knife seems inevitable, her will to keep up the fight fails to subside "as long as we're talking I'm alive.
Peeta!"(284.
) Katniss screams.
When her physical strength failed her, Katniss immediately switched gears and used her wit in an attempt to unsettle and outsmart Clove.
The ability to use her intelligence in the face of an almost certain death indicates she is determined to keep up the fight.
Only a certain kind of person is able to demonstrate such immense control over their emotions in the face of death.
Katniss' ability to maintain self-discipline is possible because of her obsession with the need to fight until the last second, "I will stare her down I will not cry out, I will die undefeated.
"(286) Her fixation on surviving, keeping up the fight, and making a final act of rebellion is a testament to her instinct.
For most, this would be the point of complete and utter panic.
Even though her only means of rebellion are not to scream out in agony when she is stabbed, that one act of defiance allows her to make the statement that she will never give up.
All of the self-control and will to live that Katniss has shown demonstrates her motivation is survival.
Every thought that passes through her mind is available to us.
The fact that Katniss acts solely on her instinct is obvious because she knows her time to be limited, the only weapons she has are those that come as a second nature to her.
It is fairly obvious that Suzanne Collins has portrayed Katniss as a person with an immense human instinct for survival.
Up until this point, it is possible that one might think Katniss' human nature is indistinguishable from her instinct.
However, when Katniss' fate falls from the hands of Clove and into the hands of Thresh, Katniss looses her entire sense of control and her instinct to fight for survival.
In comparison to her interactions with Clove, her interactions with Thresh reveal a deeper part of her character, her human nature.
Throughout her interaction with Clove, Katniss clearly took advantage of every opportunity she had to fight, both mentally and physically.
On the contrary, Katniss' interactions with Thresh show her relying on what can only be assumed is the true human nature within her character, emotion.
Collins truly unravels the depth that lies within Katniss character when she writes of the events that unfold after Thresh arrives at the Cornucopia.
The first indication she gives that something within Katniss has changed, comes during the brief period of interaction between Clove and Thresh.
Based on her instinct to survive, the readers would assume Katniss to take off running, not to stop and question why her life was spared.
Instead, Katniss uncharacteristically stays and commentates on the situation, "When he shouts, I jump.
"(286) What makes this simple line so important is that it demonstrates that Katniss is lacking her basic survival instinct.
The survivor instinct within Katniss would never allow her to stay around long enough to be startled, much less show it by jumping.
Failing to take full advantage of her situation immediately indicates that Katniss is no longer relying on her instinct to survive.
More important than Katniss' lack of instinct, is the moment when she allows the true emotional nature of her character to ring through.
What may be the most surprising sentence of the passage, "Tears spring in my eyes," (288) gives way to the emotions that outshine Katniss tough survivalist exterior.
It is apparent to the reader that Katniss has lost her grip when she explains her overflow of emotions, "I'm overwhelmed by Rue, the pain in my head, and my fear of Thresh.
" (288) The line alone gives proof of the immense change that has taken place in Katniss' demeanor since her interaction with Clove.
In addition to Rue's death, Clove also brought up Peeta and threw the knife causing the pain in her head.
Logically, the reader would expect Katniss' last interaction with Clove to be the one to cause an emotional outpour.
However, the underlying cause goes far beyond logic and touches on basic human nature, emotion.
When Katniss was saved from what she felt certain was her fate, she was stripped of her instinct and left with nothing but her basic human nature.
This basic human nature explains why Katniss was overcome with such an overflow of emotions.
The shock Katniss experienced was so drastic that it threw her entire survivalist mindset, leaving her with nothing to hold her guard up.
The final indication Collins gives us of Katniss' instability comes from Katniss herself.
As she is leaving the scene that she felt sure she would never come out of alive, Katniss describes herself as, "fleeing like the wild, wounded creature I am.
"(289) This line is so pivotal because it reveals the magnitude of difference that exists between Katniss and her former self.
With Clove, one thing that always remained clear, was that Katniss would never give in or admit defeat.
In contrast, Katniss has just left the scene and proclaimed she was indeed defeated.
Emotions are a basic part of human nature and Collins makes it apparent that Katniss allows hers to get the best of her.
Initially Katniss' will to survive enabled her to channel those emotions in a constructive way.
Collins showed us that Katniss was a character who had grown to expect to struggle and to have to fight for survival.
Therefore, fighting came as a basic instinct for her.
On the contrary, one thing Katniss did not expect was for her life to be saved by another.
Clearly Collins wanted the readers to realize that what unsettled Katniss was her disbelief that she was alive.
This instance enabled Collins to reveal so much insight into the emotional side of Katniss character, allowing her to be someone that the readers could relate to.
Ultimately the message is that there are many levels that exist within every person.
When it comes down to it, the one thing that is common among all humans is emotion.








Assignment Filename =  029final1.txt
There are many obvious reasons as to why Suzanne Collins' The Hunger Games has rapidly swept across the nation.
The basic premise is enough to draw in even the most apathetic of readers.
However, a novel idea is not enough to permit books flying off the shelf at such an expeditious pace.
What sets The Hunger Games apart from many other novels, are the brilliant levels of complexity that exist within every aspect of the novel.
Not only does Collins go into great detail about the world and surroundings, but also about the person that lies within every character she creates.
A sequence that reveals the true complexity within the primary character, Katniss Everdeen, takes place as the interactions relating to the feast at the cornucopia begin to unfold.
By examining the contradictions and similarities that exist within Katniss' demeanor, we gain immeasurable insight into the truth that underlies her character; this is important because the different levels that exist within basic human instinct and human nature are unfolded.
Anyone that knows of Katniss Everdeen knows she is characterized by her ability to fight, instinct to survive.
For the first part of the passage it is abundantly clear that Collins purposefully portrayed Katniss as a survivor.
Not many possess the ability run and simultaneously "position [their] next arrow"(284).
Yet, when it comes to a character like Katniss, the instinct to survive is a second nature.
One could argue that her ability to position an arrow and run simultaneously is merely proof of her ability to hunt.
However, the ability to effortlessly instinct to utilize any means necessary survival.
Even when death under the blade of a knife seems inevitable, Katniss' will to fight remains unchanged.
Immediately switching gears when her physical strength fails her, "as long as we're talking I'm alive.
Peeta!
"(284) she screams.
Katniss uses quick wit in an attempt to outsmart Clove.
The ability to maintain intelligence in the face of almost certain death indicates self-discipline and an extreme sense of determination.
For Katniss this is a direct effect of her survivalist mentality and obsession with defeating Clove.
For most, the failed attempt to outsmart Clove would be the point of complete and utter panic.
However, Clove's comments about rue only drive Katniss' will and determination to keep up the fight, "I will stare her down I will not cry out, I will die undefeated"(286).
Her fixation on keeping up the fight and making this final act of rebellion is a testament to the rage towards Clove that's driving her instincts.
Even though her only means of rebellion are not to scream out in agony when she is stabbed, that one final weapon of defiance allows her to believe in spite of her death, she never accepted defeat.
All of the self-control and will to live that Katniss shows demonstrates  survival is her motivation.
The fact that Katniss acts solely on her instinct is apparent because she knows her time is limited, the only weapons she has are those that come as second nature.
It is quite evident that Suzanne Collins portrays Katniss as a person with an immense instinct for survival.
Up until this point, any variance that exists between Katniss' human nature and instict is indistinguishable.
However, when Katniss' fate unexpectedly falls from the hands of Clove upon Thresh's arrival, her entire sense of control and instinct to fight is lost.
In comparison to her interactions with Clove, her interactions with Thresh reveal a deeper part of her character which exists beyond her compulsive instinct to survive, human nature.
Throughout her interactions with Clove, Katniss clearly takes advantage of every opportunity she has to fight, both mentally and physically.
In contrast, her interactions with Thresh show her relying on what can only be assumed is the true nature  of her character, emotion.
maintain
The depth within Katniss character truly begins to unravel upon Thresh's arrival to the Cornucopia.
The brief period of interaction between Clove and Thresh is the first indication of a change within Katniss' character.
Her seemingly constant survival instinct ceases to exist: as she sits and contemplates whether or not Thresh has gained weight, failing to identify this as the ideal time for an escape.
Allowing herself to become so distracted that "When he shouts, [she] jump[s]"(286).
She physically displays emotion serves as further verification she is no longer driven by an instinct to survive.
More important than Katniss' lack of instinct is the moment when she allows the true emotional nature of her character to shine through.
What may be the most surprising sentence of the passage, "Tears spring in my eyes," (288) gives way to the emotions that outshine Katniss' tough survivalist exterior.
It is apparent to the reader that Katniss has lost her grip when she explains her overflow of emotions, "I'm overwhelmed by Rue, the pain in my head, and my fear of Thresh" (288).
The line alone gives proof of the immense change that has taken place in Katniss' demeanor since her interaction with Clove.
Logically, the reader would expect Katniss' last interaction with Clove to be the one to cause an emotional outpour.
In addition to Rue's death, Clove also brought up Peeta and threw the knife causing the pain in her head.
However, the underlying cause goes beyond logic and touches on basic human nature.
When Thresh saved Katniss from what she felt certain would be her fate, she was stripped of her instinct and left with nothing but her basic human nature.
This basic human nature explains why Katniss was overcome with such an overflow of emotions.
The shock Katniss experienced was so drastic that it interrupted the concentration of her entire survivalist mindset, leaving her with nothing to hold her guard up.
The final indication Collins gives us of Katniss' instability comes from Katniss herself.
As she is leaving the scene that she felt sure she would never come out of alive Katniss describes herself as, "fleeing like the wild, wounded creature I am"(289).
This line is so pivotal because Katniss feels so far from herself she is able to her own admit defeat.
Something that she was previously much too proud to admit.
Emotions are a basic part of all human nature, Collins makes it apparent that Katniss allows her emotions to get the best of her.
Initially, Katniss' will to survive allowed her to channel those emotions in a constructive way.
Collins showed us that Katniss was a character who had grown to expect to struggle and to have to fight for survival.
Therefore, fighting came as a basic instinct for her.
On the contrary, one thing Katniss did not expect was for her life to be saved by another tribute.
Clearly Collins wanted the readers to realize that what unsettled Katniss was her disbelief that she was alive.
This instance enabled Collins to reveal so much insight into the emotional side of Katniss' character, allowing her to be someone that the readers could relate to.
Ultimately the message is that there are many levels that exist within every person.
When it comes down to it, the one thing all humans share is emotion.






Assignment Filename =  030draft2.txt
The film The Hunger Games, based off of the best selling novel by Suzanne Collins continues to uphold its stellar reputation with its on-screen debut.
There are many elements involved in converting a book to a film.
One of the most difficult tasks is deciding which scenes or dialogues to cut without eliminating something important or changing the overall message.
Although the director of The Hunger Games, Gary Ross, did cut some scenes that seemed very crucial to the plot, he found creative ways to use sound and visual effects to convey the same message to the audience as the book did to the readers.
One very important conversation in the book that was almost completely cut in the film was the conversation when Haymitch explained how much trouble Katniss was in with the capitol for outsmarting the game makers.
However the creators of the movie were able to convey the same message through their use of music and visual effects in the final scenes of the movie.
By taking a closer look at the different components of the setting, as well as the choice of music used in the final two scenes of The Hunger Games, we can see a relocation of power and development of danger begin to surface in response to the upset that occurred during the games.
This is important because it instills a sense of anxiousness and fear in the audience about the events that will follow.
One of the major elements in the final scenes of the hunger games, is the use of contradiction and visual cues to introduce a greater message to the viewer.
In the majority of the movie one would expect to find President Snow in the lap of luxury.
While on the other hand, expect to find Seneca Crane giving commands in the game room.
Thus, when the setting of the final scene reveals the confusion experienced by Seneca Crane as he is locked in an ornately decorated room, the audience is immediately aware of an inconsistency in the plot.
The shift from a setting of power to a room of control indicates to the audience that Seneca has been forcibly removed from his seat of power.
However the setting alone does not convey a complete understanding of the message being sent.
The scene allows the audience greater insight through the use of additional visuals within the scene in combination with the music.
As Seneca realizes that he is locked in, a look of confusion washes over his face.
In collaboration with his eyes as they dart to the side in search of an explanation, a very high note chimes through the low chords.
When Seneca ceases to pan the room locking in on an object in front of him, in addition the steadily flowing music grows louder as the screen moves from his face and locks on the bowl of nightlock staring back.
At this point the audience realizes that Seneca has not only lost all power, but that he is on the receiving end of a death sentence.
The reason behind this subtle indication of death is just as subtle.
Because Seneca allowed Katniss to outsmart him by using the threat of death from nightlock, Seneca's own fate follows in suit.
Thus, Seneca was the unwitting receiver of a death trap he had created, not knowing he would play the victim in his own game.
In the final scene, messages conveyed through contradictions within the setting continue and reveal further insight into how the upset in the Hunger Games took effect on President Snow.
The first glimpse of the setting in this scene reveals another surprising twist in the plot.
President Snow rising to the occasion to fill the, now empty, seat of power in the Hunger Games control room.
The messages conveyed by placing President Snow in this particular setting following the previous scene are two fold.
One is that President Snow must be responsible for the ironic and unmistakably cruel fate that was sure to follow for Seneca Crane.
Second was the power that was obviously taken from Seneca had fallen right into the clutches of the man who ordered his kiss of death.
Furthermore, the scene introduces a new element being sent to the audience as the messages move from indicating what is, to what will be.
The creators of the movie played upon the sense of shock already instilled in the audience when they made use of additional props in the scene to reveal the possibility of what is to come.
The idea that Snow is seeking revenge has already been introduced when the puzzle pieces involved in Seneca's fate are put together.
As the camera moves from a live TV coverage of Katniss safely returning home from the Hunger Games it reveals the deeply concentrated glare that radiates from President Snows eyes which are glued to the screen.
The loud music overcoming the room makes it seem that the concentration on revenge for Katniss is overcoming President Snow.
The combination of all of the different elements in this scene indicates to the audience, that for Katniss, what she believes to be the end of her toughest fight ever, could merely be the beginning.
This overwhelmingly threatening message that is being sent about Katniss, the main character that everyone has been pulling for, creates a very powerful feeling of fear and anxiousness in the audience.
When they finally believe that the person they have been pulling form has made it through, the final two scenes indicate quite the contrary.
What makes this message so pivotal for the audience and success of the movie is that it ends with a cliffhanger.
Only when the elements of the setting are combined with the use of music, does the scene convey a complete message and sense of anxiousness in the audience.
Although the music by itself doesn't send a very loud message, when combined with such dynamic elements of a setting, it can completely enhance and direct the messages that are being introduce through visuals.
In this case, the music is used to send a very final message.
Thus the creators of the film were successful in conveying a very important message to the audience without having to use the dialogue that was necessary in the book. 









Assignment Filename =  030final2.txt
The film The Hunger Games, based off of the best selling novel by Suzanne Collins continues to uphold its stellar reputation with its on-screen debut.
There are many elements involved in converting a book to a film.
One of the most difficult tasks is deciding which scenes or dialogues to cut without eliminating something important or changing the overall message.
Although the director of The Hunger Games, Gary Ross, did cut some scenes that seemed very crucial to the plot, he found creative ways to use sound and visual effects to convey the same message to the audience as the book did to the readers.
One very important conversation in the book that was almost completely cut in the film was the conversation when Haymitch explained how much trouble Katniss was in with the capitol for outsmarting the game makers.
However the creators of the movie were able to convey the same message through their use of music and visual effects in the final scenes of the movie.
By taking a closer look at the different components of the setting, as well as the choice of music used in the final two scenes of The Hunger Games, we can see a relocation of power and development of danger begin to surface in response to the upset that occurred during the games.
This is important because it instills a sense of anxiousness and fear in the audience about the events that will follow.
One of the major elements in the final scenes of The Hunger Games is the use of contradiction between what the audience expects and what is actually revealed to introduce an inconsistency within the plot.
The movie depicts President Snow in the lap of luxury, whether in his garden or public he maintains and air of control with a great sense of ease.
His movements and even the pace in which he speaks are reflexive of his leisurely demeanor.
His character is the perfect combination of confidence, power and grace.
While on the other hand, expect to find Seneca Crane behind the scenes giving commands in the game center.
Opposite of President Snow Seneca Crane is characterized by a very flashy personality, always trying to be "on top of the game," expect to find Seneca in the middle of things.
Thus, when the setting of the final scene reveals Seneca Crane with a confused expression on his face,  as he is locked in an ornately decorated room, the audience is immediately conscious of an inconsistency in the plot.
The shift from a setting fast paced setting surrounded by people and power to a very still and quiet room indicates to the audience that Seneca has been forcibly removed from his seat of power.
However the setting alone does not convey a complete understanding of the message being sent.
Through the use of visual aids and the effect of music in combination with the actions of the character, the scene allows the audience greater insight about the changes in plot.
As Seneca realizes that he is locked in, a look of confusion washes over his face.
In collaboration with his eyes as they dart to the side in search of an explanation, a very high note chimes through the low chords.
When Seneca ceases to pan the room locking in on an object in front of him, in addition the steadily flowing music grows louder as the screen moves from his face and locks on the bowl of nightlock staring back.
At this point the audience realizes that Seneca has not only lost all power, but that he is on the receiving end of a death sentence.
The reason behind this subtle indication of death is just as subtle.
Because Seneca allowed Katniss to outsmart him by using the threat of death from nightlock, Seneca's own fate follows in suit.
Thus, Seneca was the unwitting receiver of a death trap he had created, not knowing he would play the victim in his own game.
Contradictions within the setting of the final scene reveal insight into the effect of the berries on President Snow.
First glimpse of the setting reveals a surprising twist in the plot.
President Snow standing in the middle of the, now empty, game room.
No longer sporting the docile manner that went along with an ease in President Snow's demeanor.
The calm and confident mannerisms the audience had come to expect were replaced with a burning stare and an anger that can be reflected in his stance.
In contrast to the scenes characterized by silence, the music makes an abrupt statement about Snow's change in tone.
The change in tone is supported by a change in physical behavior the final second characterized by Snow's abrupt movement as he angrily disappears from the premises.
One is that President Snow must be responsible for the ironic and unmistakably cruel fate that was sure to follow for Seneca Crane.
Second was the power that was obviously taken from Seneca had fallen right into the clutches of the man who ordered his kiss of death.
Furthermore, the scene introduces a new element for the audience as messages indicating what is, evolve into messages of what will be.
The creators of the movie played upon the sense of shock already instilled in the audience when they made use of additional props in the scene to reveal the possibility of what is to come.
The idea that Snow is seeking revenge has already been introduced when the puzzle pieces involved in Seneca's fate are put together.
As the camera moves from a live TV coverage of Katniss safely returning home from the Hunger Games it reveals the deeply concentrated glare that radiates from President Snows eyes which are glued to the screen.
The loud music overcoming the room makes it seem that the concentration on revenge for Katniss is overcoming President Snow.
The combination of all of the different elements in this scene indicates to the audience, that for Katniss, what she believes to be the end of her toughest fight ever, could merely be the beginning.
This overwhelmingly threatening message that is being sent about Katniss, the main character that everyone has been pulling for, creates a very powerful feeling of fear and anxiousness in the audience.
When they finally believe that the person they have been pulling form has made it through, the final two scenes indicate quite the contrary.
What makes this message so pivotal for the audience and success of the movie is that it ends with a cliffhanger.
Only when the elements of the setting are combined with the use of music, does the scene convey a complete message and sense of anxiousness in the audience.
Although the music by itself doesn't send a very loud message, when combined with such dynamic elements of a setting, it can completely enhance and direct the messages that are being introduce through visuals.
In this case, the music is used to send a very final message.
Thus the creators of the film were successful in conveying a very important message to the audience without having to use the dialogue that was necessary in the book.






Assignment Filename =  031draft4.txt
Richard Connells The Most Danegerous Game and Suzanne Collins The Hunger Games are both fictional tales that instill a sense of heart-pounding terror within their audiences.
Despite the differences in plot and historical contexts, their similarities in theme and cultural context provide the necessary elements to make them ideal for comparison.
Connell's short story was published in Colliers Weekly January 19, 1924 and tells the story of a man who falls overboard and ends up on the island of a crazed Cossack hunting expert.
The only way for the man to make it off the the island is to successfully play and win a game of life or death in which he must serve as the "game" in a three day hunt for the undefeated hunting expert.
Suzanne Collins The Hunger Games was published in 2008 and tells the story of a girl who is one of twenty-four "tributes" in the 74th annual hunger games.
Tributes consist of an adolescent boy and girl from each of the 12 districts of the nation of Panem.
Each year as a reminder of the "dark days" all 24 tributes are thrown into an arena  and over a period of several weeks brutally fight to the death until only one is left standing.
By comparing The Hunger Games and The Most Dangerous Game we can see the progression of perversity and human brutality as a result of desensitization; this is important because the ability to recognize it we can learn how to fight against it.
Many elements within the two pieces make them ideal for comparison.
The foremost is both plots stem from Richard Connell's original human-hunting-humans concept.
Since its publication, Richard Connell has won the O. Henry Memorial, and inspired countless other films, tv shows and novels trying to recapture the ideas and heart pounding terror of Connells original story.
Considering the attention The Hunger Games has continued to receive, it seems someone Collinsn was finally successful.
While both texts explore the morality of killing as a sport, we are given the opportunity to compare the original with its modern day equivalent.
The role of General Zaroff is split within The Hunger Games.
General Zoroff perceives himself to be a "civilized," wealthy man, bored by the level of "perfection" in his hunting ability(Connell).
Similar to the "career" tributes who are "the ones who have been fed and trained  throughout their lives for this moment,"(Collins 94) both arrogantly believe that they are better.
The careers and General Zoroff posess the same animalistic instict of ruthless hunting.
In addition, Zoroff's traits are reflected by the citizens of the Capital, who are uncharacteristically bored, rich and entertained by death.
While Zaroff and the citizens of the capital conduct themselves as very "civilized" individuals, all prove to be truly barbaric in nature.
What really allows insight into the stories are the many differences that exist between them.
The most considerable is the level of perversity that exists within different elements of each plot.
While both scenerios are identifiably disturbed, The Most Dangerous Game contains an aspect of civility that The Hunger Games does not.
Simply put, Zaroff plays an extreme game of hide and seek.
The participants are those who have washed up after shipwrecks.
Although Zaroff causes them in a ploy to find "game" to hunt, the guests are treated "with every consideration"(Connell).
He makes sure they are provided with an abundance of food and exercise so when it comes time for a hunt "they will be in top physical condition"(Connell).
What makes this element seem somewhat fair is that Zaroff makes sure the men he hunts are in physically equivalent condition.
This eliminates any unfair advantage he might have over a malnourished or out of shape person.
He desires an evenhanded fight.
The object is for the "game" is simply to outsmart Zaroff "your brain against mine," he says(Connell).
Given a three day time limit Zaroff provides the huntees with "a supply of food and an excellent hunting knife.
Insuring the men have ever opportunity survive, I give him three hours' start"(Connell).
In Collins novel, the twenty-four children from range from ages twelve to eighteen are chosen.
They are locked in an arena where they must kill each other with an assortment of close range weapons until only one is left standing.
Most of the participants are selected at random during the "reaping" while few are "volunteers" or "careers.
"  Unlike death trap island these kids are only given a few days of training at the end of which they are rated on their ability to win.
Immediately the hunger games begins with an unfair advantage for many contestants, they only have a 4% chance of survival to begin with.
Luxuries such as food and weapons are provided in the center of the cornucopia.
The tactic ensures "a blood bath" (Collins 138) because to get what they need tributes must "go in and fight for it against the other 23 tributes" (Collins 148).
or leaving the cornucopia without food and/or weapons.
Another unfair advantage is the capitals control of the games.
They have the ability to create any obstacles or problems for the tributes they desire.
There is no time limit, just a life limit.
From the beginning the games offer little hope of life in the end.
when there are 24 tributes and only one can survive, "the odds are [never] in your favor.
"
	
The corruption within the hunger games stands out through the level of perversion that is driven by the meadia and entertainment.
In The Most Dangerous Game,exists purely for one man's entertainment.
Zaroff enjoys the thrill of the hunt.
Unfortunately human beings are the only "game" that provide him with enough thrill to satisfy his inner bloodlust.
The hunger games serve as the entertainment for the entire population of the capital, "they bring us here to fight to the death for their entertainment" (Collins 80).
Thus the tributes are put in even greater adversity to ensure the game makers can put on a good show.
For Katniss this adversity comes in the form of a daunting fire, "audience in the capital" must be "getting bored," because the gamemakers motivation is "not hard to follow"(Collins 173).
The games have such a strong effect on entertainment  that the tributes are forced to endure additional entertaining events such as, ceremonies and interviews preceeding the games.
In which time tributes are forced to act excited about, what is in reality, a 4% chance of survival.
The level of brutality in combination with a constant desire for more, makes a clear argument about the level of desensitization the people of panem possess about the tragic brutality of death.
Connel's literary concept came to existence during the boisterous period of the 1920's, characterized by rapid growth and change in American society in the aftermath of WWI.
For writers this became a time of literary creativity, as the classic literary form began to evolve capturing many experiences from the war, as well as continuous changes in society.
Personal experiences during WWI inspire Connell to recreate instilled in many by the way, for his readers.
the sense of violense and fear created by war, for his readers.
Zaroff's demonstrates the violent Cossack warfare, that was prevalent during the same time, in the Russian Revolition.
Cossacks were known for their brutal violence, therefore Connell's identification of Zaroff and Ivan as Cossacks bolsters the feasibility of the, human hunting human plotline.
On the other hand, the talent and morality displayed by Rainsford's character is symbolic for the newly confident America in the aftermath of WWI.
Rainsford is quick to reject Zaroff's illusion that hunting people for sport is acceptable, quickly retaliating that in no way did "experiences in war, make me condone cold-blooded murder"(Connell).
Rainsford identifies the truth of the situation with great ease.
Hunting humans is murder, period.
During this time in history there was no element of mass meadia and WWI was the first many even entertained the idea of war.
Therefore the ingredients that form such levels of desensitization were barely beginning to take place.
For Collins the war inspiration stems from the War on Iraq, which was in full force during 2008.
How the war inspired Collins creation of a modern extremity of  The Most Dangerous Game, reveals the same factors that were influential for Connell, influence of war and colture in mordern society.
Thus we come to find the increased level of perversity is reflexive of nothing more than and increased level of disturbance existing within modern society.
aspects of the plot are in direct correlation with the level of disturbance that exists within our society.
The idea that led to The Hunger Games is no more complex than changing the channel.
Literally The Hunger Games came from the lack of distinction between young adults competing in Reality TV and Young Adults fighting in a war.
Thus The Hunger Games takes the form of an extreme adaption of the popular entertainment, "reality TV.
" Although only some display "physical competition," the unsettling nature of reality TV shown in the novel comes from an aspect of entertainment that's present in almost all forms.
The "voyeurtristic thrill, watching people being humiliated or brought to tears or suffering physically"(Hudson).
Present day American society feeds off of the same perversities in entertainment that the people of the capital are so criticized for.
The message sent by "the Most Dangerous Game" and "The Hunger Games" is the same, it tells us to recognize perversity and reject it.
Comparison between the two reveals that the concept of the hunger games shows greater perversity because entertainment has desensitized the people of panem.
During the 1920's TV coverage and mass media didn't exist, and the lines between right and wrong were identifiably clear.
The huge presense media in of in today's society, forces us to examine "the reality of our own desensitization"(Hudson).
This reality reveals how accurately the The Hunger Gameswe don't appreciate or recognize the hard work of those at war defending our moralities.
Moreover we are blind to the damaging effects these desensitized moralities have on the real victims.
Especially within today's youth there are many who would opt to spend a day fighting in the hunger games rather then a day in life as a high school girl.
This is the same thrill that the people of the capital have from the reality tv aspect of watching the hunger games.
In effect, the people of panem are completely desensitized and thus the reality of the hunger games doesn't have the impact it should, complete rejection.






Assignment Filename =  031final4.txt
Richard Connells The Most Danegerous Game and Suzanne Collins The Hunger Games are both fictional tales that instill a sense of heart-pounding terror within their audiences.
Despite the differences in plot and historical contexts, their similarities in theme and cultural context provide the necessary elements to make them ideal for comparison.
Connell's short story was published in Colliers Weekly January 19, 1924 and tells the story of a man who falls overboard and ends up on the island of a crazed Cossack hunting expert.
The only way for the man to make it off the the island is to successfully play and win a game of life or death in which he must serve as the "game" in a three day hunt for the undefeated hunting expert.
Suzanne Collins The Hunger Games was published in 2008 and tells the story of a girl who is one of twenty-four "tributes" in the 74th annual hunger games.
Tributes consist of an adolescent boy and girl from each of the 12 districts of the nation of Panem.
Each year as a reminder of the "dark days" all 24 tributes are thrown into an arena  and over a period of several weeks brutally fight to the death until only one is left standing.
By comparing The Hunger Games and The Most Dangerous Game we can see the progression of perversity and human brutality as a result of desensitization; this is important because the ability to recognize it we can learn how to fight against it.
Many elements within the two pieces make them ideal for comparison.
The foremost is both plots stem from Richard Connell's original human-hunting-humans concept.
Since its publication, Richard Connell has won the O. Henry Memorial, and inspired countless other films, tv shows and novels trying to recapture the ideas and heart pounding terror of Connells original story.
Considering the attention The Hunger Games has continued to receive, it seems someone Collinsn was finally successful.
While both texts explore the morality of killing as a sport, we are given the opportunity to compare the original with its modern day equivalent.
The role of General Zaroff is split within The Hunger Games.
General Zoroff perceives himself to be a "civilized," wealthy man, bored by the level of "perfection" in his hunting ability(Connell).
Similar to the "career" tributes who are "the ones who have been fed and trained  throughout their lives for this moment,"(Collins 94) both arrogantly believe that they are better.
The careers and General Zoroff posess the same animalistic instict of ruthless hunting.
In addition, Zoroff's traits are reflected by the citizens of the Capital, who are uncharacteristically bored, rich and entertained by death.
While Zaroff and the citizens of the capital conduct themselves as very "civilized" individuals, all prove to be truly barbaric in nature.
What really allows insight into the stories are the many differences that exist between them.
The most considerable is the level of perversity that exists within different elements of each plot.
While both scenerios are identifiably disturbed, The Most Dangerous Game contains an aspect of civility that The Hunger Games does not.
Simply put, Zaroff plays an extreme game of hide and seek.
The participants are those who have washed up after shipwrecks.
Although Zaroff causes them in a ploy to find "game" to hunt, the guests are treated "with every consideration"(Connell).
He makes sure they are provided with an abundance of food and exercise so when it comes time for a hunt "they will be in top physical condition"(Connell).
What makes this element seem somewhat fair is that Zaroff makes sure the men he hunts are in physically equivalent condition.
This eliminates any unfair advantage he might have over a malnourished or out of shape person.
He desires an evenhanded fight.
The object is for the "game" is simply to outsmart Zaroff "your brain against mine," he says(Connell).
Given a three day time limit Zaroff provides the huntees with "a supply of food and an excellent hunting knife.
Insuring the men have ever opportunity survive, I give him three hours' start"(Connell).
In Collins novel, the twenty-four children from range from ages twelve to eighteen are chosen.
They are locked in an arena where they must kill each other with an assortment of close range weapons until only one is left standing.
Most of the participants are selected at random during the "reaping" while few are "volunteers" or "careers.
"  Unlike death trap island these kids are only given a few days of training at the end of which they are rated on their ability to win.
Immediately the hunger games begins with an unfair advantage for many contestants, they only have a 4% chance of survival to begin with.
Luxuries such as food and weapons are provided in the center of the cornucopia.
The tactic ensures "a blood bath" (Collins 138) because to get what they need tributes must "go in and fight for it against the other 23 tributes" (Collins 148).
or leaving the cornucopia without food and/or weapons.
Another unfair advantage is the capitals control of the games.
They have the ability to create any obstacles or problems for the tributes they desire.
There is no time limit, just a life limit.
From the beginning the games offer little hope of life in the end.
when there are 24 tributes and only one can survive, "the odds are [never] in your favor.
"

The corruption within the hunger games stands out through the level of perversion that is driven by the meadia and entertainment.
In The Most Dangerous Game,exists purely for one man's entertainment.
Zaroff enjoys the thrill of the hunt.
Unfortunately human beings are the only "game" that provide him with enough thrill to satisfy his inner bloodlust.
The hunger games serve as the entertainment for the entire population of the capital, "they bring us here to fight to the death for their entertainment" (Collins 80).
Thus the tributes are put in even greater adversity to ensure the game makers can put on a good show.
For Katniss this adversity comes in the form of a daunting fire, "audience in the capital" must be "getting bored," because the gamemakers motivation is "not hard to follow"(Collins 173).
The games have such a strong effect on entertainment  that the tributes are forced to endure additional entertaining events such as, ceremonies and interviews preceeding the games.
In which time tributes are forced to act excited about, what is in reality, a 4% chance of survival.
The level of brutality in combination with a constant desire for more, makes a clear argument about the level of desensitization the people of panem possess about the tragic brutality of death.
Connel's literary concept came to existence during the boisterous period of the 1920's, characterized by rapid growth and change in American society in the aftermath of WWI.
For writers this became a time of literary creativity, as the classic literary form began to evolve capturing many experiences from the war, as well as continuous changes in society.
Personal experiences during WWI inspire Connell to recreate instilled in many by the way, for his readers.
the sense of violense and fear created by war, for his readers.
Zaroff's demonstrates the violent Cossack warfare, that was prevalent during the same time, in the Russian Revolition.
Cossacks were known for their brutal violence, therefore Connell's identification of Zaroff and Ivan as Cossacks bolsters the feasibility of the, human hunting human plotline.
On the other hand, the talent and morality displayed by Rainsford's character is symbolic for the newly confident America in the aftermath of WWI.
Rainsford is quick to reject Zaroff's illusion that hunting people for sport is acceptable, quickly retaliating that in no way did "experiences in war, make me condone cold-blooded murder"(Connell).
Rainsford identifies the truth of the situation with great ease.
Hunting humans is murder, period.
During this time in history there was no element of mass meadia and WWI was the first many even entertained the idea of war.
Therefore the ingredients that form such levels of desensitization were barely beginning to take place.
For Collins the war inspiration stems from the War on Iraq, which was in full force during 2008.
How the war inspired Collins creation of a modern extremity of  The Most Dangerous Game, reveals the same factors that were influential for Connell, influence of war and colture in mordern society.
Thus we come to find the increased level of perversity is reflexive of nothing more than and increased level of disturbance existing within modern society.
aspects of the plot are in direct correlation with the level of disturbance that exists within our society.
The idea that led to The Hunger Games is no more complex than changing the channel.
Literally The Hunger Games came from the lack of distinction between young adults competing in Reality TV and Young Adults fighting in a war.
Thus The Hunger Games takes the form of an extreme adaption of the popular entertainment, "reality TV.
" Although only some display "physical competition," the unsettling nature of reality TV shown in the novel comes from an aspect of entertainment that's present in almost all forms.
The "voyeurtristic thrill, watching people being humiliated or brought to tears or suffering physically"(Hudson).
Present day American society feeds off of the same perversities in entertainment that the people of the capital are so criticized for.
The message sent by "the Most Dangerous Game" and "The Hunger Games" is the same, it tells us to recognize perversity and reject it.
Comparison between the two reveals that the concept of the hunger games shows greater perversity because entertainment has desensitized the people of panem.
During the 1920's TV coverage and mass media didn't exist, and the lines between right and wrong were identifiably clear.
The huge presense media in of in today's society, forces us to examine "the reality of our own desensitization"(Hudson).
This reality reveals how accurately the The Hunger Gameswe don't appreciate or recognize the hard work of those at war defending our moralities.
Moreover we are blind to the damaging effects these desensitized moralities have on the real victims.
Especially within today's youth there are many who would opt to spend a day fighting in the hunger games rather then a day in life as a high school girl.
This is the same thrill that the people of the capital have from the reality tv aspect of watching the hunger games.
In effect, the people of panem are completely desensitized and thus the reality of the hunger games doesn't have the impact it should, complete rejection. 






Assignment Filename =  032draft1.txt
In order to survive the hunger games, a competitor must be strong, smart, resourceful and emotionless with a desire to kill.
Katniss Everdeen, the main character in the novel, has created a personality that exemplifies these intense characteristics of a fighter and she portrays that person throughout most of the novel.
By looking at the revealing interview scene between Katniss and Ceaser we can see the tough exterior that Katniss has created in order to survive the cruel world created by the capital deteriorate as she spins and "giggles" in her fire dress and truthfully discusses her attachment to Prim; this is important because the interview reveals a motherly and childish personality of Katniss that is foreign to the reader and contradicts the tough unloving demeanor that is needed to survive and win the hunger games.
Katniss is a young girl who was forced to grow up way too early and this is revealed in the interview scene with Ceaser.
During the interview scene Ceaser quiets his jovial mood and carefully asks Katniss intimate questions about her relationship with Prim and the moments following the reaping.
Katniss's response to the intimate questions asked by Ceaser reveals her motherly and caring attributes.
Katniss still attempts to keep up her emotional barrier and directly answers Ceasers questions about Prim with the response, "Her name's Prim.
She's just twelve.
And I love her more than anything.
" However the straightforward reply by Katniss still gives the reader an insight into the true emotion of Katniss.
The last line where Katniss confesses that she loves Prim more than anything reveals to the reader the maternal nature of Katniss.
A mother loves her child with all her heart and will do anything for her child and that is exactly what Katniss is doing for Prim.
Katniss refused to watch her sister go to the hunger games and immediately volunteered and sacrificed her own life in order that Prim could live.
The next question Ceaser asks in the interview is what Prim asked after the reaping and with much dramatic flare and emotional struggle from Katniss she replies that Prim asked her to try really hard to win.
Katniss expands on the answer and informs Ceaser that she swore to Prim that she would win.
Katniss subconciously explains to the reader the emotions that take over her as she answers Ceaser's questions and describes a sensation of icy rigidity take over her body.
This also exemplifies the motherly attribute of Katniss and the maternal instinct to protect one's young.
The three short responses that Katniss gives in response to Ceaser's questions about Prim reveals the protective maternal instinct of Katniss toward Prim and presents a contradictory caring personality to the rigid personality needed to conquer the hunger games.
Although Katniss appears to act more mature than her actual age throughout most of the novel the interview scene reveals a young and innocent Katniss to the reader.
In the beginning of the interview Katniss twirls, jokes, and giggles with Ceaser as he compliments her outfit and begins to ask casual conversation starter questions with her.
Katniss responds to the questions like a young shy girl would and gushes at the flattery and compliments about her dress and appearance as she spins and shows the crowd her dress and thus indirectly her innocence and child-like qualities.
The twirling and giggling coming from Katniss shows the reader a naive side of Katniss, a side of Katniss that is almost carefree, a person who isn't worried about the idea that in a matter of days she will be shoved into arena to fight for her life.
The giggles and smile that come from Katniss' usually emotionless face make it seem like she is enjoying the limelight and attention she is attracting just like a young girl would.
The line that also describes Ceaser wrapping a protective arm around Katniss because she got too dizzy from spinning expands on the idea that Katniss is still a young child.
Throughout the novel Katniss appears to have the idealistic tough exterior to win the Hunger Games; however, the interview scene between her and Ceaser contradicts the icy rigidity of Katniss.
Katniss was portrayed as a warrior or a hunter throughout most of the novel but now a softer side of Katniss has been introduced.
Katniss is portrayed during the interview as a young innocent girl who was forced to grow up too soon by feeling the desire to care for her sister Prim and the newly acquired task to fight for her life in the Hunger Games.  








Assignment Filename =  032final1.txt
The Hunger Games is a fight to death among 24 children from the 12 districts surrounding the capital and the victor is usually a competitor who was strong and emotionless with a desire to kill that was until Katniss Everdeen the girl on fire entered into the Hunger Game's arena.
Katniss Everdeen was an exception to the normal victor of the games.
She was a young girl from District 12 who appeared to have a tough emotionless personality because of her hunter instinct; however, in reality she was a young girl who was forced to grow up too quickly because she had to take care of her younger sister Prim.
By looking at the revealing interview scene between Katniss and Ceaser we can see a breakthrough in Katniss's tough exterior in the beginning of the interview as she spins and "giggles" in her fire dress and truthfully discusses her close relationship to her younger sister Prim; this is important because it illustrates the split personality of Katniss which gave her an advantage over the other 23 competitors and ultimately helped her win the Hunger Games.
The interview scene between Katniss and Ceaser begins with Katniss feeling like she is in dream as she walks onto the stage and nervously shakes Ceaser's hand with her sweaty palm.
Immediately after the handshake the interview starts and Ceaser begins with easy conversation starter questions.
At first Katniss does not have the ability to answer these simple questions because she is so nervous.
Katniss desperately searches the crowd looking for Cinna and as soon as she finds him and locks eyes with him her confidence is regained and she has the ability to understand and answer Ceaser's questions.
The beginning of this scene illustrates Katniss's childlike qualities because of her dependence on an adult figure, Cinna.
Cinna acts like a type of emtional foundation for Katniss and helps keep her calm, cool, and collected.
As the interview continues, Cinna continues to provide guidance and direction for Katniss from his position in the crowd.
He motions for Katniss to spin by twirling his finger in the air and Katniss follows his directions.
Katniss spins and ends up giggling as she spins for the crowd and listens to the "oohs and ahhs" coming from the audience as they gawk at the innocence and beauty of Katniss.
Katniss spins until she is dizzy and Ceaser "wraps a protective arm" around her as she finishes her spinning and guides her back to her chair.
The reality and the seriousness of the situation being chosen to be a tribute in the Hunger Games sets in.
The beginning of the interview illustrates Katniss' childlike qualities because of her dependence on Cinna for directions and her giggling that occurs as she spins and shows off for the crowd.
Throughout the interview Katniss constantly reminds herself of the piece of advice Cinna gave her, "to be honest".
For the first time in the novel the reader catches a glimpse of Katniss that portrays her as a young girl.
Immediately after Katniss is portrayed as this giggling young girl who still needs an adult's guidance to help calm her nerves, her maternal nature is displayed in the interview.
Slowly the mood quiets in the room and Ceaser's mood shifts from his jovial sense of humor to a serious nature.
He questions Katniss about the devastating reaping scene and her relationship with Prim.
Katniss responds to Ceaser's questions about Prim with three short sentences, "Her name is Prim.
She's just 12.
And I love her more than anything" (Collins 129).
Ceaser asks Katniss another question about Prim and what Prim said after the reaping and Katniss forces herself to respond and she swallows hard and replies "She asked me to try really hard to win.
"  This brief moment where Ceaser questions Katniss about Prim illustrates Katniss's motherly instinct and the idea that Katniss will do anything to protect her sister.
The line where Katniss confesses that she loves Prim more than anything reveals to the reader the maternal nature of Katniss.
A mother loves her child with all her heart and will do anything for her child and that is exactly what Katniss is doing for Prim.
Katniss is sacrificing her life for her younger sister which illustrates a true act of love and protection because it is explained later in the novel that a volunteer for a tribute rarely happens during the games.
Peeta had siblings and none of them volunteered to sacrifice their life for him.
Katniss demonstatred her true motherly instinct when she refused to watch her sister, the person she loves most in the world, go to the hunger games.
The idea that Katniss will do anything to protect Prim is obvious because Katniss is risking her life for Prim and is going to be placed into arena with 24 other people and only one person will come out alive and be crowned victor.
The dramatic flare and struggle as Katniss has to answer the next question in the interview also illustrates Katniss maternal side because Katniss subconsciously knows Prim is relying wholeheartedly on Katniss to come back alive.
Katniss realization that Prim relies so heavily on her, transforms Katniss's personality again and brings back the tough character that has been portrayed throughout the beginning part of the novel.
Ceaser asks Katniss what her response was to Prim asking her to win the hunger games and Katniss describes a sensation that illustrates a tough emotional exterior.
Katniss describes the feeling of icy rigidity taking over her body similar to the feeling she gets before she kills and she feels her voice drop an octave as she responds to Ceaser's question with the response "I swore I would" (Collins 129).
Katniss's reaction to the question illustrates her toughness and the idea that she will do anything to win these games especially for her sister.
During this interview scene Katniss illustrates three different sides of her personality.
Each part of her personality brings a different attribute of strength to the table and aids her in becoming the victor of the hunger games.
Katniss is portrtayed as a young girl who needs the care and guidance of an adult in the beginning of the interview; however, as the interview continues the reader gets a glimpse of her maternal nature and how she was forced to grow up too quickly, and then finally her final transformation into the icy rigid personality that instigates her killer instinct.
Katniss portrayal in the beginning of the interview was illustrated as weak, with child-like innocence; however as the interview continues the reader gets a glimpse of a person who will do anything to win and protect her sister.
Katniss's main goal is to win the 75th annual Hunger Game and return home to her younger sister in District 12. 








Assignment Filename =  033draft2.txt
The Hunger Games is suppose to be a story about Katniss fighting for her life in order to win the treacherous hunger games that are created to kill innocent children and show the all-controlling power the capitol has over the twelve districts of Panem.
However the movie poster with Katniss in the center and Peeta and Gale on her left and right illustrates the movie in a different context.
By looking at the placement of the line "may the odds ever be in your favor" and the placement of the three characters in the contrasting colors of black and white and light and dark we can see the introduction of a forbidden love story which most people don't see because of the title of the movie The Hunger Games suggest a story about fighting to live not a love story.
The line "may the odds ever be in your favor" is a line that suggests good luck and good fortune in a difficult time; however, with the placement of the line above the three characters and the writing style/font of the line, the words suggests a different meaning.
The font of the line is written in a very orderly style with all uppercase letters and an evenly spaced distance between each letter.
The font of the words suggests that some high power is in control; however the placement at the top and the fading color of the words also suggest that the all-controlling power is beginning to lose control.
The fading and discoloration of the line also suggests a deeper meaning to a simple line with an obvious meaning.
The line that should offer good fortune in the Hunger Games appears to have a different connotation and suggests the idea that best man shall win.
However the men are not fighting for the honor and glory of winning the Hunger Games, which would be the logical idea to assume from the title of the movie.
The two men are actually fighting for the love and affection of Katniss.
The darkness that Katniss is portrayed in with her dark clothes and the shadows behind her alludes to her tough personality and the difficulty it would be to make Katniss fall in love with Gale or Peeta.
Katniss facial expression depicts a character that is fierce and has her eyes set on a prize; however the prize is not winning the games, the prize is indirectly love.
Katniss must choose which man she wants to love.
All three of the characters have a look of extreme motivation and fierceness that commands the attention on their faces.
All three of the characters indirectly seem to know they are fighting for love and the contrasting colors that Gale and Peeta are wearing suggests who the better man is.
Peeta is wearing a black shirt, which suggests darkness and evil.
Peeta appears to be the wrong choice for Katniss because of his dark clothing in comparison to Gale who is wearing a white shirt.
The white shirt that Gale is wearing suggests goodness and purity, which makes Gale, appear to be the better match for Katniss.
However Peeta and Katniss are matching in the colors they are wearing and the matching of the two character's suggest a deeper bond that has formed between the two in comparison to the contrast between the white and black shirts of Katniss and Gale.
The lighting behind the three characters also illuminates what character is the best choice for Katniss.
Gale appears to be in a more shadowy area of the picture while Peeta on the other hand is an area where light is shining through the trees.
The shining of the light through the trees on Peeta and the darkness that surrounds Gale also suggests that Peeta might be the better man for Katniss; however the positioning of the three characters gives the viewer a different perspective on the situation between the three characters.
Katniss is strategically placed between Peeta and Gale in a way that suggests the closeness of the relationship between her and the two characters.
Katniss is directly in the middle of the poster commanding the attention of the viewer and Peeta and Gale are on the left and right of Katniss.
The placement of Katniss in the middle of the two male characters illustrates the idea that Katniss must choose between the two suitors who she wants to love and relates to the idea may the best man win.
The body position of Katniss alludes to which suitor Katniss might choose which is different than what the artist of poster depicts in comparison to the lighting of the picture.
The lighting of the picture and the matching of the outfits suggest that Peeta is the correct choice for Katniss because of his resemblance to Katniss in his outfit and the light shining around him; however, the body positioning of Katniss hints to the idea that Gale is the option she chooses.
Katniss back is facing toward Peeta and all though the two are matching and the light is shown on Peeta the positioning of Katniss illustrates the idea that she is not going to choose Peeta.
Gale on the other hand seems like the suitor Katniss will choose because her body is facing toward Gale; however there is a larger amount of distance between Gale and Katniss in comparison to the closeness of Peeta and Katniss.
Katniss, Gale, and Peeta are entangled in a love triangle and Katniss represents the all-controlling power in deciding which person she loves.
The assumed power and the people that control the hunger games and wish the contestants the best of luck with the line "may the odds be ever in your favor" is the capitol; however with careful analysis of the poster the viewer can get a glimpse of a tragic love story where Katniss must choose which man, Gale or Peeta, she should go for and the two men are hoping that odds are ever in their favor. 








Assignment Filename =  033final2.txt
The Hunger Games is suppose to be a story about Katniss fighting for her life in order to win the treacherous and deadly Hunger Games.
The games were created with a slim chance of survival and were meant to illustrate the all-controlling power of the Capital by it's ability to kill 23 innocent children from the twelve districts surrounding Panem.
However the movie poster showing Katniss positioned between Gale and Peeta, and the line "may the odds ever be in your favor" floating over the heads of the three characters suggests that a different story will be told throughout the novel.
By looking at the placement of the line, "may the odds be ever in your favor" and the body language and placement of the three characters in the contrasting shades of light and dark, we can see the introduction of a forbidden love story and the tough decision Katniss will have to make to decide who will win over her heart, this is important because although two of the characters are fighting for their lives, the main problem that is distracting all three of the characters is who will win over Katniss's love and ultimately become the true victor.
Is it Peeta the boy who is placed in the deadly arena with Katniss who has confessed his love for her or Gale her unknown childhood sweetheart?
The line "may the odds ever be in your favor" is a line that suggests good luck and good fortune in a difficult time; however, with the placement of the line above the three characters and the writing style and font of the line, the words suggests a different meaning.
The font of the line is written in a very orderly style with all uppercase letters and an evenly spaced distance between each letter.
The font of the words suggests that some higher power is in control; however the placement at the top and the fading color of the words also suggest that the all-controlling power is beginning to lose control.
The fading color also suggests that the all-controlling power is not the main topic that is being explored and that there is another topic that demands the attention of the reader throughout the novel.
The fading and discoloration of the line also intensifies the argument that there is a deeper meaning to the simple line than the obvious.
The line that should offer good fortune in the Hunger Games appears to have a different connotation by suggesting the idea that best man shall win.
But what shall the best man win?
By looking at the title of the movie, the best man should win the coveted Hunger Games and thus gain a years supply of food for his district; however, the characters are not truly fighting for the honor and glory of being crowned victor of the Hunger Games.
Although two of the characters, Katniss and Peeta, are fighting in the Hunger Games ,the true game that is being played is between Gale and Peeta who  are fighting to win over the love of Katniss.
The darkness that Katniss is portrayed in with her dark clothes and the shadows behind her alludes to her tough personality and how difficult it would be to make Katniss fall in love with Gale or Peeta.
Katniss's facial expression depicts a character that is fierce and determined; however, Katniss is not determined to win the Hunger Games, she is focused on making the decision on with which man she wants to spend the rest of her life.
All three of the characters have a look of extreme motivation and fierceness that commands the attention on their faces and they all know they are fighting for something they strongly desire, the love of someone else.
The contrasting colors that are worn by Gale and Peeta suggest which character is the better man and who will get what they desire, the love and affection of Katniss.
Peeta is wearing a black shirt, which suggests darkness and evil and thus makes him appear to be the wrong choice for Katniss in comparison to Gale who is wearing a white shirt.
However, Peeta and Katniss match, which suggests a deeper bond has formed between the two.
Although black represents evil and Gale is wearing a white shirt that represents purity and goodness, the contrasting of colors between Katniss and Gale suggests that the two do not have as intimate and close of a bond as Katniss and Peeta.
The lighting behind the three characters also illuminates what character is the best choice for Katniss.
Gale appears to be in a more shadowy area of the picture while Peeta on the other hand is an area where light is shining through the trees.
The light that illuminates Peeta and the darkness that surrounds Gale also leads the viewer to believe that Peeta might be the better man for Katniss; however the body positioning of the three characters further complicates the situation by suggesting that the victor of Katniss's love might not be Peeta and may be Gale.
Katniss is strategically placed between Peeta and Gale in a way that suggests the closeness of the relationship between her and the two characters.
The poster displays Katniss directly in the middle of the poster commanding the attention of the viewer.
The placement of Katniss in the middle of the two male characters illustrates the idea that Katniss must choose between the two suitors who is "ever in her favor".
The body position of Katniss alludes to which suitor Katniss might choose which is different than what the poster illustrates in comparison to the lighting of the picture.
The lighting of the picture and the matching of the outfits suggest that Peeta is the correct choice for Katniss; however, the body positioning of Katniss hints to the idea that Gale is the option she may choose.
Katniss's back is facing toward Peeta strengthening the idea that she is not going to choose Peeta.
Gale on the other hand seems like the suitor Katniss will selesct because her body is facing towards him; in contrast however there is a larger amount of distance between Gale and Katniss in comparison to the closeness of Peeta and Katniss.
Katniss, Gale, and Peeta are all entangled in a love triangle and Katniss represents the all-controlling power and must make a difficult decision of which suitor she will choose.
The red strip of cloth on her jacket is the color of love and illustrates that she is ultimately in charge of deciding who the victor of the game will be and who has odds in their favor; her newly discovered star-crossed lover or her best friend.
The tragic love triangle illustrated on the poster suggests that although there is a connection between Katniss and each of the boys, the ultimate victor will be Peeta.








Assignment Filename =  034draft3.txt
By looking at the confusion of Katniss when she is placed in the Quarter Quell arena and her transformation into a fierce and determined competitor, we can see the effects of a person entering into an unknown territory and being forced to fight for their life, this is important because the experience relates to the D-day invasion which helps explain Katniss' transformation in the Quarter Quell in relation to an American soldier fighting for their country and thus gives the scene a more dramatic and important flare.
Throughout the first two books in The Hunger Games series Katniss Everdeen has always been portrayed as a levelheaded competitor who is not flustered by many of the capital's distractions and is very resourceful and aware of her surroundings.
Katniss was able to understand Haymitch's subtle hints throughout the first hunger games and because of her superior deciphering skills was crowned one of the victors of the Hunger Games.
However in the second book when Katniss learns she must go into the Quarter Quell and fight for her life again, Katniss appears to lose control of the situation and her sanity.
The loss of control is illustrated throughout the second novel, especially during the scene where Katniss is placed into the Quarter Quell arena.
"Where are you?
I can still make no sense of my surroundings.
Where are you?!
I demand an answer from myself and slowly the world comes into focus" (Collins 267-68).
This line illustrates the distracted side of Katniss and her inability to concentrate on what is important-the fact that she is in an arena fighting for her life and ultimately trying to protect Peeta.
Eventually Katniss regains control of the situation and begins to use her hunter/survival instinct and discovers that she is surrounded by water, Peeta is blocked from view, and the main arena is the island in the middle of the water and that land mass contains the cornucopia.
Immediately after Katniss assesses the scene and emerges onto the island she becomes a fierce competitor with a killer instinct.
The line, "I'm thinking like a career now, and the first thing I want is to get my hands on a weapon" (Collins 269) illustrates Katniss' ferocity and the new side of Katniss that was not illustrated previously in the novels.
The change in the mentality of Katniss is related to that of an American soldier being dumped onto the beach of Normandy and being forced to fight for their life.
Katniss emerged into the new environment confused and bewildered; however, after few seconds she was able to regain control and grasp onto reality and realize that she must fight for her life and to protect Peeta.
This is similar to the American troops who were fighting to save their life and their country.
The D-Day invasion occurred on June 6, 1944 when the allied forces invaded the beaches of Normandy and brought the World War II fighting to Europe.
Almost a hundred thousand soldiers attacked the beaches of Normandy and nearly ten thousand died during the attack.
The allied forces attacked the beach by land, air, and water.
Hundreds of boats and tanks emerged along the coastline and attacked the opposing side.
The soldiers were placed into a new environment; especially the soldiers who emerged from the water.
Roy Arnn gives a personal narrative of his experience when he invades Omaha Beach during the Normandy Invasion.
Mr. Arnn recalls being told that he is going to be a part of Boat Crew # 8 and the training he had to receive before the invasion; however the training he received could not even prepare him for what he was really being put into.
This is similar to Katniss because in the beginning of the second novel Katniss is being trained in order that she might win the Quarter Quell however none of the training could have prepared her for being thrown into an island in the middle of the ocean on a foreign terrain.
Roy Arnn recalls being in the boat and soldiers having puke bags around their necks because they were unaccustomed to the rock of the waves.
However as soon as the first gunfire was shot and the battle/invasion began all the soldiers sprang into action and none were worried about the new environment.
This is also similar to Katniss, she comes into the arena and is in shock and does not understand where she is but within seconds of being placed in the arena Katniss regains control and determines where she is.
Then shortly after she figures out where she is, she immediately becomes a girl with a killer instinct.
Both Katniss and the soldiers fighting during World War II in the Normandy Invasion where thrown into an environment that was unfamiliar to them and neither one knew how to handle the situation at first.
However after coming to the realization that they were being forced to fight for their life and to protect something they love a transformation occurred among Katniss and the soldiers.
The similarities between the transformations of Katniss and soldiers shaped the reading of the Hunger Games and made the scene where Katniss was introduced into the arena more powerful.
Katniss is like a confused soldier however she realized what is important to her and transformed into a determined person who was set on the idea to save the person she loves.  








Assignment Filename =  034final3.txt
Throughout the Hunger Games series Katniss Everdeen illustrates some of the same tendencies and attitudes of an American soldier.
Throughout the first novel of the Hunger Games series Katniss was illustrated as a level-headed competitor who was not easily distracted by the Capital.
In the novel Katniss did not back down from a fight and she did not seem flustered by the idea that she was being forced to fight for her life against 23 other tributes.
However in Catching Fire, the second novel of the Hunger Games series, Katniss undergoes a transformation when she is informed that she must return to the Hunger Game arena in a fight known as the Quarter Quells.
Confusion strikes Katniss when she first arrives in the quarter quell arena and emerges into an area surrounded by water; however, within seconds Katniss has a change in attitude and she transforms into a killing machine that is determine to protect Peeta at any cost.
The change in Katniss illustrated in this scene is similar to the change undergone by the soldiers fighting in D-Day.
The soldiers on D-Day emerged from the water and began to fight on the beaches of Normandy.
When the soldiers were first arriving on the beaches confusion struck; however within minutes soldiers realized their purpose for invading this beach and began to fight with great intensity in order to protect themselves and the country they love.
By looking at the confusion of Katniss when she is placed in the Quarter Quell arena and her quick transformation into a fierce and determined competitor, we can see the effects of a person entering into an unknown territory and being forced to fight for their life and for someone they love, this is important because the experience relates to the D-day invasion which helps explain Katniss' transformation in the Quarter Quell arena in relation to an American soldier fighting for his country.
Katniss loss of control is illustrated when she first arrives into the Quarter Quell arena.
In the first novel Katniss emerges into the arena with a determined attitude; however in the second novel when she emerges into the arena a look of complete shock and traumatization covers her face.
The confusion of Katniss is illustrated by the line, "Where are you?
I can still make no sense of my surroundings.
Where are you?!
I demand an answer from myself and slowly the world comes into focus" (Collins 267-68).
This line illustrates the distracted side of Katniss and her inability to concentrate on what is important; the fact that she is in an arena fighting for her life and ultimately trying to protect Peeta.
Eventually Katniss regains control of the situation and begins to use her hunter/survival instinct to discover that she is surrounded by water, Peeta is blocked from view, and the main arena is the island in the middle of the water, which contains the cornucopia.
Immediately after Katniss assesses the scene and swims onto the island she becomes a fierce competitor with a killer instinct.
The line, "I'm thinking like a career now, and the first thing I want is to get my hands on a weapon" (Collins 269) illustrates Katniss' ferocity and the new side of Katniss that was not illustrated previously in the novels.
The change in the mentality of Katniss relates to an American soldier storming onto the beach at Normandy and being forced to fight for his life.
Katniss emerged into the new environment confused and bewildered; however, after few seconds she was able to regain control and grasp reality.
Katniss quickly realized the realness of the situation and that she must fight for her life and protect Peeta.
The D-Day invasion occurred on June 6, 1944 when the allied forces landed on the beaches of Normandy and brought the allied invasion to Western Europe.
Almost a hundred thousand soldiers attacked the beaches of Normandy and nearly ten thousand died.
The allied forces attacked the beach by land, air, and water.
Hundreds of boats and tanks emerged along the coastline and attacked occupied France.
The soldiers were placed into a new environment; especially the soldiers who emerged from the water.
Roy Arnn gives a personal narrative of his experience when he invades Omaha.
Mr. Arnn recalls being told that he is going to be part of Boat Crew # 8 and the training he would have to receive before the invasion; however the training could not prepare him for what he was going to experience.
This is similar to Katniss because in the beginning of the second novel Katniss is being trained in order that she might win the Quarter Quell; however none of the training could have prepared her for being thrown onto an island in the middle of the ocean on foreign terrain.
Roy Arnn recalls being in the boat with soldiers having puke bags around their necks because they were unaccustomed to the rock of the waves.
However as soon as the first gunfire was recieved and the battle began, all the soldiers sprang into action and none were focused on their new environment.
This is similar to Katniss, she comes into the arena and is in shock and does not understand where she is, but within seconds she regains control and gains her bearings.
Then shortly after she immediately becomes a girl with a killer instinct.
Both Katniss and the soldiers fighting during the Normandy Invasion where thrown into an environment that was unfamiliar to them and neither one knew how to handle the situation at first.
However, after coming to the realization that they were being forced to fight for their life and to protect something they loved a transformation occurred.
Katniss was thrown into the Quarter Quell arena immediately after she witnessed the death of Cinna, a member of her team that she greatly cared about.
Soldiers who were invading the beaches of Normandy watched their comrades boats explode next to them because the boats had hit a minefield.
Archie Sanderson, a soldier who fought in D-Day recalls approaching the Normandy beaches and seeing the ocean filled with American soldiers and boats not having the ability to stop.
He also recalls "the real horror of the battle unveiled" as he witness the primary control vessel suddenly begin to sink.
Sam Grundfast, another war veteran recalls a thunderous boom and him being thrown overboard and him realizing that his ship had hit a minefield.
Grundfast was luckily picked up by a boat going to shore to drop off the first wave of soldiers who were going to fight for their country.
Although Katniss was forced to watch the brutal murder of a person she cared deeply about her entrance into an unknown environment was not as traumatizing as the D-Day experience for the American soldiers.
The similarities between the transformations of Katniss and the American soldiers shaped the reading of the Hunger Games and made the scene where Katniss was introduced into the arena more powerful.
Katniss at first is like a confused soldier, however as she quickly realizes what is important to her, she transforms into a determined person.
Katniss understood that she needed to save the person she loved and would do anything to achieve that goal.
Although Katniss was not thrown into a bloody battlefield like the troops; she still entered into a traumatizing situation, especially for a seventeen year old girl.
Katniss was forced to take on a mentality that was similar to the American troops and she managed to keep her wits about her and protect the person she loves most.
Katniss's transformation and desire to fight throughout the rest of the Hunger Games series is similar to an American soldier fighting to protect the thing they love the most, their country. 






Assignment Filename =  035draft1.txt
In Suzanne Collins's The Hunger Games, a constant dynamic is established between those who control society and those who actually contribute to its existence.
A theme of oppression becomes clearly evident, posing the possibility for dissent and rebellion within the society of Panem.
The characters used in the plot serve as symbols to this grueling process and its development throughout the book and continuing series.
By looking at the first meeting between Katniss and her stylist Cinna, we can see Katniss's faults and social shortcomings in her judgments of those around her, which many readers often fail to consider.
This is important because it demonstrates that despite Katniss's pre-conceived expectations, not all citizens of the Capitol are alike.
Within an oppressed society, individuality must exist for any wave of change to occur, and in this passage from The Hunger Games, Katniss and Cinna represent that individuality which could potentially challenge the oppressive nation of Panem.
When Cinna first approaches the complex Katniss, she is initially surprised by his refined beauty and simplistic style, which is so uncharacteristic of typical capitol citizens.
Katniss has shown herself to not always be the most socially aware character and her encounter with Cinna reinforces this hypothesis.
We as readers may notice an immediate tone in her during this encounter as she wearily attempts to understand his behavior.
While Katniss carefully analyzes her stylist she is reacting in a way stereotypical of an oppressed person.
She is weary, fearful, and even possibly intimidated of this man, not because he has personally assaulted her in any way, but merely because he is one of "them".
Upon their first meeting, Cinna represents to Katniss the Capitol, which in turn represents control and oppression.
Cinna, however, immediately begins to contradict the image of a Capitol citizen by showing Katniss extreme kindness.
As he compliments her hairstyle, we see a repetition of Katniss's social awkwardness.
She is unsure of how to respond to such honest kindness in part because she does not view herself as valuable or understand the effect she has on those around her.
After learning that this is Cinna's first year as a stylist in the Hunger Games she immediately pounces on what she believes to be the obvious by asking, "So they gave you District Twelve"(64).
This simple interrogation provides key insight into not only Katniss's low view of herself, but her lack of enthusiasm concerning her native district as well.
The belief that District Twelve is of less value than other districts is an opinion that has been given precedent by the Capitol with its sheer indifference towards the poverty and starvation that constantly occurs there.
The most significant surprise come when Cinna unexpectedly responds to the question by stating the contrary; "I asked for District twelve"(64).
This statement is a direct contradiction to Katniss's previous thoughts and judgments of Cinna and his intentions in the games.
He is not participating to bring glory to his own name and career but rather to actually do something kind and good for a district that is rarely the recipient of some decencies.
In this section of the passage a certain conclusion can be made about Cinna.
Though his intentions are not entirely clear at this moment in the plot, he is clearly a man of the little people.
For some reason he possesses admiration for a lowly girl rom District Twelve and what she represents.
Cinna is probably the first character thus far to place any true level of confidence in Katniss or to act as a friend towards her.
Though inciting rebellion may not be any intention belonging to Cinna, he is clearly distinct in comparison to other Capitol people and the cruel oppression they represent.
He is more involved in the actual happenings of the Games instead of viewing it on the television like some sporting event.
In the next section of the passage a large amount of internal thoughts come forth from Katniss; primarily concerning the meal in front of her.
At first glance this may seem of little significance, however in this passage Katniss compares the meal and its ingredients to what she could possibly conjure up for a meal at home.
She thinks out the entire vigorous process that it would require for a poor girl like her to even begin to assemble something that compares to the fine meal laid before her.
This presents a major contrast between the people of the Capitol and those of the poorer districts of Panem.
In the Capitol, everything is done for entertainment and pleasure.
This is a very different mindset from the people of the outer districts who struggle on a daily basis to work enough to put a meager amount of food on their tables.
Here again, the theme of oppression is clearly present.
Cinna once again seems to understand Katniss on a deeper level by saying, "How despicable we must seem to you"(65).
The importance of this dialogue is great because it signifies that Cinna recognizes that something is wrong with the lifestyle he knows.
While most of the Capitol citizens remain oblivious to the continuing oppression and their role in its execution, Cinna knows and understands to some extent the larger picture.
Katniss does not respond verbally but instead thinks to herself,  "He's right though.
The whole rotten lot of them is despicable"(65).
The entire Capitol is lumped together into an oppressive group in the minds of potentially rebellious districts; demonstrating the struggle between the oppressor, versus the oppressed.
It is Cinna's individuality and recognition of this horror that reveals a crack in the fortress of Panem, foreshadowing the trying struggle to come.
Katniss and Cinna are unique symbolic characters that are not only valuable to this particular passage, but The Hunger Games series as a whole.
Katniss, despite her personal challenges and troubled social skills, is a strong figure that is beginning to recognize that she plays a role in this changing society.
Cinna offers the insight she needs by providing her with a solid start in her journey and understanding the evils of the land that they inhabit together.
The oppression that occurs in Panem prior to the games is key to the shifting mentality of its citizens and the slow, but imminent rebellion that will ensue.






Assignment Filename =  035final1.txt
In Suzanne Collins's The Hunger Games, a constant dynamic is established between those who control society and those who actually contribute to its existence.
A theme of oppression becomes clearly evident, posing the possibility for dissent and rebellion within the society of Panem.
The characters used in the plot serve as symbols to this grueling process and its development throughout the book and continuing series.
By looking at the first meeting between Katniss and her stylist Cinna in The Hunger Games, we can see Katniss's faults and social shortcomings in her judgments of those around her, which many readers often fail to consider.
This is important because it demonstrates that despite Katniss's pre-conceived expectations, not all citizens of the Capitol are alike.
Within an oppressed society, individuality must exist for any wave of change to occur, and in this passage from The Hunger Games, Katniss and Cinna represent that individuality with their non-conventional attitudes and view of the world in which they live, which could potentially challenge the oppressive nation of Panem.
When Cinna first approaches the complex Katniss, she is initially surprised by his refined beauty and simplistic style, which is so uncharacteristic of typical capitol citizens.
"Cinna has met none of these expectations" (64), she remarks to herself, referring to his lacking of typical flamboyance that one would expect of someone with his job.
Katniss has shown herself to not always be the most socially aware character and her encounter with Cinna reinforces this hypothesis.
We as readers may notice an immediate tone in her during this encounter as she wearily attempts to understand his behavior.
While Katniss carefully analyzes her stylist she is reacting in a way stereotypical of an oppressed person.
She is weary, fearful, and even possibly intimidated of this man, not because he has personally assaulted her in any way, but merely because he is one of "them".
Upon their first meeting, Cinna represents to Katniss the Capitol, which in turn represents control and oppression.
Cinna, however, immediately begins to contradict the image of a Capitol citizen by showing Katniss extreme kindness.
As he compliments her hairstyle, compliments her mother's skill as well which is a tender spot for Katniss at this point, we see a repetition of Katniss's social awkwardness when she seems taken aback.
She is unsure of how to respond to such honest kindness in part because she does not view herself as valuable or understand the effect she has on those around her.
Previously in her life Katniss has been the caretaker in her mother's psychological absence and has never taken the time to consider her own importance to the people she is closest to, much less a complete stranger in an unfamiliar situation.
After learning that this is Cinna's first year as a stylist in the Hunger Games she immediately pounces on what she believes to be the obvious by asking, "So they gave you District Twelve"(64).
This simple interrogation provides key insight into not only Katniss's low view of herself, but her lack of enthusiasm concerning her native district as well.
The belief that District Twelve is of less value than other districts is an opinion that has been given precedent by the Capitol with its sheer indifference towards the poverty and starvation that constantly occurs there.
While other districts such as 1 and 2 are shown favoritism by the Capitol since they supply them with the extravagances they require to maintain their lavish lifestyle, District 12 seems almost forgotten by the other Districts as well.
Though Katniss is not ashamed of her home, she is very well aware of how others look down on where she comes from.
The most significant surprise come when Cinna unexpectedly responds to the question by stating the contrary; "I asked for District twelve"(64).
This statement is simple in appearance but is a direct contradiction to Katniss's previous thoughts and judgments of Cinna and his intentions in the games.
He is not participating to bring glory to his own name and career but rather to actually do something kind and good for a district that is rarely the recipient of some decencies.
In this section of the passage a certain conclusion can be made about Cinna.
Though his intentions are not entirely clear at this moment in the plot, he is clearly a man of the underdog and values District 12 even when others may let it slip from their minds.
For some reason he possesses admiration for a lowly girl rom District Twelve and what she represents.
Cinna is probably the first character thus far to place any true level of confidence in Katniss or to act as a friend towards her.
He is more involved in the actual happenings of the Games and is rooting for Katniss instead of ignoring her because she is from District 12 like others that view the games on the television like some sporting event.
Though inciting rebellion may not be any intention belonging to Cinna, he is clearly distinct in comparison to other Capitol people and the cruel oppression they represent.
However, it is not only his kindness that separates him from the rest of the citizens of the Capitol.
Cinna as a character lacks the self-absorbed tendencies that most of the other people around him possess and instead focuses on the needs of people around him like Katniss and Peeta.
And more significant than that, he actually understands listens to Katniss and empathizes with her rather than showing her pity and sympathy.
In the next section of the passage a large amount of internal thoughts come forth from Katniss, primarily concerning the meal in front of her.
At first glance this may seem of little significance; however in this passage Katniss compares the meal and its ingredients to what she could possibly conjure up for a meal at home.
She thinks out the entire vigorous process that it would require for a poor girl like her to even begin to assemble something that compares to the fine meal laid before her.
This presents a major contrast between the people of the Capitol and those of the poorer districts of Panem.
In the Capitol, everything is done for entertainment and pleasure.
This is a very different mindset from the people of the outer districts who struggle on a daily basis to work enough to put a meager amount of food on their tables.
Here again, the theme of oppression is clearly present.
Cinna once again seems to understand Katniss on a deeper level by saying, "How despicable we must seem to you"(65).
The importance of this dialogue is great because it signifies that Cinna recognizes that something is wrong with the lifestyle he knows.
While most of the Capitol citizens remain oblivious to the continuing oppression and their role in its execution, Cinna knows and understands to some extent the larger picture.
Katniss does not respond verbally but instead thinks to herself,  "He's right though.
The whole rotten lot of them is despicable"(65).
The entire Capitol is lumped together into an oppressive group in the minds of potentially rebellious districts, demonstrating the struggle between the oppressor, versus the oppressed.
It is Cinna's individuality and recognition of this horror that reveals a crack in the fortress of Panem, foreshadowing the trying struggle to come.
Katniss and Cinna are unique symbolic characters that are not only valuable to this particular passage, but The Hunger Games series as a whole.
Katniss, despite her personal challenges and troubled social skills, is a strong figure that is beginning to recognize that she plays a role both in the games and in a changing society.
Cinna offers the insight she needs by providing her with a solid start in her journey, listening and having confidence in her as a tribute, and understanding the evils of the land that they inhabit together.
Though they both play very different roles as characters, both Katniss and Cinna are sparks of individuality in a world that thrives on conformation to control and oppress.
The oppression that occurs in Panem prior to the games is key to the shifting mentality of its citizens and the slow, but imminent rebellion that will ensue.  








Assignment Filename =  036draft2.txt
The Hunger Games film, when used as a visual text, makes many statements to its viewers about the nation of Panem, the Capitol, and the role of the government in the Hunger Games pageant.
By looking at the scene in which the head game maker, Seneca Crane, walks into the room with the cup of nightlock berries, we notice the ornate design and presentation of the cup and the room in which it sits.
This is important because it makes a statement about the cruel irony of the Capitol, which can twist something as dark as punishment and death into an elaborate, overly glorified game.
This scene serves as a model of how the Capitol and President Snow address conflicts and challenges, not only with the goal of eliminating potential threats but with the intention of using psychological tactics to cause damage and implement social control.
As Seneca Crane is being led to the room the viewer begins to acknowledge that something is not entirely right with the situation.
Seneca himself however almost appears pleased with himself as he enters the room and it is only when he turns around to realize that the doors have been shut and locked, and that he is now a prisoner within this strange room, that his expression begins to change into one of dread and fear.
As this occurs, the viewer truly gets a chance to take in the scene of the room in which the game maker is now trapped.
The design is one of obvious wealth and grandeur, but also seems to possess a very menacing or eerie atmosphere that contributes to the negative feelings the viewer experiences.
The ornate crystal cup is presented in the center of the room, almost as if it is some "prize" for the game maker.
This cup contains a small handful of lethally poisonous nightlock berries, which viewers should remember from the conclusion of the games with the victories of Katniss and Peeta.
The berries themselves stand out from the clear crystal of the cup, making them appear desirable and as a symbol of temptation, even though they are meant to lead Seneca to his death.
The atmosphere of the room in which Seneca Crane will die is ominous and eerie.
There are factors within the design of the scene that contribute to the interpretation of the atmosphere by the viewer.
Often during the film, music is selectively played or removed to convey emotions in significant moments of the plot and this scene is no different.
As Seneca enters the room music is not only present but presented in a very noticeable manner.
It is similar in style to something that might be played preceding some battle scene in another film, contributing to the idea in the scene that something very important is about to occur.
The notes climax and increase in volume when Seneca finally is standing over the cup and glancing down into his own demise.
At this moment, any previous doubts as to what was happening in this scene evaporate as the viewer sees the berries in the cup through Seneca's own eyes.
The camera angle used at this moment provides insight into the character's plight and the certainty that his end is eminent.
What makes this scene especially unique is its twisted portrayal of the punishment and death of Seneca Crane.
We know at this point in the film, that not only has the game maker failed, but that he has also caused the Capitol to fail as well.
The Capitol operates on a system of fear and intimidation, which ensures that it will remain in control of the districts and their people.
However, at this moment the Capitol is a weak figure that has failed in its largest effort of social control- The Hunger Games.
Seneca, as head game maker, is held responsible for this failure in the mind of President Snow.
His execution itself is not really all that shocking and is almost to be expected in the situation, but the manner in which it is completed exemplifies the unwavering cruelty of Snow.
Seneca is not put in the public eye in front of a firing squad, but rather is placed in a room of the wealthy with a tool to carry out his own suicidal execution.
Even in the moment of his death Seneca is still a part of the games and is forced to be in control of his own outcome.
Though a short scene within the film, Seneca's death scene is one of the most significant and insightful ones that viewers will experience.
At this point in the plot, one should make realizations about the Capitol and the nation of Panem that may not have been made earlier on.
Seneca's death itself, is not only a model for the cruelty of the Capitol, but a symbol of the games themselves.
In the world of the Hunger Games, children are placed in a pageant by their government where they are forced to kill one another for the glory of the game.
In the chosen scene, Seneca Crane is placed in a room where he must take charge of his own fate and kill himself by the same manner in which Katniss and Peeta ended the games and shamed the Capitol.
This is an example of not only the sick mindset of the Capitol in this particular situation, but rather the method by which they execute social control in all instances of governing.
The death of Seneca, like the deaths of all the tributes in the games demonstrate how in the eyes on the Capitol and President Snow, everything is a game and everything can be manipulated as such.






Assignment Filename =  036final2.txt
The Hunger Games film, when used as a visual text, makes many statements to its viewers about the nation of Panem, the Capitol, and the role of the government in the Hunger Games pageant.
By looking at the scene in which the head game maker, Seneca Crane, walks into the room with the cup of nightlock berries, we notice the ornate design and presentation of the cup and the room in which it sits.
This is important because it makes a statement about the cruel irony of the Capitol, which can twist something as dark as punishment and death into an elaborate, overly glorified game.
This scene serves as a model of how the Capitol and President Snow address conflicts and challenges, not only with the goal of eliminating potential threats but with the intention of using psychological tactics to cause damage and implement social control.
As Seneca Crane is being led to the room the viewer begins to acknowledge that something is not entirely right with the situation.
The peacekeepers surrounding Seneca are stiff and appear unfeeling and it is obvious that they know where the situation is proceeding to.
Seneca himself however almost appears pleased with himself as he enters the room and it is only when he turns around to realize that the doors have been shut and locked, and that he is now a prisoner within this strange room, that his expression begins to change into one of dread and fear.
As this occurs, the viewer truly gets a chance to take in the scene of the room in which the game maker is now trapped.
The design is one of obvious wealth and grandeur, but also seems to possess a very menacing or eerie atmosphere that contributes to the negative feelings the viewer experiences.
The room is bold and strong, with contrasting colors of black and white covering the tiling of the floor.
This is suggestive of a meeting between something good and evil, and in this case the evil will prevail.
The ornate crystal cup is presented in the center of the room, almost as if it is some "prize" for the game maker.
This cup contains a small handful of lethally poisonous nightlock berries, which viewers should remember from the conclusion of the games with the victories of Katniss and Peeta.
The berries themselves stand out from the clear crystal of the cup, making them appear desirable and as a symbol of temptation, even though they are meant to lead Seneca to his death.
The atmosphere of the room in which Seneca Crane will die is ominous and eerie.
There are factors within the design of the scene that contribute to the interpretation of the atmosphere by the viewer.
Often during the film, music is selectively played or removed to convey emotions in significant moments of the plot and this scene is no different.
As Seneca enters the room music is not only present but presented in a very noticeable manner.
It is similar in style to something that might be played preceding some battle scene in another film, contributing to the idea in the scene that something very important is about to occur.
The notes climax and increase in volume when Seneca finally is standing over the cup and glancing down into his own demise.
At this moment, any previous doubts as to what was happening in this scene evaporate as the viewer sees the berries in the cup through Seneca's own eyes.
The camera angle used at this moment provides insight into the character's plight and the certainty that his end is eminent.
What makes this scene especially unique is its twisted portrayal of the punishment and death of Seneca Crane.
We know at this point in the film, that not only has the game maker failed, but that he has also caused the Capitol to fail as well.
The Capitol operates on a system of psychological abuse such as fear and intimidation, which ensures that it will remain in control of the districts and their people.
However, at this moment the Capitol is a weak figure that has failed in its largest effort of social control- The Hunger Games.
Seneca, as head game maker, is held responsible for this failure in the mind of President Snow.
His execution itself is not really all that shocking and is almost to be expected in the situation, but the manner in which it is completed exemplifies the unwavering cruelty of Snow.
Seneca is not put in the public eye in front of a firing squad, but rather is isolated in a room of the wealthy with a tool to carry out his own suicidal execution.
Even in the moment of his death Seneca is still a part of the games and is forced to be in control of his own outcome.
Though a short scene within the film, Seneca's death scene is one of the most significant and insightful ones that viewers will experience.
At this point in the plot, one should make realizations about the Capitol and the nation of Panem that may not have been made earlier on.
Seneca's death itself is not only a model for the cruelty of the Capitol, but a symbol of the games themselves.
Seneca's failure itself was due to the fact that he fell into the sudden desperate plan of Katniss when he did not allow her to kill herself and Peeta.
Though he had no true option.
If they would have died he still would have failed and caused an even larger conflict for Snow and the Capitol.
In the world of the Hunger Games, children are placed in a pageant by their government where they are forced to kill one another for the glory of the game.
In the chosen scene, Seneca Crane is placed in a room where he must take charge of his own fate and kill himself by the same manner in which Katniss and Peeta ended the games and shamed the Capitol.
This is an example of not only the sick mindset of the Capitol in this particular situation, but rather the method by which they execute social control in all instances of governing.
The death of Seneca, like the deaths of all the tributes in the games demonstrate how in the eyes on the Capitol and President Snow, everything is a game and everything can be manipulated as such.






Assignment Filename =  037draft3.txt
In Suzanne Collins's second installment of The Hunger Games series, Catching Fire, the tensions continue to grow between the Capitol and the citizens of Panem.
One day, Katniss encounters two refugees from District 8, Bonnie and Twill, who are on a journey to the supposedly desolate District 13.
Their confidence in its existence and their pursuit of it as a place of refuge is beyond shocking to Katniss, who denies that such a place could exist and have just stood by and watched the struggle of the people of Panem.
However, throughout history bystanders in times of crisis have been present, especially in the event of the Rwandan genocide, where the country was ignored by more powerful and influential western nations as well as the United Nations.
By looking at Katniss's disbelief and anger towards the possibility of the existence of District 13 and the similar feeling of abandonment experienced by the people of Rwanda during the bloodshed of genocide, we can see the parallel formed by both District 13 in Catching Fire and the United Nations during the Rwandan genocide.
This is important because in both of these dire scenarios, the inaction of bystanders proved just as destructive as the violence itself, and caused unexpected characters to take a stand and emerge as heroes.
When Katniss first hears Bonnie and Twill's reasoning behind believing in the existence of District 13, readers would expect maybe happiness or at least a sense of relief from her considering that this could be good if not even great news.
As far as Katniss knows, there could finally be a potential for help to not only the people throughout the districts of Panem but the growing revolutionary sentiments against President Snow and the Capitol.
However, rather than basking in the positivity of these possibilities, Katniss immediately clings to a negative viewpoint of District 13 because she realizes that if their existence is true, then they have been present all along and have been watching the other districts starve and suffer the torture of the Hunger Games.
This viewpoint is the exact same that was adopted by many Hutu people during the Rwandan genocide.
While 800,000 people were murdered in the bloodshed of the genocide, people wondered where the help was.
There were many nations with the power and influence to engage in the war but yet no one did.
People like the hotel manager depicted in the film Hotel Rwanda, Paul Rusesabagina, had no outer forces to rely on for assistance.
Even the United Nations refrained from called the events in Rwanda a "genocide", which would require action by the organization.
After Katniss listens to Bonnie and Twill she thinks to herself  "And suddenly I hate this imaginary underground city of District 13 and those who sit by watching us die.
They're no better than the Capitol.
" (148) Rusesabagina was faced with similar feelings when forced to remain captive in his own hotel with hidden refugees and his family.
Rather than have to consider an "imaginary" bystander to blame, he witnessed the bystanders before his very own eyes; watching soldiers sent by the United Nations who were under orders to not even fire on those assaulting the people unless they were assaulted themselves.
The primary function of the soldiers was to merely serve as a "peacekeepers", even though they could not truly engage in offensive acts to actually keep the peace.
Both Katniss and Rusesabagina experienced the same probing question, "Why haven't they helped us?
" (148)
	
The inaction of bystanders in both Catching Fire and during the Rwandan genocide proved to cause insurmountable consequences.
Katniss witnessed horrors be thrown onto her friends, such as Gale's whipping, and then she herself is selected in a ploy of the Capitol to enter the area of the Hunger Games once again, and face death for the second time with Peter.
Rusesabagina was forced to lie to both rebel and Hutu leaders in order to keep him and the refugees he protected out of harm's way.
This involved cashing in previous favors and bribing dangerous people of power as well.
It is in this respect that we can also begin to see a point being made with Katniss's character in Catching Fire.
Her reactions and anger towards District 13 makes a statement about those who stay uninvolved in times of conflict when they have the power to help and inflict change in the situation.
Her attitude suggests that inaction is in its own way, its own form of evil and corruption, that is perhaps even more dangerous and detrimental than the evil of the outright violence she experiences from the tyranny of the Capitol.
This suggestion is proven valid in the context of the Rwandan genocide.
Though the violence originally erupted from a history of disagreement and prejudice between two ethnic groups, the inaction of the United Nations and western countries added fuel to the fire by leaving the groups to attempt to end the bloodshed on their own.
Rebel groups, who were attacked and only caused more bloodshed by firing back on the people who assaulted them, which in turn completely pinned the two ethnicities against one another.
No one know for sure what would have happened if other nations would have gotten involved from the beginning, but surely the bloodshed would not have continued to take the lives of over 800, 000 lives in 100 days.
After being exposed to the horrors of both the situation in Panem and the events of the genocide, Katniss and Rusesabagina are forced to undergo transformations as characters.
Of course Katniss is fictional, however her transformation throughout Catching Fire and the rest of the series is very realistic and even somewhat similar to that of Rusesabagina and the role he plays in Rwanda.
Katniss does not enter the games out of her own will, but only as a last resort to save her sister Prim from certain death.
Throughout the course of the first games she grows and develops as a character, both establishing relationships with other characters such as Peeta, Cinna, and Haymitch but also establishing a hatred for the Capitol and President Snow and the tortures he has put her and her people through.
Katniss's role throughout the series changes as well.
She transforms from an insignificant girl who only cares about her sister to a symbol for something much larger, a revolution in fact.
In this same way, Paul Rusesabagina changes as well, except as a real life character.
In order to maintain the safety of him and his family he not only lies, bribes, and cashes in favors but takes in others under his wing to attempt to protect as well.
Surrounded by the effects of inaction in a serious time of conflict, both Katniss and Rusesabagina rise up and someone that people can look up to for protection and leadership in a time of need.
They are both heroes in numerous ways, and largely unexpected ones at that.
However, it remains true that their heroism would have never been truly necessary if much more capable forces and decided to stand up for them at an earlier time.
The bravery of the heroes in Catching Fire and the Rwandan genocide are obvious, and the significance of the roles they played cannot be argued.
The necessity of their roles however, can.
Their heroism was merely a result of a lack of not only heroism, but responsibility by others who could have done more sooner.
Katniss's outrage with the idea of a District 13 is not only well placed but lens of what Paul Rusesabagina and the Rwandan people felt and experienced for 100 days, and in the aftermath of the genocide itself.
Suzanne Collins crafted Katniss and the Hunger Games series as a parallel for maybe not the Rwandan genocide itself (though they are certainly relevant and relatable) but for events like it in which tyranny exist and is not addressed properly by the correct people.
The events of bloodshed and war occur everyday, everyday somewhere in the world they are ignore by someone with the power, but not the will to help.






Assignment Filename =  037final3.txt
In Suzanne Collins's second installment of The Hunger Games series, Catching Fire, the tensions continue to grow between the Capitol and the citizens of Panem.
One day, Katniss encounters two refugees from District 8, Bonnie and Twill, who are on a journey to the supposedly desolate District 13.
Their confidence in its existence and their pursuit of it as a place of refuge is beyond shocking to Katniss, who denies that such a place could exist and have just stood by and watched the struggle of the people of Panem.
However, throughout history bystanders in times of crisis have been present, especially in the event of the Rwandan genocide, where the country was ignored by more powerful and influential western nations as well as the United Nations.
By looking at Katniss's disbelief and anger towards the possibility of the existence of District 13 and the similar feeling of abandonment experienced by the people of Rwanda during the bloodshed of genocide, we can see the parallel formed by both District 13 in Catching Fire and the United Nations during the Rwandan genocide.
This is important because in both of these dire scenarios, the inaction of bystanders proved just as destructive as the violence itself, and caused unexpected characters to take a stand and emerge as heroes.
When Katniss first hears Bonnie and Twill's reasoning behind believing in the existence of District 13, readers would expect maybe happiness or at least a sense of relief from her considering that this could be good if not even great news.
As far as Katniss knows, there could finally be a potential for help to not only the people throughout the districts of Panem but the growing revolutionary sentiments against President Snow and the Capitol.
However, rather than basking in the positivity of these possibilities, Katniss immediately clings to a negative viewpoint of District 13 because she realizes that if their existence is true, then they have been present all along and have been watching the other districts starve and suffer the torture of the Hunger Games.
This viewpoint is the exact same that was adopted by many Hutu people during the Rwandan genocide.
While 800,000 people were murdered in the bloodshed of the genocide, people often wondered where the help was.
There were many nations with the power and influence to engage in the war but yet no one did.
People like the hotel manager depicted in the film Hotel Rwanda, Paul Rusesabagina, had no outer forces to rely on for assistance.
Even the United Nations refrained from called the events in Rwanda a "genocide", which would require action by the organization.
After Katniss listens to Bonnie and Twill she thinks to herself  "And suddenly I hate this imaginary underground city of District 13 and those who sit by watching us die.
They're no better than the Capitol" (148).
Rusesabagina was faced with similar feelings when forced to remain captive in his own hotel with hidden refugees and his family.
Rather than have to consider an "imaginary" bystander to blame, he witnessed the bystanders before his very own eyes; watching soldiers sent by the United Nations who were under orders to not even fire on those assaulting the people of Rwanda but rather keep calm unless they were assaulted themselves.
The primary function of the soldiers was to merely serve as "peacekeepers", even though they could not truly engage in offensive acts to actually keep the peace.
Both Katniss and Rusesabagina experienced the same probing question in the midst of the horrors they experienced, "Why haven't they helped us?
" (148).
The inaction of bystanders in both Catching Fire and during the Rwandan genocide proved to cause insurmountable consequences.
Katniss witnessed horrors be thrown onto her friends, such as Gale's whipping, and then she herself was selected in a ploy of the Capitol to enter the area of the Hunger Games once again, and face death for the second time with Peter.
Rusesabagina was forced to lie to both rebel and Hutu leaders in order to keep him and the refugees he protected out of harm's way.
This involved cashing in previous favors and bribing dangerous people of power as well.
It is in this respect that we can also begin to see a point being made with Katniss's character in Catching Fire.
Her reactions and anger towards District 13 makes a statement about those who stay uninvolved in times of conflict when they have the power to help and inflict change in the situation.
Her attitude suggests that inaction is in its own way, its own form of evil and corruption, that is perhaps even more dangerous and detrimental than the evil of the outright violence she experiences from the tyranny of the Capitol.
This suggestion is proven valid in the context of the Rwandan genocide.
Though the violence originally erupted from a history of disagreement and prejudice between two ethnic groups, the Hutu and the Tutsi, the inaction of the United Nations and western countries added fuel to the fire by leaving the groups to attempt to end the bloodshed on their own.
Rebel groups, who were attacked only caused more bloodshed by firing back on the people who assaulted them, which in turn completely pinned the two ethnicities against one another.
No one knows for sure what would have happened if other nations would have gotten involved from the beginning, but surely the bloodshed would not have continued to take the lives of over eight-hundred lives in one-hundred days.
After being exposed to the horrors of both the situation in Panem and the events of the genocide, Katniss and Rusesabagina are forced to undergo transformations as characters.
Of course Katniss is fictional, however her transformation throughout Catching Fire and the rest of the series is very realistic and even somewhat similar to that of Rusesabagina and the role he plays in Rwanda.
Katniss does not enter the games out of her own will, but only as a last resort to save her sister Prim from certain death.
Throughout the course of the first games she grows and develops as a character, both establishing relationships with other characters such as Peeta, Cinna, and Haymitch but also establishing a hatred for the Capitol and President Snow and the tortures he has put her and her people through.
Katniss's role throughout the series changes as well.
She transforms from an insignificant girl who only cares about her sister to a symbol for something much larger, a revolution in fact.
In this same way, Paul Rusesabagina changes as well, except as a real life character.
In order to maintain the safety of him and his family, he not only lies, bribes, and cashes in favors but takes in others under his wing to attempt to protect as well.
Surrounded by the effects of inaction in a serious time of conflict, both Katniss and Rusesabagina rise up as leaders that people may look to for protection and leadership in a time of need.
They are both heroes in numerous ways, and largely unexpected ones at that.
However, it remains true that their heroism would have never been truly necessary if much more capable forces and decided to stand up for them at an earlier time.
The bravery of the heroes in Catching Fire and the Rwandan genocide are obvious, and the significance of the roles they played cannot be argued.
The necessity of their roles however, can.
Their heroism was merely a result of a lack of not only heroism, but of responsibility by others who could have done more sooner.
Katniss's outrage with the idea of a District 13 is not only well placed but lens of what Paul Rusesabagina and the Rwandan people felt and experienced for 100 days, and in the aftermath of the genocide itself.
Suzanne Collins crafted Katniss and the Hunger Games series as a parallel for maybe not the Rwandan genocide itself (though it was certainly a relevant and relatable event) but for events like it in which tyranny exist and is not addressed properly by the correct people.
The events of bloodshed and war occur everyday, everyday somewhere in the world they are ignore by someone with the power, but not the will to help.
The Hunger Games series also in a way offers a solution finally to the problem of inaction in its third installment Mockingjay.
The revolution finally comes when the evasive District 13 fully emerges and offers its support and resources to the sparking revolution, and it seizes Katniss as the mouthpiece for that revolution.
However, the resolution Collins provides in Mockingjay proves somewhat twisted by presenting the corruption in the end when those that were first bystanders finally step forward for their own personal gain.
Though Katniss and Peeta live on, there is always a subtle fear of relapse back into a time of suffering, and of war laced with inaction.






Assignment Filename =  038draft4.txt
In Suzanne Collins's The Hunger Games and Veronica Roth's Divergent, both authors present dystopian societies hindered by some form of corruption and evil, that is then challenged by unexpected female characters.
While both novels appear similar on the surface, the main characters are distinct from one another and progress throughout the novels in very different ways, which is key to creating complexities and variations in what might otherwise be very similar plots.
By looking at the careful, almost tentative development of the relationship between Tris and Four in Roth's Divergent in comparison to the rocky and distrustful relationship slowly formed by Katniss and Peeta in Collins's The Hunger Games, we can see the trend of how the main characters grow in their personal relationships, and in turn the relation of that trend to their growth and developments as heroines.
This is important because through the process of being cautious in her feelings towards and eventual relationship with Four, as well as her own personal assessments, Tris develops as a character in a way that is supportive to her role as a heroine, while Katniss's confusion and lack of emotional security hinders her success throughout the Hunger Games series.
Katniss and Tris are both characters with their own emotional flaws by far, however it seems that engaging in a personal relationship only accentuates Katniss's emotional and social shortcomings while engaging causes Tris to reevaluate aspects of herself in a way that enable her to grow.
Both characters, of course, develop a love interest throughout the course of their perspective novel, but it is the progression of these interests that define Katniss and Tris as characters and the progressions start on very different paths even from the very beginning.
When Katniss hears Peeta's name announced, as the male tribute at the reaping it is not her first experience with this boy; Peeta is and always has been "the boy with the bread" to Katniss.
This proves problematic for Katniss, who from the very beginning of the novel seems to analyze situations in terms of "give or take".
She feels that since Peeta threw her bread in the rain that she is now indebted to him, which poses an even greater issue since she will now be engaging with him in a battle to the death.
Katniss is a character plagued by social misjudgments, which serves an as interesting twist to readers who are sometimes more "in the loop" than Katniss herself.
However, her social misjudgments often concern Peeta, which was especially true when on the train she analyzed his attempts of trying to converse with and then cleaning up Haymitch as trying to gain an edge in the competition.
She does not allow herself to recognize Peeta as someone who is genuinely kind rather than someone plotting an elaborate game strategy.
In Divergent, Tris has never met Four until she arrives for Dauntless initiation and learns that the fearless looking young man will be her instructor as an initiate.
Tris seems to form an opinion on Four rather immediately by observing him and his interactions with characters such as Christina and Eric.
She acknowledges that he is perhaps dangerous but that he lacks the cruelty and condescending demeanor that Eric and the other Dauntless leaders possess.
Tris possesses more of an admiration and respect for Fours rather than the competitive tension that Katniss experiences with Peeta.
This is primarily due to the fact that there is an instructor/student dynamic between Tris and Four instead of that of two competitors that will be faced with the possibility of killing one another like Katniss and Peeta.
Though the natures of the relationships between the main characters are different in the two novels, it is the way that Katniss and Tris approach them from the beginning that is significant.
Katniss is rash and inaccurately judgmental of Peeta while Tris is in awe of Four.
From the beginning of both Divergent and The Hunger Games most readers can sense the impending love triangles, which are almost a necessity in such otherwise harshly plotted novels.
However in The Hunger Games when Peeta proclaims the feelings he has felt all his life for Katniss during the televised interviews she assaults him with violence and anger, accusing him of trying to make her look weak.
She only accepts his compliments of her when Haymitch puts it to her in a way that she can understand- a game strategy to help her look desirable and gain sponsors to help her in the games.
The fact that Katniss never evens acknowledges at this point that Peeta's feeling are not only true but that he genuinely cares about her well being more than his own is key to her emotional and social lacking.
Katniss has never considered herself desirable to anyone and has always pursued life as the caretaker aiming for day-to-day survival; she does not let emotions like romantic ideas of love to enter her mind, especially not in the deadly setting of the games.
In a similar point in the plot of Divergent, Tris has allowed herself to somewhat fall under the security of Four as he administers the fear simulations.
When he calls her out as Divergent, she has trust in him for some unknown reason.
This is a key difference between Katniss and Tris; Tris has the ability to trust others without clear reason and is able to make true alliances because of that quality.
Her abilities will assist her later in the novel when she needs a teammate along with friends to count on.
Katniss's lack of trust in Peeta throughout the games is evident, most obviously at the beginning when she actually believes that Peeta is hunting her down with the career tributes, when in fact he is attempting to lead them away from her.
Katniss does not allow herself to see the goodness in Peeta and instead of truly falling in love with him, she grows to use him by playing their "romance".
True, this falsehood gains tools that assist them both with survival in the games, but Peeta's caring attitude and love for Katniss is never an act at any point.
Tris and Four engage in a real relationship in Divergent, and though Tris is unsure exactly what to expect and how to move forward in it, she does have true feelings for Four and develops a relationship along with a partnership.
The relationships of Katniss and Peeta and Tris and Four are not just relationships in the simple romantic definition that some readers might seek.
These relationships are also key to specific plot developments and self-realizations of the main characters that define the works as wholes.
In The Hunger Games Katniss in constantly untrusting and hesitant in her relationship with Peeta, sometimes lying or hiding the truth from him in order to always maintain an edge.
When dire situations occur, Katniss never fails to revert back to her proven theme of self-preservation that has serves her throughout her life.
After all, Katniss only entered the games to save the life of her sister and she competes throughout the games with the burning desire and need to win and make it back home to her sister.
Katniss was perhaps never even really emotionally vulnerable enough to engage in a true relationship with Peeta.
Though they are presented as teammates throughout the novel, Katniss always seems to rise as her own player in the end.
Her lack of self-awareness is very unlike Tris who is constantly self-aware during Divergent.
Tris constantly questions herself, wondering whether she is selfish or brave?
Or Abnegation or Dauntless?
It is these questions that aid Tris in self-discovery of herself as Divergent and her acceptance of that element of herself.
It is also Tris's relationship with Four that gives her confidence in herself and allows her to accept and embrace her Divergence.
While Katniss uses her partnership with Peeta to survive in the games, Tris truly engages in her relationship with Four and makes valuable self-discoveries as a result of that relationship.
Both Katniss and Tris play significant roles in their stories, and they both have relationships that aid them in one way or another on their journeys.
Katniss emerges, as a victor with Peeta at the conclusion of the games, but at that point in the series has not really done anything heroic herself.
It was Peeta who originally wanted to challenge the Capitol and the cruelty of the games while Katniss was focused on mere survival and making it home to take care of Prim, even though they both engage in acts of rebellion.
Katniss does develop throughout The Hunger Games but is held back by her lack of emotional stability and her lack to connect effectively with those around her.
In Divergent, Tris embraces an emotional experience and relationship with Four that enables her to assess herself accurately and accept herself despite the questions and insecurities she previously felt.
Her acknowledgment of herself as Divergent allows her to rise up as a heroine when the attacks begin, and they also allow her to save Four and their relationship.






Assignment Filename =  038final4.txt
In Suzanne Collins's The Hunger Games and Veronica Roth's Divergent, both authors present dystopian societies hindered by some form of corruption and evil, that is then challenged by unexpected female characters who transform from ordinary citizens to heroines in their own way.
While both novels appear similar on the surface, the main characters are distinct from one another and progress throughout the novels in very different manners, which is essential to creating complexities and variations in what might otherwise be very similar plots between the two novels.
By looking at the careful, almost tentative development of the relationship between Tris and Four (also known as Tobias) in Roth's Divergent in comparison to the rocky and distrustful relationship slowly formed by Katniss and Peeta in Collins's The Hunger Games, we can see the trend of how the main characters grow in their personal relationships, and in turn the relation of that trend to their growth and developments as heroines.
This is important because through the process of being cautious in her feelings towards and eventual relationship with Four, as well as her own personal assessments, Tris develops as a character in a way that is supportive to her role as a heroine, while Katniss's confusion and lack of emotional security hinders her success and lessens her impact as a heroine throughout the Hunger Games series.
Katniss and Tris are both characters with their own emotional flaws by far, however it seems that engaging in a personal relationship only accentuates Katniss's emotional and social shortcomings while engaging causes Tris to reevaluate aspects of herself in a way that enable her to grow.
Both characters, of course, develop a love interest throughout the course of their perspective novel, but it is the progression of these interests that define Katniss and Tris as characters.
These progressions start on very different paths even from the very beginning and develop onward from there.
When Katniss hears Peeta's name announced, as the male tribute at the reaping it is not her first experience with this boy; Peeta is and always has been "the boy with the bread" to Katniss.
This proves problematic for Katniss, who from the very beginning of the novel seems to analyze situations in terms of "give or take".
She feels that since Peeta threw her bread in the rain that she is now indebted to him, which poses an even greater issue since she will now be engaging with him in a battle to the death.
Katniss even remarks to herself, "Oh well  There will be twenty-four of us.
Odds are someone else will kill him before I do" (33).
Katniss is a character plagued by social misjudgments, which serves an as interesting twist to readers who are sometimes more "in the loop" than Katniss herself.
However, her social misjudgments often concern Peeta, such as the train scene where she analyzed his attempts of trying to converse with and then cleaning up Haymitch as trying to gain an edge in the competition.
She does not allow herself to recognize Peeta as someone who is genuinely kind rather than someone plotting an elaborate game strategy.
In Divergent, Tris has never met Four until she arrives for Dauntless initiation and learns that the fearless looking young man will be her instructor as an initiate.
Tris seems to form an opinion on Four rather immediately by observing him and his interactions with characters such as Christina and Eric.
She acknowledges that he is perhaps dangerous but that he lacks the cruelty and condescending demeanor that Eric and the other Dauntless leaders possess.
Tris possesses more of an admiration and respect for Four rather than the competitive tension that Katniss experiences with Peeta.
This is primarily due to the fact that there is an instructor/student dynamic between Tris and Four instead of that of two competitors that will be faced with the possibility of killing one another like Katniss and Peeta.
Though the natures of the relationships between the main characters are different in the two novels, it is the way that Katniss and Tris approach them from the beginning that is significant.
Katniss is rash and inaccurately judgmental of Peeta while Tris is in awe of Four and his mysterious nature.
From the beginning of both Divergent and The Hunger Games most readers can sense the impending love triangles, which are almost a necessity in such otherwise harshly plotted novels.
However in The Hunger Games when Peeta proclaims the feelings of love he has felt all his life for Katniss during the televised interviews she assaults him with violence and anger, accusing him of trying to make her look weak to the audience.
She only accepts his compliments of her when Haymitch puts it to her in a way that she can understand- a game strategy to help her look desirable and gain sponsors to help her in the games.
The fact that Katniss never evens acknowledges at this point that Peeta's feelings are not only true but that he genuinely cares about her well being more than his own is key to her emotional and social lacking.
Katniss has never considered herself desirable to anyone and has always pursued life as the caretaker aiming for day-to-day survival; she does not let emotions like romantic ideas of love to enter her mind, especially not in the deadly setting of the games.
In a similar point in the plot of Divergent, Tris has allowed herself to somewhat fall under the security of Four as he administers the fear simulations.
When he recognizes her unique talent during the simulations and calls her out as Divergent, she has trust in him for some unknown reason as he promises to alter her results to protect her.
This is a key difference between Katniss and Tris; Tris has the ability to trust others without clear reason or ulterior motives and is able to make true alliances because of that quality.
Her abilities will assist her later in the novel when she needs a teammate along with friends to count on.
Katniss's lack of trust in Peeta throughout the games is evident, most obviously at the beginning when she actually believes that Peeta is hunting her down with the career tributes, when in fact he is attempting to lead them away from her.
If she had actually paid any attention to Peter and his obvious cues of affection she would have recognized his supposedly traitorous actions to be impossible.
Katniss does not allow herself to see the goodness in Peeta and instead of truly falling in love with him, she grows to use him by playing their "romance".
True, this falsehood gains tools that assist them both with survival in the games, but Peeta's caring attitude and love for Katniss is never an act on his part at any point.
Tris and Four engage in a real relationship in Divergent, and though Tris is unsure exactly what to expect and how to move forward in it, she does have true feelings for Four and develops a relationship along with a partnership.
The relationships of Katniss and Peeta and Tris and Four are not just relationships in the simple romantic definition that some readers might seek.
These relationships are also necessary to specific plot developments and self-realizations of the main characters that define the works as wholes.
In The Hunger Games Katniss in constantly untrusting and hesitant in her relationship with Peeta, sometimes lying or hiding the truth from him in order to always maintain an edge.
When dire situations occur, Katniss never fails to revert back to her proven theme of self-preservation that has serves her throughout her life.
After all, Katniss only entered the games to save the life of her sister and she competes throughout the games with the burning desire and need to win and make it back home to her sister.
Katniss was perhaps never even really emotionally vulnerable enough to engage in a true relationship with Peeta.
Though they are presented as teammates throughout the novel, Katniss always seems to rise as her own player in the end.
Her lack of self-awareness is very unlike Tris who is constantly self-aware during Divergent.
Tris constantly questions herself, wondering whether she is selfish or brave?
Or Abnegation or Dauntless?
It is these questions that aid Tris in self-discovery of herself as Divergent and her acceptance of that element of herself.
It is also Tris's relationship with Four that gives her confidence in herself and allows her to accept and embrace her Divergence.
While Katniss uses her partnership with Peeta to survive in the games, Tris truly engages in her relationship with Four and makes valuable self-discoveries as a result of that relationship.
Both Katniss and Tris play significant roles in their stories, and they both have relationships that aid them in one way or another on their journeys.
Katniss emerges, as a victor with Peeta at the conclusion of the games, but at that point in the series has not really done anything heroic herself.
It was Peeta who originally wanted to challenge the Capitol and the cruelty of the games while Katniss was focused on mere survival and making it home to take care of Prim, even though they both engage in acts of rebellion.
Katniss does develop throughout The Hunger Games but is held back by her lack of emotional stability and her lack to connect effectively with those around her.
In Divergent, Tris embraces an emotional experience and relationship with Four that enables her to assess herself accurately and accept herself despite the questions and insecurities she previously felt.
Her acknowledgment of herself as Divergent allows her to rise up as a heroine when the attacks begin, and they also allow her to save Four and their relationship.






Assignment Filename =  039draft1.txt
In the novel The Hunger Games by Suzanne Collins the people of Panem are constantly reminded of the oppression and control they are under.
Katniss and the other tributes are the Capitol's main technique of propaganda.
By looking at Katniss' actions in the final moments of the games, we can see that she is willing, no matter the outcome, to show the Capitol that they do not control all aspects of the districts and its people.
Katniss leaves the Capitol with making the decision of letting her and Peeta both die, leaving no winner, or letting them both live.
Neither one of these outcomes has ever taken place in the game's history.
Which most people don't see at first glance.
This is important because Katniss consciously defies the Capitol during the most crucial point in the games, for all of Panem to see.
These actions also set the stage for the rest of the series.
Throughout the book Suzanne Collins does an extraordinary job of putting Katniss' thoughts into words for the text.
Her choice in details in the passage on page 342 through the end of the chapter on 345 perfectly displays what goes in Katniss mind during the closing seconds of the games.
First, her reaction to Claudius Templesmiths announcement that now the earlier revision was revoked and now only one victor could be crowned.
Katniss is disappointed with the decision and with herself.
"And like a fool, I bought into it.
"  Soon after Katniss gets her feelings and her instincts confused, drawing her bow at Peeta's first movements.
The feeling of shame follows immediately.
After Peeta insists he won't be the one to kill Katniss she realizes either both of them will have to die or both of them will have to live.
"Because if he dies, I'll never go home, not really.
I'll spend the rest of my life in this arena trying to think my way out.
"  I think by this Katniss means if she killed Peeta, she would spend the rest of her life thinking about the games and what she could have done to have kept them both alive or to have let Peeta win and live.
It is what Peeta says next that begins to trigger Katniss' defiance of the capitol.
"We know they have to have a victor.
"  At this point Katniss' mind runs, and we see her whole thought process.
She totally disregards Peeta confessing his love for her because all she can think about is what he just said.
She thinks of how if there isn't one clear winner, the whole purpose of the games will be defeated.
She also thinks of the Gamemakers and how they will be publicly punished for failing the capitol.
I think this is what intrigues Katniss the most.
"If Peeta and I were to both die, or they thought we were "  At this moment is when Katniss remembers the berries she found in the woods and kept in case she ran low on food.
She is hoping to fool the capitol, but at the same time she is willing to risk dying to assure the outcome blows up in the faces of the people who put her and the other tributes in this situation.
Her next thought process and the choice of details Collins uses to explain it really intensifies the situation.
"I give Peeta's hand one last squeeze as a signal, as a goodbye, and we begin counting.
"  At this point I believe Katniss really thinks they are going to have to commit double suicide.
She sees this at the end and that the games will end in nobody winning.
And as they count we see her inner thoughts are displayed.
We can see that on the outside she did a good job selling the act.
But on the inside she is unsure of what the outcome will be.
"Maybe they don't care if we both die.
"  She now realizes it is now or never claiming to take her last glimpse of the world, right before the trumpets blare and Claudius Templesmith announces that the tributes of District 12, Peeta Mellark and Katniss Everdeen were the victors of the Seventy-Fourth Hunger Games.
Katniss went all in deciding to risk dying to show all of Panem their defiance.
And the Gamemakers didn't call her bluff.
This courage and quick thinking displayed may be the single most important paragraphs of the entire book because it sets the tone for the whole rest of the series.
The imagery used also helps intensify this already high pressure situation.
"I spread out my fingers, the dark berries glisten in the sun.
" When reading this line all I could imagine were the Gamemakers sitting in the control room and when they saw the berries all of their hearts and jaws dropping, knowing the best had been gotten of them.
Then we see just how close Katniss was to consuming the berries and going through with this fate.
"The berries have just passed my lips as the trumpets begin to blare" This line displays just how far and convincing Katniss had to play this to live, so far that she had already accepted she would probably die.
With reading the book, it is impossible not to pick up on how mature and intelligent Katniss really is.
But this small section of the book exploits Katniss and shows the maturity beyond her years.
Instead of immediately taking the win and killing the already injured Peeta who is almost dead anyway, she bypasses these thoughts and looks at the bigger picture.
We see how Katniss only thinks about how if nobody won how it would affect Panem later on.
She didn't care if she died.
She had accepted the probability of her death very early in the book.
Katniss was thinking about future generations like Prim, who she had sacrificed herself for her whole life.
It is these traits of Katniss, combined with choice of detail and the imagery that Suzanne Collins uses that makes this two page passage so critical to the book and also to the rest of the series, because if Katniss had panicked or jumped to conclusions and killed Peeta or herself, there would have been one winner.
Just like there always had been.
This would result in no rebellion that occurs later in the book which becomes the focal point of the rest of the series.






Assignment Filename =  039final1.txt
In the novel The Hunger Games by Suzanne Collins the people of Panem are constantly reminded of the oppression and control they are under with the annual Hunger Games.
Katniss and the other tributes are the Capitols main technique of propaganda.
At the end of the games after everything that Katniss had been through physically, mentally and even psychologically, her biggest test comes at the end of the games when it is just her and Peeta left alive.
By looking at Katniss' reaction to the revoking of the previously announced two victors rule, we can see that she progresses from self loathing, to shame, followed by anger and finally to a working solution.
This is important because it provides a blueprint for the decision making process in this extreme situation.
Throughout the book Suzanne Collins does a great job of putting Katniss' thoughts into words for the text.
Her choice in details in the passage on page 342 through the end of the chapter on 345 perfectly displays what goes in Katniss mind during the closing seconds of the games.
First, her reaction to Claudius Templesmiths announcement that now the earlier revision was revoked and now only one victor could be crowned.
Katniss is disappointed with the decision and with herself.
"And like a fool, I bought into it.
"  Soon after Katniss gets her feelings and her instincts confused, drawing her bow at Peeta's first movements.
The feeling of shame follows immediately.
After Peeta insists he won't be the one to kill Katniss she realizes either both of them will have to die or both of them will have to live.
Its Katniss' next thought that to me shows the psychological damage that she already knows she will have to deal with later on in life from these terrible games.
"Because if he dies, I'll never go home, not really.
I'll spend the rest of my life in this arena trying to think my way out.
"  I think by this Katniss means if she killed Peeta, she would spend the rest of her life thinking about the games and what she could have done to have kept them both alive or to have let Peeta win and live.
It is what Peeta says next that begins to trigger Katniss' thought process to saving them both.
"We know they have to have a victor.
"  At this point Katniss' mind runs, and we see her whole thought process.
She totally disregards Peeta confessing his love for her because all she can think about is what he just said.
She thinks of how if there isn't one clear winner, the whole purpose of the games will be defeated.
I think what intrigues Katniss the most is the thought of the Gamemakers and how they will be publicly punished for failing the capitol.
Katniss' double suicide plan is devised in her next thought.
"If Peeta and I were to both die, or they thought we were "  At this moment is when Katniss remembers the berries she found in the woods and kept in case she ran low on food.
She is hoping to fool the capitol, but at the same time she is willing to risk dying to assure the outcome blows up in the faces of the people who put her and the other tributes in this situation.
Her next thought process and the choice of details Collins uses to explain it really intensifies the situation.
"I give Peeta's hand one last squeeze as a signal, as a goodbye, and we begin counting.
"  At this point I believe Katniss really thinks they are going to have to commit double suicide.
She sees this at the end and that the games will end in nobody winning.
And as they count we see her inner thoughts are displayed.
We can see that on the outside she did a good job selling the act.
But on the inside she is unsure of what the outcome will be.
"Maybe they don't care if we both die.
"  She now realizes it is now or never claiming to take her last glimpse of the world, right before the trumpets blare and Claudius Templesmith announces that the tributes of District 12, Peeta Mellark and Katniss Everdeen were the victors of the Seventy-Fourth Hunger Games.
Katniss went all in deciding to risk dying to show all of Panem their defiance.
And the Gamemakers didn't call her bluff.
This courage and quick thinking displayed may be the single most important paragraphs of the entire book because it shows how mature Katniss is mentally and at the same time changing the course of Panems history forever.
The imagery used helps intensify this already high pressure situation.
"I spread out my fingers, the dark berries glisten in the sun.
" When reading this line all I could imagine were the Gamemakers sitting in the control room and when they saw the berries all of their hearts and jaws dropping, knowing the best had been gotten of them.
Then we see just how close Katniss was to consuming the berries and going through with this fate.
"The berries have just passed my lips as the trumpets begin to blare" This line displays just how far and convincing Katniss had to play this to live, so far that she had already accepted she would probably die.
With reading this book, it is impossible not to pick up on how mature and intelligent Katniss really is.
But this small section of the book exploits Katniss and shows the maturity beyond her years.
Instead of immediately taking the win and killing the already injured Peeta who is almost dead anyway, she bypasses these thoughts and looks at the bigger picture.
We see how Katniss only thinks about how if nobody won how it would affect Panem later on.
She was aware that they could both die.
She had accepted the probability of her death very early in the book.
Katniss was thinking about future generations like Prim, who she had sacrificed herself for her whole life.
It is these traits of Katniss, combined with choice of detail and the imagery that Suzanne Collins uses that makes this two page passage so critical to the book and also to the rest of the series, because if Katniss had panicked or jumped to conclusions and killed Peeta or herself, there would have been one winner.
Just like there always had been.
This would result in no rebellion that occurs later in the book which becomes the focal point of the rest of the series.






Assignment Filename =  040draft2.txt
Everyone has heard the term "Don't judge a book by its cover", which I'm sure at one point we have all been guilty of.
Whether it be judging a person, based on their appearance or things you may have heard about them.
It could possibly be a place, like a party you were invited to and before you show up fashionably late you call your friends already there to make sure its up to your personal "party standards" of girl to guy ratios, potential of getting busted, if your ex or crush is in attendance etc.
Judgment in this way comes in many forms.
But this time I am actually referring to a book and the message the cover sends you before ever reading a word.
Before reading The Hunger Games, I myself had previously watched the movie which I enjoyed a lot, and I could not help but wonder which I would dub my favorite after reading the book.
When I first saw the book cover prior to reading the only thing I really noticed was the mockingjay pin, which in the movie didn't play an entirely huge role other than being a pin that was given to her by a shop owner in the hub (which is not the case in the book) and before Katniss enters The Hunger Games Cinna hides the pin in her jacket to stay throughout the duration of the games.
The symbolism to me was not fully represented.
It wasn't until after reading the book did I fully understand the concept of the pin and the role it takes and the symbolism it portrays.
This is also when I began to understand what the book cover was depicting and the foreshadowing it gives you before ever even cracking the book.
The flat, drab, black background, combined with the symmetrical circles surrounded by the rings that to me represents order, discipline, and confinement.
The block lettering title at the top is nothing fancy, this combined with the background contrasts the mockingjay pin to a great extent and it is clear the pin is a symbol of Katniss' rebellion she coincidentally started by trying to keep her and Peeta alive.
Viewing the cover, I can't help but wonder, does the book cover depict a rebellion with the ability to become a revolution and in turn create a better quality of life for the people of Pane?
Or does it display the dangers of acting out against a higher power, and the consequences that follow?
I chose to visually analyze the cover of The Hunger Games instead of a scene from the movie, or a movie poster, or a piece of fan art simply because the author Suzanne Collins probably only had a say so in the choosing of the cover of the book, as she did not direct the movie nor create the fan art.
I feel like the cover is the clearest way to make connections to the text and find what they both represent, that, and I didn't want to resort to watching the same scene two hundred times driving myself crazy.
As I said previously, after reading the book, the book cover began to make a lot more sense in my head.
The first thing I related were the grey circles, which to me could represent districts that are obeying and in line with the order of President Snow and the Capitol.
The ring around the circle could represent the fences that surround each district and keep the citizens entrapped in the tyranny of their district.
This to me shows dominance and power, like a prison guard in a watch tower with a loaded weapon daring someone to test his shooting ability.
The outlying circle acts as a precautionary measure and a way for the Peacekeepers to have access to fully encircling and enclosing the districts and its boundaries.
Depending on your point of view, a conservative person might view these boundaries as positive, maybe compare them to our policemen that are just there to keep people safe, but a more liberal might view these boundaries as oppressive and compare them to police officers who take advantage of their power in order to heighten their self-esteem.
I personally believe these circles and the rings as a whole show how important it is to the Capitol to keep all matters of district life controlled, but it also shows the Capitols awareness of their treatment of the districts.
If they truly believed that Panems oppressive rule was for the best interests of the country, they wouldn't constantly be concerned with the prevention of a rebellion.
Metaphorically, I see it as President Snow constantly sleeping with one eye open for fear of his ways back lashing.
It is also made known throughout the book that President Snow wants to leave no hope for the people of Panem because of how contagious it may be.
This brings me to my next point.
As I stated earlier I believe the pin represents Katniss' rebellion against the Capitol trying to keep her and Peeta alive.
The mockingjay seems to be breaking through the rings that I noted earlier could be viewed as fences or boundaries, and whoever designed the cover shoes to leave the broken fragments of this "fence" around the very bright, golden pin.
The broken fragments display how the rebellion can leak out from one district to another since the boundaries are now non-existent.
With that I also must mention how the darkness surrounds the golden pin, almost swallowing it.
If this revolution is to spread from district to district the consequences will be great for all of the /"darkness" the rebellion will have to travel through.
This may explain why in the book, the train rides from one district to another take days at a time.
To buy time in stopping an uprising if it were to occur.
Other than Suzanne Collins' name displayed on the cover to note the author, the only words in text on the cover is the metallic grey outlined in red block lettering of the title.
Why not make the title more appealing?
Simply because The Hunger Games is not only the title of the book, but it's a law, a requirement for all the districts to abide by.
If you pulled up to a stop sign with the word "STOP" written in fancy old English font you would most likely wonder what the heck was going on, disregard it, and be on your marry way.
It reminds me of a child being told what to do by their parent with a very stern demanding voice to entice the child into listening.
Another note about the title presentation is that to me it resembles a war propaganda poster signaling dominance and possibly modern day communism.
Which by comparison of governmental theory, communism and the system if Panem seem to go hand in hand, or iron fist in iron fist.
With all this being said, I believe the answer to my thesis lies in the heart of the reader.
If you were in the situation of the people of the districts, would you see the consequences of rebelling as miniscule compared to the bigger picture of possibly living a better life?
With your other option being dealing with the oppression for life in fear of the repercussions being far greater than the freedom you may be able to achieve.
To me, by viewing the cover, it's clear that the chances of rebellion turning into a successful revolution maybe slim.
Slim, meaning there's a chance.
And if people think they have a chance  "Hope is the only thing stronger than fear.
"






Assignment Filename =  040final2.txt
Everyone has heard the term "Don't judge a book by its cover", which I'm sure at one point we have all been guilty of.
Judgment in this way comes in many forms.
But this time I am actually referring to a book and the message the cover sends you before ever reading a word.
The book cover has a flat, drab, black background, combined with the symmetrical circles surrounded by the rings that to me represent order, discipline, and confinement.
The block lettering title at the top is nothing fancy, this combined with the background contrasts the mockingjay pin to a great extent and it is clear the pin is a symbol of Katniss' rebellion she coincidentally started by trying to keep her and Peeta alive.
Viewing the cover, I can't help but wonder, does the book cover depict a rebellion with the ability to become a revolution and in turn create a better quality of life for the people of Pane?
Or does it display the dangers of acting out against a higher power, and the consequences that follow?
I chose to visually analyze the cover of The Hunger Games instead of a scene from the movie, or a movie poster, or a piece of fan art simply because the author Suzanne Collins probably only had a say so in the choosing of the cover of the book, as she did not direct the movie nor create the fan art.
I feel like the cover is the clearest way to make connections to the text and find what they both represent.
After reading the book, just by viewing the book cover it's easy to begin to make connections and deciphering the images on the cover.
The first thing I related were the grey circles, which to me could represent districts that are obeying and in line with the order of President Snow and the Capitol.
The ring around the circle could represent the fences that surround each district and keep the citizens entrapped in the tyranny of their district.
This to me shows dominance and power, like a prison guard in a watch tower with a loaded weapon daring someone to test his shooting ability.
The outlying circle acts as a precautionary measure and a way for the Peacekeepers to have access to fully encircling and enclosing the districts and its boundaries.
Depending on your point of view, a conservative person might view these boundaries as positive, maybe compare them to our policemen that are just there to keep people safe, but a more liberal might view these boundaries as oppressive and compare them to police officers who take advantage of their power in order to heighten their self-esteem.
I personally believe these circles and the rings as a whole show how important it is to the Capitol to keep all matters of district life controlled, but it also shows the Capitols awareness of their treatment of the districts.
If they truly believed that Panems oppressive rule was for the best interests of the country, they wouldn't constantly be concerned with the prevention of a rebellion.
Metaphorically, I see it as President Snow constantly sleeping with one eye open for fear of his ways back lashing.
It is also made known throughout the book that President Snow wants to leave no hope for the people of Panem because of how contagious it may be.
This brings me to my next point.
The mockingjay seems to be breaking through the rings that I noted earlier could be viewed as fences or boundaries, and whoever designed the cover shoes to leave the broken fragments of this "fence" around the very bright, golden pin.
The broken fragments display how the rebellion can leak out from one district to another since the boundaries are now non-existent.
With that I also must mention how the darkness surrounds the golden pin, almost swallowing it.
If this revolution is to spread from district to district the consequences will be great for all of the /"darkness" the rebellion will have to travel through.
This may explain why in the book, the train rides from one district to another take days at a time.
To buy time in stopping an uprising if it were to occur.
The golden mockingjay pin on the cover also may represent many other things.
Its represents the transformation of a once gloomy, grey circle that might represent an oppressed district, to one who has risen from the ashes to now freeing itself like a bird escaping from its cage.
With the arrow held in the mouth of the mockingjay it shows it is prepared to fight and defend this new found freedom.
Another thing the pin portrays is Katniss, she and the mockingjay are one in itself.
Katniss is from a lifetime of hardships and despair and now she is the face of all the districts and the freedom from the Capitol that they all want to achieve.
Other than Suzanne Collins' name displayed on the cover to note the author, the only words in text on the cover is the metallic grey outlined in red block lettering of the title.
Why not make the title more appealing?
Simply because The Hunger Games is not only the title of the book, but it's a law, a requirement for all the districts to abide by.
If you pulled up to a stop sign with the word "STOP" written in fancy old English font you would most likely wonder what the heck was going on, disregard it, and be on your marry way.
It reminds me of a child being told what to do by their parent with a very stern demanding voice to entice the child into listening.
Another note about the title presentation is that to me it resembles a war propaganda poster signaling dominance and possibly modern day communism.
Which by comparison of governmental theory, communism and the system if Panem seem to go hand in hand, or iron fist in iron fist.
By looking at the book cover of The Hunger Games we might ask ourselves, does the book cover depict a rebellion with the ability to become a revolution and in turn create a better quality of life for the people of Panem?
Or does is it display the dangers of acting out against a higher power, and the consequences that follow?
Could the bright mockingjay pin represent the much wanted freedom?
Or could it show us the danger you might face after attempting to achieve this freedom with all the darkness that surrounds the important mockingjay?
Can the light outweigh the darkness?
With all this being said, I believe the answer to my thesis lies in the heart of the reader.
If you were in the situation of the people of the districts, would you see the consequences of rebelling as miniscule compared to the bigger picture of possibly living a better life?
With your other option being dealing with the oppression for life in fear of the repercussions being far greater than the freedom you may be able to achieve.
To me, by viewing the cover, it's clear that the chances of rebellion turning into a successful revolution maybe slim.
Slim, meaning there's a chance.
And if people think they have a chance  "Hope is the only thing stronger than fear.
"






Assignment Filename =  041draft4.txt
Richard Connell's "The Most Dangerous Game" and Suzanne Collins "The Hunger Games" are both fictional stories about games which have only two end results, those being continuing life or ceasing to exist.
Connell's short story was published in Collier's Weekly on January 19th, 1924 while Suzanne Collins first book of the three part series was published in 2008.
Although the works are set in different very different time frames and historical contexts, the elements of the stories can still be closely compared.
The main characters of each story each have an experienced hunting back ground, yet they become the hunted against their will and the odds of winning are slim.
Also, both face demented foes that have no regard for the value of human life.
They are at the disadvantage and the proverbial mouse, in the age old game of cat and mouse.
By analyzing and comparing the two oppositions our main characters face we can see how our two mice use their past experiences to outsmart their stronger opponents in effort to save their own lives, we can see that even if short-handed and at a lack of resources, having intellectual skills, determination and a level head can defeat any foe.
This is important because the ending to both of the authors stories show that even the most powerful of enemies can be defeated if their disregard for human life is higher than respect they have for their enemies who's will to live is stronger.
Connell's short story was set during its present time on a remote Caribbean island where big game hunter Sanger Rainsford finds himself stranded after falling off a yacht that was headed to Rio De Jeneiro.
Rainsford was en route to Rio to hunt the jaguar, the big cat of the region, for sport.
Instead, Rainsford has gotten himself into a situation where, he himself will become the hunted.
Although Rainsford is a highly experienced hunter, he has stumbled upon someone who has taken the hunt to a whole other level that Rainsford cannot even fathom.
General Zaroff has grown tired of traditional wild game hunting and has turned his sights on preying after captured ship wrecked sailors.
With Sanger Rainsford being a highly acclaimed sport hunter and a noted author of his adventures, Zaroff is intrigued by the challenge his newest find will present.
In contrast, the setting of the novel occurs many years into the future in what is portrayed to be present day North America which is governed by what today's standards, would refer to as communism.
From what the book describes, what we know as the continental United States and its population is now called Panem, which is divided into regions or as they refer to them: "Districts".
These Districts are now under the control of the Capitol city for a rebellion that occurred seventy five years prior.
The protagonist of this story doesn't accidentally put herself into this high stakes game like Rainsford.
Rather she volunteers in place of her younger sister who gets randomly selected by chance in The Hunger Games.
"In punishment for the uprising, each of the districts must provide one girl and one boy, called tributes, to participate.
The twenty-four tributes will be imprisoned in a vast outdoor arena that could hold anything from a burning desert or a frozen wasteland.
Over a period of several weeks, the competitors must fight to the death.
The last tribute standing wins"(Collins 18).
In completely different ways both of the characters have gotten themselves into a very tight spot.
Connell's short story and Collins novel both contain elements that allow for us to make close comparisons.
Both main characters are inserted against their will into unknown landscapes facing the wrath of egotistical foes whose aim is nothing but death.
Katniss has twenty three tribute opponents to keep from taking her life as well as juggle President Snow's intent on the continuation of creating the most brutal games ever along with trying to avoid the highly technological advanced wrath of the gamemakers who can control all phases of the game by anything from manipulating night and day time, to exploding fireballs.
"The flames that bear down on me have an unnatural height, a uniformity that marks them as human-made, machine-made, Gamemaker-made"(Collins 173).
Sanger Rainsford is on the Generals personal island filled with dense jungle that only he is familiar with.
Rainsford faces a bit of a gamemaker himself.
"It's a game, you see," pursued the general blandly.
"I suggest to one of them that we go hunting.
I give him a supply of food and an excellent hunting knife.
I give him three hours' start.
I am to follow, armed only with a pistol of the smallest caliber and range.
If my quarry eludes me for three whole days, he wins the game.
If I find him "--the general smiled--" he loses."(Connell).
Zaroff, Ivan, and the sailors they imprison are the only inhabitants of the island aside from the General's pack of prized hound dogs.
The most important aspect of Sager Rainsford and Katniss Everdeen surviving these real life man hunt's is the pairs ability to use prior knowledge to keep them one step ahead of the enemy.
Rainsford is aware of Zaroff and his hounds tracking ability so he reverts back to fox hunting and the abrupt turns and dodges one would make.
After Rainsford is on the run for hours he creates an intricate trail that he says "only the devil himself could follow that complicated trail through the jungle after dark"(Connell).
As it turns out Zaroff just might be the devil.
He finds the location of Sanger but doesn't attempt to seek confrontation and just walks away in the direction he came from.
"Rainsford did not want to believe what his reason told him was true, but the truth was as evident as the sun that had by now pushed through the morning mists.
The general was playing with him!
The general was saving him for another day's sport!
The Cossack was the cat; he was the mouse.
Then it was that Rainsford knew the full meaning of terror"(Connell).
Rainsford's ultimate goal is to survive past the third day, he delays the Cossack by creating a tiger trap, killing his favorite hound.
Zaroff congratulates Sanger on being a worthy opponent.
Later, in hot pursuit, a recoiled knife takes out Ivan courtesy of a technique Rainsford learned in Uganda.
Rainsford has eliminated the two best resources the General has to assist in his hunt.
Zaroff now only has himself to rely on.
He does not have the brute strength of Ivan or the nose of his hound.
Katniss also eliminates her enemies' greatest allies to weaken them.
President Snow's greatest ally in keeping the Districts under control is the fear of being destroyed if they rebel again.
President Snow knows if the fear that's instilled in the District streets is compromised and hope is displayed for rebellion that it has the potential to spread like wildfire.
This fear is compromised when both Katniss and Peeta win The Hunger Games leaving two victors for the first time ever.
Although Katniss just wanted both of them to live, she has also started this movement of hope.
This shows the type of psychopath Katniss is dealing with, along with his disregard to human life he insists on the people living in the upmost fear of total destruction instead of living in prosperity and happiness.
Similar to Rainsford, Katniss fares so well in this game because of her prior knowledge of hunting for she bagged game to feed her family on a daily basis.
Something no other tribute would be capable of mastering considering its legality.
She uses this to her advantage as the bow and arrow is her weapon of choice throughout the series.
A similarity between the two characters enemies can be found in their methods of creating death.
General Zaroff prides himself on his great hunting skill but uses a group of hounds to help him track his prey.
He assumes his dogs will make up for any mistakes he makes himself and to ensure no prey can escape him.
Near the end of the Hunger Games, President Snow and the head gamemaker use genetically generated dogs to attempt to kill off either Katniss, her partner Peeta, or another tribute Cato.
The appearance of the dogs is a sign of the weakness of the system as a whole.
The games did not ensue how they anticipated so they were forced to use these beast like dogs to help speed the process along. 






Assignment Filename =  041final4.txt
Richard Connell's "The Most Dangerous Game" and Suzanne Collins The Hunger Games are both fictional stories about games which have only two end results, those being continuing life or ceasing to exist.
Connell's short story was published in Collier's Weekly on January 19th, 1924 while Suzanne Collins first book of the three part series was published in 2008.
Although the works are set in different very different time frames and historical contexts, the elements of the stories can still be closely compared.
The main characters of each story each have an experienced hunting background, yet they become the hunted against their will and the odds of winning are slim.
Also, both face demented foes that have no regard for the value of human life.
They are at the disadvantage and the proverbial mouse, in the age old game of cat and mouse.
By analyzing and comparing the two oppositions our main characters face we can see how our two mice use their past experiences to outsmart their stronger opponents in effort to save their own lives, we can see that even if short-handed and at a lack of resources, having intellectual skills, determination, and a level head can defeat any foe.
This is important because the ending to both of the authors stories show that even the most powerful of enemies can be defeated if their disregard for human life is higher than respect they have for their enemies whose will to live is stronger.
Connell's short story was set during its present time on a remote Caribbean island where big game hunter Sanger Rainsford finds himself stranded after falling off a yacht that was headed to Rio De Jeneiro.
Rainsford was en route to Rio to hunt the jaguar, the big cat of the region, for sport.
Instead, Rainsford has gotten himself into a situation where, he himself will become the hunted.
Although Rainsford is a highly experienced hunter, he has stumbled upon someone who has taken the hunt to a whole other level that Rainsford cannot even fathom.
General Zaroff has grown tired of traditional wild game hunting and has turned his sights on preying after captured ship wrecked sailors.
With Sanger Rainsford being a highly acclaimed sport hunter and a noted author of his adventures, Zaroff is intrigued by the challenge his newest find will present.
In contrast, the setting of the novel occurs many years into the future in what is portrayed to be present day North America which is governed by what today's standards, would refer to as communism.
From what the book describes, what we know as the continental United States and its population is now called Panem, which is divided into regions or as they refer to them: "Districts".
These Districts are now under the control of the Capitol city for a rebellion that occurred seventy five years prior.
The protagonist of this story doesn't accidentally put herself into this high stakes game like Rainsford.
Rather she volunteers in place of her younger sister who gets randomly selected by chance in The Hunger Games.
In completely different ways both of the characters have gotten themselves into a very tight spot.
Connell's short story and Collins novel both contain elements that allow for us to make close comparisons.
Both main characters are inserted against their will into unknown landscapes facing the wrath of egotistical foes whose aim is nothing but death.
Katniss has twenty three tribute opponents to keep from taking her life as well as juggle President Snow's intent on the continuation of creating the most brutal games ever along with trying to avoid the highly technological advanced wrath of the gamemakers who can control all phases of the game by anything from manipulating night and day time, to exploding fireballs: "The flames that bear down on me have an unnatural height, a uniformity that marks them as human-made, machine-made, Gamemaker-made"(Collins 173).
Sanger Rainsford is on the Generals personal island filled with dense jungle that only he is familiar with.
Rainsford faces a bit of a gamemaker himself.
"It's a game, you see, pursued the general blandly.
I suggest to one of them that we go hunting.
I give him a supply of food and an excellent hunting knife.
I give him three hours' start.
I am to follow, armed only with a pistol of the smallest caliber and range.
If my quarry eludes me for three whole days, he wins the game.
If I find him --the general smiled-- he loses"(Connell).
Zaroff, Ivan, and the sailors they imprison are the only inhabitants of the island aside from the General's pack of prized hound dogs.
The most important aspect of Sager Rainsford and Katniss Everdeen surviving these real life man hunts is the pairs ability to use prior knowledge to keep them one step ahead of the enemy.
Rainsford is aware of Zaroff and his hounds tracking ability so he reverts back to fox hunting and the abrupt turns and dodges one would make.
After Rainsford is on the run for hours he creates an intricate trail that he says "only the devil himself could follow that complicated trail through the jungle after dark"(Connell).
As it turns out Zaroff just might be the devil.
He finds the location of Sanger but doesn't attempt to seek confrontation and just walks away in the direction he came from.
"Rainsford did not want to believe what his reason told him was true, but the truth was as evident as the sun that had by now pushed through the morning mists.
The general was playing with him!
The general was saving him for another day's sport!
The Cossack was the cat; he was the mouse.
Then it was that Rainsford knew the full meaning of terror"(Connell).
Rainsford's ultimate goal is to survive past the third day, he delays the Cossack by creating a tiger trap, killing his favorite hound.
Zaroff congratulates Sanger on being a worthy opponent.
Later, in hot pursuit, a recoiled knife takes out Ivan courtesy of a technique Rainsford learned in Uganda.
Rainsford has eliminated the two best resources the General has to assist in his hunt.
Zaroff now only has himself to rely on.
He does not have the brute strength of Ivan or the nose of his hound.
Katniss also eliminates her enemies' greatest allies to weaken them.
President Snow's greatest ally in keeping the Districts under control is the fear of being destroyed if they rebel again.
President Snow knows if the fear that's instilled in the District streets is compromised and hope is displayed for rebellion that it has the potential to spread like wildfire.
This fear is compromised when both Katniss and Peeta win The Hunger Games leaving two victors for the first time ever.
Although Katniss just wanted both of them to live, she has also started this movement of hope.
This shows the type of psychopath Katniss is dealing with, along with his disregard to human life he insists on the people living in the upmost fear of total destruction instead of living in prosperity and happiness.
Similar to Rainsford, Katniss fares so well in this game because of her prior knowledge of hunting for she bagged game to feed her family on a daily basis.
Something no other tribute would be capable of mastering considering its legality.
She uses this to her advantage as the bow and arrow is her weapon of choice throughout the series.
A similarity between the two characters enemies can be found in their methods of creating death.
General Zaroff prides himself on his great hunting skill but uses a group of hounds to help him track his prey.
He assumes his dogs will make up for any mistakes he makes himself and to ensure no prey can escape him.
Near the end of the Hunger Games, President Snow and the head gamemaker use genetically generated dogs to attempt to kill off either Katniss, her partner Peeta, or another tribute Cato.
The appearance of the dogs is a sign of the weakness of the system as a whole.
The games did not ensue how they anticipated so they were forced to use these beast like dogs to help speed the process along.
These two stories do have many similarities within their main characters, Rainsford and Katnisss at the same time are also very different in terms of morality.
In The Hunger Games Katniss is disgusted by President Snow and has always felt uneasy around him.
After she kills him she is just glad the monster is dead and that her society is now a better place due to his death.
On the other hand Rainsford, after he kills the man who has been hunting him for the last two and a half days, stays the night in Zaroff's bed and Rainsford exclaims he'd: "never slept in a better bed.
" This shows a characteristic difference in our two main characters because Katniss would have nothing to do with the bed that President Snow slept in while Rainsford seemed to enjoy his bed a little too much.
"The Most Dangerous Game" was a popular short story in its time as well as The Hunger Games being very popular in present day and time.
What is interesting is the way our culture views what a hero or action star might look like compared to the early 20th century.
In an article Rainsford is described as: "a rugged individualist, square jawed, determined, and capapble of taking care of himself in any situation.
" (Thompson) while Katniss is:"a new archetype of survivalist girl power" (Scott).
This is intriguing because it shows how times have changed in our society, where just before "The Most Dangerous Game" was written, women were not even allowed to vote.
In conclusion, by analyzing and comparing the two oppositions our main characters face we can see our two mice use their past experiences to outsmart their stronger opponents in effort to save their own lives, we can see that even if short-handed and at a lack of resources, having intellectual skills, determination, and a level head can defeat any foe.
We saw this in both stories because Rainsford and Katniss, although they were being hunted, both emerge as the better hunters and end up triumphant over their enemies.
I believe the reason the two were victorious was because of their enemy's underestimation of their abilities.
President Snow never thought a sixteen year old girl could destroy an entire government system, and Zaroff didn't think there was any "animal" he could not track and kill.
Both of villains in the stories underestimate their opponents will to live while they are too intoxicated by their own disregard for human life to save their own lives. 






Assignment Filename =  100draft1.txt
President Obama addressed the nation on September 10, 2013 to discuss an attack on Syria for its use of chemical weapons.
The situation in Syria has been brewing for several years and now has come to a crisis.
President Obama's goal is to persuade the American public to agree with his decision to act on this critical situation through his strategic layout of information; He explains why we must act, lists what his possibilities are, and refutes arguments made against acting.
Through this structure Obama tries to persuade Democrats, Republicans, and international audiences.
While President Obama explains why the United States must be involved in this situation, he strategically places sentences to convince the American public that we must act in Syria.
He first explains what has happened in Syria and uses heart rendering imagery: "...men, woman, and children lying in rows, killed by poison gas, others foaming at the mouth, gasping for breath, a father clutching his dead children, imploring them to get up and walk.
" Obama uses the imagery to tug at the emotions of the audience, especially the emotions of mothers and fathers.
This emotion implores the audience to feel sympathy for those who were affected by this attack, thus giving them a motive for action against the Assad regime.
President Obama uses this to his advantage in the beginning to grab the attention of the audience and keep them in an anticipatory state of mind for the rest of his speech.
Obama starts with emotion not only to appeal to the audience, but to prepare them for Obama's plan of action.
Obama later states a fact for those who are not sympathetic towards Syria's people, "And in 1997, the United States Senate overwhelmingly approved an international agreement prohibiting the use of chemical weapons, now joined by 189 governments that represent 98 percent of humanity.
" He uses this statement after the imagery to appeal to those who think logically and not emotionally.
He puts this statement after the emotional one because those who do not trust government will need the facts to agree on an issue.
Here he is not only talking to the American public, but he is calling out other governments and nations that agreed with prohibiting the use of chemical weapons.
At this point in his speech he is not only talking to the United States; he is also addressing the international community.
He does this before he introduces what the United States is going to do because he wants the other nations to know what the United States in capable of and use this situation to be the example.
President Obama then announces his plans for addressing the situation in Syria: a targeted military strike.
According to Obama, "...it is in the national security interests of the United States to respond to the Assad regime's use of chemical weapons through a targeted military strike.
"  He dives right into what the military will do.
This is interesting because he does not state the peaceful route first.
This strategy is used to show the strength of the United States and the severity of the issue.
Part of his audience will like that the United States is finally acting like a leader and not tolerating this behavior, but others will disagree.
The military families, which are part of his audience, will disagree with Obama and his plan.
With that in mind he wants the military families to focus on what he talks about next.
The peaceful route is encouraging to the United States and the international audience.
President Obama describes this route as having "the potential to remove the threat of chemical weapons without the use of force.
" This route includes Russia, who is a close ally with Syria, and the good is to encourage Assad to give the chemical weapons to the UN Security Council so that the weapons will be destroyed.
A larger part of his audience will likely support the peaceful route especially military families because these families are tired the United States being involved in war.
Here Obama is persuading all audiences that he will pursue all peaceful routes until military action is needed.
He placed the peaceful path after his targeted military strike because that is what he wants his fellow Americans to take away from his address.
This way the audience a can put the military strike in the back of their minds and know that he is searching for a passive solution.
If he had spoke about the peaceful solution first the address would lose the strength and cohesion.
The intimidation factor would fade and Obama would be perceived as weak; With this path placed after the military strike he does not lose the intimidation factor, but audience will have peace knowing that Obama is not looking for another war.
President Obama then takes an interesting turn in his speech.
After he explains the military and diplomatic options for action, he answers some questions from the audience.
Letters from American citizens and concerns from Congress have questioned the United States involvement in Syria.
Obama does this because it ensures the audience that he has thought about this situation carefully and looked at opposing views.
He directly answers the questions of concerned citizens to display that he has read the concerns of American citizens.
He does this after he explains the options because he wants to be more personable to his audience.
This structure supports the strength that he has implemented earlier and is a strategic persuasive tool.
He starts by saying, "Many of you have asked..." This shows the audience that Obama really has thought about the American public.
He cares about the future of this nation, but he does not want the United States to just sit back and watch as the Assad regime gains momentum.
The question and answer section of his speech is important to his audience because it became a conversation between him and his audience.
Obama can do this because of the strength in the beginning of his address.
If he had started with this conversation his speech may seem redundant, weak, and confusing to the audience.
With his strategic layout he has created a strong conversation between him and American citizens.
The layout of the entire address is not solely considered when writing this speech.
The word use and sentence structure are considered; For example when a member of Congress asked if a pinprick military strike will do anything to intimidate the Assad regime to give up their chemical weapons.
President Obama said in his address that, "Even a limited strike will send a massage to Assad that no other nation can deliver.
" This is encouraging to the audience because it assures them that we have a stronger military than Assad's military.
Those who are watching internationally might feel intimidated by this statement because the leader of the most powerful nation in this world is pressuring another nation.
That sense of authority over other nations comes from the word choices within the answer.
An example of word choice is the word limited because it implies that the United States is able do far worse.
One example of a phrase is "no other nation can deliver" because this implies that other nations are inferior in power when compared to the United States.
The word and phrase choices were strategically made by Obama when writing this speech.
In the end President Obama implores his audience to come together in this critical situation and take away a threat in this world.
The protests that have merged into a chemical weapon war in Syria and has changed the dynamic of the United States' involvement.
Because of the chemical weapons used by the Assad regime the United States is pursuing ways to obtain the chemical weapons.
Obama's efforts in his address described what happened in late august.
In the organization of his address to the nation he explained why we must act in this critical situation, what plans are in place and answered uncertainties that the audience has.
President Obama uses this structure to persuade his audience in his address on Syria.






Assignment Filename =  100final1.txt
President Obama addressed the nation on September 10, 2013, to discuss an attack on Syria for their use of chemical weapons.
The critical situation in Syria has been brewing for several years and now has come to a climatic point.
President Obama's goal is to persuade the American public to agree with his decision to act on this critical situation.
He explains why we must act, lists what his possibilities are, and refutes arguments made against acting.
Through this structure Obama tries to persuade all audiences.
While President Obama explains why the United States must be involved in this situation he strategically places sentences to convince the American public.
He first explains what has happened in Syria and uses imagery like, "...men, woman, and children lying in rows, killed by poison gas, others foaming at the mouth, gasping for breath, a father clutching his dead children, imploring them to get up and walk.
" Obama uses the imagery in the quote to tug at the emotion of the audience, especially the emotions mothers and fathers.
This emotion implores the audience to feel sympathy for those who were affected by this attack.
Thus, giving them a motive for action against the Assad regime.
President Obama uses this to his advantage in the beginning to grab the attention of the audience and keep them in a curious state of mind for the rest of his speech.
He did not start his speech with what we were going to do because the audience might not know what was happening in Syria.
Obama is leading into what we are going to do in this critical situation, but he needs the American public to be informed of the current situation.
Obama later states a fact for those who are not sympathetic towards Syria's people, "And in 1997, the United States Senate overwhelmingly approved an international agreement prohibiting the use of chemical weapons, now joined by 189 governments that represent 98 percent of humanity.
" He uses this statement after the imagery to appeal to those who think logically and not emotionally.
He puts this statement after the emotional one because those who do not trust government will need the facts to agree on an issue.
Here he is not only talking to the American public, but he is calling out the other governments and nations that agreed with prohibiting the use of chemical weapons.
At this point in his speech he is not only talking to the United States, but he has addressed the international audience.
He does this before he introduces what the United States is going to do because he wants the other nations to know what the United States in capable of and use this situation to be the example.
Next President Obama address's the nation of the plans that he has developed for the critical situation in Syria.
A targeted military strike is best plan in this situation according to Obama, "...that it is in the national security interests of the United States to respond to the Assad regime's use of chemical weapons through a targeted military strike.
" This is interesting because he does not state the peaceful route first.
He dives right into what the military will do.
Part of the audience will like that the United States is finally acting like a leader and not tolerating this behavior.
He puts this before the peaceful route because his audience will view this as a back up plan.
The peaceful route is encouraging to the United States and the international audience.
President Obama discusses the peaceful route, "...but this initiative has the potential to remove the threat of chemical weapons without the use of force..." President Obama is discussing the peaceful route that includes Russia, who is a close ally with Syria, to encourage Assad to give the chemical weapons to the UN Security Council and the weapons will be destroyed.
President Obama gives this good news to the public.
The military families support the peaceful solution because they are tired of all the war the United States has been involved in.
Since other countries are involved in this situation the citizens of those nations want it to end peacefully and move on.
He is persuading all audiences that he will pursue all peaceful routes until military action is needed.
President Obama takes an interesting turn in his speech.
After he explains the military strike option for action he answers some questions from the audeience.
Letters from American citizens and concerns from Congress have questioned the United States involvement in Syria.
A member of Congress asked if a pinprick military strike will do anything to intimidate the Assad regime and they will give up their chemical weapons.President Obama said in his address that, "Even a limited strike will send a massage to Assad that no other nation can deliver.
" This is encouraging to the audience because it assures that we have a stronger military than Assad's military.
Those who are watching internationally might feel intimidated by this statement because the leader of the most powerful nation in this world is pressuring another nation.
In this statement using the word limited ensures that the American public knows exactly what he is talking about.
The word is basic enough for the international audience to understand.
The President is refuting arguments made against acting in this critical situation.
He even persuades his audience by saying, "Many of you have asked..." This shows the audience that Obama really has thought about the American public.
He cares about the future of this nation, but he does not want the United States to just sit back and watch as the Assad regime gains momentum.
The question and answer section of his speech is important to his audience because those are important questions that needed to be addressed.
Obama persuaded most of his audience that action is needed through this portion of his address.
In the end President Obama mentions parts of his audience to come together in this critical situation and take away a threat in this world.
The protests that have turned into a civil war in Syria has changed the dynamic of the United States involvement.
Because of the chemical weapons used by the Assad regime the United States is pursuing ways to obtain the chemical weapons.
Obama's efforts in his address described what happened in late august.
In the organization of his address to the nation he explained why we must act in this critical situation, what plans are in place and answered uncertainties that the audience has.
President Obama uses this structure to persuade his audience in his address on Syria.






Assignment Filename =  101draft2.txt
What are the benefits of GMO foods?
What are their risks?
Should GMO foods be labeled?
How healthy are GMO foods for humans?
The more that the consumers know about GMO foods the more questions are asked.
What exactly are GMO foods?
GMO foods are crops that have their DNA modified to resist certain diseases, bugs, weather, inhabitable soil conditions, and other problems that could hinder the supply of food.
To gain knowledge on these questions I gathered the following annotated bibliography and research reflection.
Aschbrenner, Joel.
Eller, Donnelle.
"GMO discussion shows sharply opposing views" 	DesMoinesRegister.com.
15 October 2013.
Web.
19 October 2013.
This article reports on a discussion among farmers, researchers, and others who work in 	the industry.
The debate brought up different arguments such as: there is no proof that 	GMO foods are bad for peoples' health, there is less land erosion from it,less pesticide 	use, less diversity within plants, among others.
One participant, Ruth MacDonald, said 	that GMO foods are safe for consumers.
She leads the food science and human nutrition at Iowa State University.
The farmers, who plant the genetically modified crops, lashed back and said their pesticide use is more frequent now compared to a couple years ago.
The large amount of pesticide use is costing them thousands of dollars.
The issue of labeling came up later in the conversation.
This would be a reliable source because many of the people involved give first hand accounts.
This leads credibility and value of the 	stakeholders' stories.
This article is good collection of arguments that are made on this issue and can be used in the future to argue different points of view.
Bartolotto, Carole.
"Why Genetically Modified Foods Should Be Labeled.
" Dick and Sharon's 	LA Progressive.
7 September 2012.
Web.
19 October 2013.
Bartolotto says that GMO foods should be labeled because we do not know their full effects on humans.
The least that these companies can do is label products that contain GMO foods.
Bartolotto has a bias for no GMO foods and does not present arguments for GMO foods.
She even says that the companies are greedy and power hungry so they spend millions of dollars to avoid labeling.
Although she has a bias toward labeling GMO foods this article is reliable because she provides statistics that I found in other sources.
She has a masters degree in exercise physiology and has been working in the diet field for over twenty years.
Bech-Larson, Tino.
Grunert, Klaus G. Lähteenmäki, Liisa.
"Attitudes Towards the Use of GMOs 	in Food Production and Their Impact on Buying Intention: The Role of Positive Sensory 	Experience.
" Agribusiness.
20.1 (2004): 95-107.
Biological & Agricultural Index Plus 	Web.
19 October 2013.
This academic article reports on an experiment in which researchers chose a sample of 	people from four countries, in the European Union, and the participants tasted different cheeses.
This experiment was don in the European Union because people in those countries are skeptical of GMO foods.
The researchers then asked the participants if they thought the cheese was tasteful.
The experimental group had a positive experience tasting the cheeses.
This is a reliable journal because I found it on a database through the library system.
Also, the authors work within this field.
The in text citations inform the reader where they can go to find out more about the subject.
There is more accuracy with this article than with others I have found because the results are posted within the journal.
This is useful to see how people react to eating a GMO food that is tasteful.
Eng, Monica.
"GMO supporter tells food industry meeting in Chicago to stop opposing GMO 	labeling" wbez.org.
16 October 2013.
Web.
19 October 2013.
This article features a strong supporter of GMO foods, Mark Lynas, who supports GMO labeling.
Lynas had a presentation that many agricultural companies attended and have taken time to think about what he had to say.
The main argument is for these large companies to be more transparent to the consumer by labeling the food that contain GMOs.
This article has many quotes from these agricultural companies that prove it's authority to the audience.
Eng does show that those who are quoted are pro GMO foods, but against GMO labeling.
Lynas is a mixture of pro GMO foods and Pro GMO labeling.
This is an interesting article that gives this issue a different point of view.
The article is very useful for explaining other thoughts on GMO foods.
This article is credible because Eng gives background information about Lynas.
She only reports what happened at the presentation she does not put her opinion into this article.
Food Inc. Dir.
Robert Kenner.
Perf.
Eric Schlosser.
Magnolia Home Entertianment, 2009.
DVD.
Food Inc. is a documentary about the food industry in the United States.
Kenner dives deep into the darkness that the food industry puts the consumer in.
He shines a light on 	how they raise meet, poultry, and pork.
A good portion of Food Inc. focuses on the meat production and packing industry.
Later Kenner moves into the GMO crops.
He gives a history lesson on Monsanto, the chemical company that first produced GMO seeds.
He interviews many farmers about Monsanto and what precautions the company takes to prevent farmers from saving the seeds from their last crop.
At the end of the documentary dives into the argument of labeling and how the large companies want to prevent it.
This is an empowering film for the consumer and tells the consumer that they can do something about it.
The documentary is very detailed and contains a couple of case 	studies, interviews, history, and statistics for credibility.
I will use this information in my essay to explain the industries power in the government and give statistics on GMO foods.
Haslberger, Alexander G. "Monitoring and labeling for genetically modified products.
" Science.
287.5452 (2000): 431-432.
Biological & Agricultural Index Plus Web.
19 October 2013.
This academic journal is informing of the GMO food situation in other countries.
Many of them have legislation put in place to regulate GMO foods.
Many countries label the foods that contain GMOs and some countries refuse to accept them from the United States.
This is causing many issues with exports from the United States.
Haslberger gives information from the European Union with references to make this academic journal reliable.
There seems to be no bias here because Haslberger is informing the audience of GMOs in other countries compared to the United States.
Leiser, Ken.
"Hundreds protest outside Monsanto headquarters in St.
Louis.
" stltoday.com: 
	St. Louis Post-Dispatch.
13 October 2013.
Web.
19 October 2013.
Leiser's the main objective in this article is to inform the audience of a protest that 	occurred outside of Monsanto's headquarters.
More than five-hundred people showed up to make their grievances known.
Monsanto is a chemical company that genetically modifies plants.
In the crowd a farmer, Mark Brown, stepped out for a short interview.
This article does not have a strong bias because it presents news from the protest.
Leiser had more access to the protesters because Monsanto made a statement on Friday before the protest.
This article provides information on Monsanto and on GMO crops.
This is credible because Lesier is reporting the protest and not adding his opinion to the issue.
This will be good to use as an example of how the stakeholders feel about the issue.
Round, Christopher.
"One thing Everyone's Missing About GMO Foods" PolicyMic.
16 October 	2013.
Web.
19 October 2013.
This article mentions the protest from the Leiser article and goes into more detail about 	the negatives and positive of GMO crops.
Round makes two good points in his article; an 	argument against is that the diversity among plants will diminish, and the argument for is 	that the plants could become resistant to heat or inhospitable soil.
A main part of the 	article focus on the diminishing genetic diversity and the complications of acres of crops 	wiped out by diseases.
He Mentions at the end that GMOs are not all around terrible because we can feed the world's hungry with the amount of food that can be produced.
This source is credible because Round is a graduate student pursuing a  masters in environmental science and political affairs.
Though the article does not mention the labeling issue is can still be used for facts and examples.
Reflection Essay

I knew a little about GMO foods and wanted to learn more, but some people are not informed about GMOs at all.
They don't realize that many of the foods they ingest are genetically modified.
So with what little I knew I thought that it would be good to find out more on this topic.
I held the belief that GMO foods are bad for your health because the DNA in the pure crop is naturally that way.
Also, people have been eating non-GMO foods for centuries.
So, I formulated my research question to be: are GMO foods good for your health?
However, because there is not definitive evidence that GMO foods diminish a person's health.
I changed my question to: What are the arguments made for and against GMO food and what evidence is there to support either side?
This question opened up several research opportunities.
I went to Google first to see what I could find on the topic/issue.
After finding several articles I moved on to the library's website for databases.
There I found two articles under the Biological & Agricultural Index Plus database.
These two articles provided me with good information, the only problem is that they are dated.
The news articles that I found are very recent and are up to date on the new strides made by the government for stricter regulations on GMOs.
I also used references from other articles to find out more information.
This expanded my search to find out about companies that create GMO seeds and sell them to farmers.
I later found a documentary named Food Inc. and added it to my sources.
This opened my eyes to a who new world of the food industry.
These companies intentionally leave consumers in the dark.
The companies have so much power in the government and support government leaders.
This turned the tables on just focusing on GMO foods to expanding to the food company's role in the government.
I learned more about Monsanto, the chemical company that introduced the first GMO soybean.
Food Inc. introduced more about the topic of GMOs and the labeling effort.
This shaped my argument further and strengthened my beliefs on this topic.
This issue has been developing for years because there is still no evidence that GMOs are safe.
This topic is still too young for anyone to have proof that these GMOs are either good or bad for human health.
My research informed me that GMOs are recent; they were not developed until the early 1990s.
That is why there is still so much that is unknown.
I still have the same position as I did in the beginning, but I am glad that I chose this topic.
It has opened my eyes to the arguments that are made.
There is still so much more to learn about GMOs and what benefits or consequences can come from them.
As time goes on more research will be done to obtain proof, but for now we must find out what arguments are made and decide for ourselves if the benefits out weigh the costs.








Assignment Filename =  101final2.txt
Genetically modified foods have not been in regular conversation since it's birth, but that is beginning to change when more people have learned about this subject.
There are several questions that have come up and raised concern such as: What are the benefits of GMO foods?
What are the risks of them?
Should these companies label the GMO foods that they sell to the customer?
How healthy are GMO foods for humans?
The more that the consumers know about GMO foods the more questions are asked.
What exactly are GMO foods?
GMO foods are crops that have their DNA modified to resist certain diseases, bugs, weather, inhabitable soil conditions, and other problems that could hinder the supply of food.
Aschbrenner, Joel.
Eller, Donnelle.
"GMO discussion shows sharply opposing views" 	DesMoinesRegister.com.
15 October 2013.
Web.
19 October 2013.
In this article the authors are reporting on a discussion between farmers, researchers, and 	others who work in the industry.
The debate brought up different arguments such as: there 	is no proof that GMO foods are bad for peoples' health, there is less land erosion from it, 	less pesticide use, less diversity within plants, and among others.
The issue of labeling 	came up later in the conversation.
This would be a reliable souse because many of the 	people involved give first hand accounts.
This proves accuracy and value of the stakeholders stories.
This article is good for arguments that are made in this issue and can 	be used in the future to argue any point of view.
Bartolotto, Carole.
"Why Genetically Modified Foods Should Be Labeled.
" Dick and Sharon's 	LA Progressive.
7 September 2012.
Web.
19 October 2013.
Bartolotto says that GMO foods should be labeled because we do not know the full implications of them on humans.
The least that these companies can do is label the products that contain GMO foods.
Bartolotto has a bias for no GMO foods and does not present an argument for GMO foods.
She even says that the companies are greedy and power hungry so they spend millions of dollars to not label GMO foods.
I believe that 	this article is not as reliable because the author has a strong bias and she is not a 	professional on this topic.
This article is more persuasive than informative.
The argument made in this article would be good to use in a claim made for labeling GMO foods.
Bech-Larson, Tino.
Grunert, Klaus G. Lähteenmäki, Liisa.
"Attitudes Towards the Use of GMOs 	in Food Production and Their Impact on Buying Intention: The Role of Positive Sensory 	Experience.
" Agribusiness.
20.1 (2004): 95-107.
Biological & Agricultural Index Plus 	Web.
19 October 2013.
In this academic journal the experiment that is presented is if people know about GMOs 	in their food that they will stop buying that food, even if it is tasteful.
A sample from four 	countries participated by tasting cheeses.
People in the European Union are skeptical of 	GMO foods and this experiment was done to see if these people could have a positive 	experience eating a GMO food.
This is a reliable journal because I found it on a database 	through the library system.
Also, the authors work within this field.
The in text citations 	inform the reader where they can go to find out more about the subject.
There is more 	accuracy with this journal than other articles I have found because the results are posted 	within the journal .
This is useful to see how people react to eating a GMO food that is 	tasteful.
Eng, Monica.
"GMO supporter tells food industry meeting in Chicago to stop opposing GMO 	labeling" wbez.org.
16 October 2013.
Web.
19 October 2013.
In this article Eng informs the audience of a strong supporter of anti-GMO foods, Mark 	Lynas, who has changed his view to pro-GMO foods.
Lynas had a presentation that many agricultural companies attended and have taken time to think about what he had to say.
The main argument is for these large companies to be more transparent to the consumer.
This article has many quotes from these agricultural companies that prove it's authority to 	the audience.
Eng does show that those who are quoted are for GMO foods, but not GMO labeling except for Lynas.
This creates a bias for GMO foods and not just the labeling 	argument.
Those are two separate arguments.
This is an interesting article that gives this issue a different point of view.
The article is very useful for explaining other thoughts on GMO foods.
Haslberger, Alexander G. "Monitoring and labeling for genetically modified products.
" Science.
287.5452 (2000): 431-432.
Biological & Agricultural Index Plus Web.
19 October 2013.
This academic journal is informing of the GMO food situation in other countries.
Many of them have legislation put in place to regulate GMO foods.
Many countries label the foods that contain GMOs and some countries refuse to accept them from the United States.
This is causing many issues with exports from the United States.
Haslberger gives information from the European Union with references to make this academic journal reliable.
There seems to be no bias here because Haslberger is informing the audience of GMOs in other countries compared to the United States.
Haspel, Tamar.
"Genetically Modified foods: What is and isn't true.
" The Washington Post.
15 	October 2013.
Web.
19 October 2013.
Haspel discusses in her article how much the public does not know about GMO foods.
We do not know if GMO foods are good or bad for our health.
This unknown leads people to take sides on this issue and not consider if another side has factual arguments.
Haspel publishes this article at a time when people are taking sides on an issue that they do not fully understand.
Her article serves as a reminder for all to research all sides of an argument and then a side can be chosen.
The author, Haspel, is a reliable source because she has been writing for more than fifteen years on food, science, and health.
This article is a reminder for me to research the sides of the argument and not have a bias during research.
Leiser, Ken.
"Hundreds protest outside Monsanto headquarters in St.
Louis.
" stltoday.com: 
St. Louis Post-Dispatch.
13 October 2013.
Web.
19 October 2013.
In Leiser's article, the main objective is to inform the audience of the protest outside of 	Monsanto's headquarters.
Monsanto is a company that genetically modifies plants.
This article does not have a strong bias because it presents information from the two sides that are mentioned.
Those who were protesting had more to say than the representatives from Monsanto, I believe because that Leiser had more access to the protesters.
This gives me more information on what companies are genetically modifying foods and some of the arguments presented.
This article gives me information on companies that are modifying foods and helps me in my research to find other relevant information.
Round, Christopher.
"One thing Everyone's Missing About GMO Foods" PolicyMic.
16 October 	2013.
Web.
19 October 2013.
This article mentions the protest from the Leiser article and goes into more detail about 	Monsanto.
Round makes two good points in his article; an argument against is that the diversity among plants will diminish, and the argument for is that the plants could become resistant to heat or inhospitable soil.
I am not sure how reliable this article is because there are no references from any research that Round has done and I do not know much about the website it was published on.
This article was published during the middle 	of this issue of GMO foods and gives the audience more points to consider when choosing what they agree and disagree with.
With this information I can use it to back up previous arguments mentioned.
Reflection Essay

GMOs are interesting because I knew about little about them, but some people are not informed about GMOs at all.
They don't realize that the food that they are ingesting is genetically modified.
So with what little I knew I thought that it would be good to find out more on this topic.
I held the belief that GMO foods are bad for your health because the DNA is naturally that way.
Also, people have been eating the non-GMO foods for centuries.
So, I wanted to my research question to be: are GMO foods good for your health?
This could not be my question as I started my research because there is not definitive evidence that GMO foods diminish a person's health.
After I found similar statements I changed my question to: What are the arguments made in the GMO food issue and what evidence is there if there is any?
This question opened up several research opportunities.
I went to Google first to see what I could find on the topic/issue.
After finding several articles I moved on to the library's website for databases.
I found one under biology and within that there was one for agriculture.
I used that to find my academic journals, that have more reliable information than the articles.
The only problem with them is that they are dated.
The articles that I found are very recent and are up to date on the new strides made by the government for stricter regulations on GMOs.
I also used references from other articles to find out more information on a topic listed.
This expanded my search to find out about companies that create GMO seeds and sell them to farmers.
This issue has been developing for years because there is still no evidence that GMOs are safe.
This topic is still too young for anyone to have proof that these GMOs are either good or bad for humans' health.
My research informed me that GMOs are recent; they were not developed until the early 1990s.
That is why there is still so much that is unknown.
I still have the same position as I did in the beginning, but I am glad that I chose this topic.
It has opened my eyes to the arguments that are made.
There is still so much more to learn about GMOs and what benefits or consequences can come from them.
As time goes on more research will be done to obtain proof, but for now we must find out what arguments are made and decide for ourselves if the benefits out weigh the costs.






Assignment Filename =  102draft3.txt
Would you question what is in your bread?
Many of us don't think about what bread is made from because we think that we know.
We are mistaken.
We have become ignorant to the knowledge of our food.
Food companies have developed the technology to genetically modify crops.
What happens to a crop when it is genetically modified?
Well, when a crop is genetically modified a part from the DNA of that crop is taken out and replaced with part of the DNA from an animal or bacteria.
The DNA is changed to "better" the crop in some way according to the seed companies.
The safety of genetically modified organisms (GMOs) is unknown; Those who know about this are challenging the food companies to label their products that contain GMOs.
Genetically modified foods should be labeled because they are not proven to be safe, labeling requires the food industry to be transparent, and consumers should know what is in their food.
First a few opposing views will be addressed not only to acknowledge them, but for you to decide your stance on this issue.
Taste can influence how someone perceives a GMO product.
A study was conducted in four European countries testing the sensory experience of tasting a GMO food.
The participants tasted the GMO food and the results came back as the experimental group had a positive experience tasting the GMO food (Bech-Larson, Grunert, and Lähteenmäki 104).
It can be argued that GMOs are fine because they have a good taste.
This argument does not correlate with the argument that GMOs are not proven to be safe.
These large corporations may say that GMO foods are not proven to be unsafe, but they are also not proven to be safe.
It is too early to tell.
The large corporations may argue that it would cost them too much to label GMO products.
"But labeling would require substantial regulatory oversight by the FDA, burden food manufacturers and add to the cost of food" (Aschbrenner, Joel.
Eller, Donnelle.).
This may add a cost to food prices, but to know what is in the food that we eat would increase the health of consumers.
Not only would consumers benefit from labeling the government would too because FDA could gain control of the food industry.
If the government did this many consumers would have a positive view of the government.
There are no facts that prove that GMOs are safe for human consumption.
Our grocery stores are packed full of products that contains either wheat, soybeans or corn.
These crops are the ones that are genetically modified.
"...the Food and Drug Administration did not do its own safety testing of GMOs before they were put into our food supply," (Bartolotto).
How can we, as consumers, know what is safe for us when we have put our trust into this large industry and all they want to do is make money by selling us these GMO products?
There are several experts that say that there is no proof that GMOs are safe; Steven Dunker is an attorney and director for the Alliance for Bio-Integrity and said that, "seed companies have never provided evidence to the federal government showing that  any genetically modified food is safe'' (Aschbrenner, Joel.
Eller, Donnelle.
) The seed companies that first created GMO crops have not properly tested the crops before putting them into the market.
Consumers could be eating something that is potentially dangerous to them.
Our health and the health of our children is at risk, thus GMO foods should be labeled to protect us.
Lets go back in history and look at another powerful industry: The tobacco industry.
For years they marketed to the public how cool you would look smoking.
The question of if it was safe was never considered by the consumer.
History is repeating itself.
We, the consumers are not told where they, the companies, are getting their food and the industry does not want us to see what is happening behind closed doors.
In the film Food Inc. this issue is addressed: "The food has become much more dangerous in ways that are being hidden from us.
" The food industry needs to become more transparent to the consumer, but they don't because if the consumers knew where their food came from they would stop eating it.
So, these large companies keep their farmers from talking about the GMO crops from the consumer such as Monsanto.Who is Monsanto?
Monsanto is a chemical company that produces DDT, Agent Orange, and RoundUp.
In 1980, when a law was passed allowing companies to patent life, a new opportunity arose.
Later in 1996, Monsanto created a soybean resistant to the chemical RoundUp.
They marketed it to farmers and by 2008, the patented soybean represents over ninety percent of the soybeans planted in the United States.
As more people learn about this topic the more they are outraged.
"The key issue here is transparency" (Eng).
Outside of Monsanto world headquarters over five hundred non-GMO supporters marched on the opposite side of the street to protest the GMO crops Monsanto produces.
A farmer that was present spoke up, saying that "Monsanto controls seed markets," (Leiser).
He also offered seeds for any farmer that terminates their contract with Monsanto.
Large food production supports large industry.
Who do large industries support?
"We have never had food companies this big and this powerful in our history" (Food Inc.).
These food companies support candidates running for government offices and this gives them the advantage over the consumer in policy especially Monsanto.
Because these former employees are in the government they can control if the GMO foods are labeled.
Since government workers have ties with Monsanto and other seed companies they prevent labeling.
The prevention of labeling keeps Monsanto happy and then they support those who are running for office.
What does this say about our government?
The normal consumer will not know how to pronounce some of the ingredients on a label of a produced food.
If you cannot pronounce the ingredient in the food that you are eating, do you think that it is healthy for you?
I say no.
If you have no clue what any of the ingredients are in a food product you are buying, put it back on the shelf.
Seventy-eight percent of the food in the grocery store have GMOs and much of the food contains GMO corn.
"So much of our industrial food turns out to be clever rearrangements of corn," (Food Inc.).
Our government pays farmers to produce as much corn as possible.
With the abundance of corn we have chemically turned the crop into obscure ingredients in our food.
Mark Lynas, who is an environmentalist and science writer, spoke at a food industry meeting about labeling GMO foods: "I'm here to challenge them and provoke them, which is why I told them today that they have to stop opposing GMO labeling.
I believe people do have the right to know what's in their food, and they as an industry have a responsibility and a mandate to deliver on that" (Eng).
Companies are spending millions of dollar to keep their food information from the consumers.
As consumers we should demand to know what is in the food that we are buying.
We are spending our hard earned money on food we think is safe for us.
We are feeding our kids, the next generation, GMO foods that are potentially harmful.
If we have no information on how safe our food is how can we trust these companies to tell us without proof?
Look at the ingredients of the food that you buy.
It is so simple to check before you buy.
You can change the market; make these companies label their GMO products.
It is as simple as choosing your foods carefully.
One less swipe at the grocery store by each of us can send the food industry the message.
We can change the industry.
Look at the tobacco industry and how as consumers we demanded to know the truth.
We can overcome and discover the truth they are keeping from us.






Assignment Filename =  102final3.txt
The food that our grandparents ate as kids is no longer the same food that they eat today.
We have turned to science to solve our production problems.
Large businesses have taken over the food world by separating the consumer from the source of their food.
How many of us can say what farm we buy our food from?
Not very many of us.
The food bought at grocery stores today is genetically modified.
When a crop is genetically modified a part from the DNA of that crop is taken out and replaced with part of the DNA from a animal or bacteria.
The DNA is changed to "better" the crop in some way according to the seed companies.
I believe that GMO, or genetically modified organism, food should be labeled because they are not proven to be safe, they support big business, and consumers should know what is in their food.
A study was conducted in four European countries testing the sensory experience of tasting a GMO food.
European countries label or ban GMO foods according to each countries laws.
The participants tasted the GMO food and the results came back as the experimental group had a positive experience tasting the GMO food (Bech-Larson, Grunert, and Lähteenmäki 104).
It can be argued that GMOs are fine because they have a good taste.
This argument does not correlate with the argument that GMOs are not proven to be safe.
These large corporations may say that GMO foods are not proven to be unsafe, but they are also not proven to be safe.
It is too early to tell.
The large corporations just do what they need to do to make money.
These companies may argue that labeling what their products are made with would create a change in tastes within the market.
This causes the consumer to move to non GMO foods and the companies to lose money.
Companies need to make a profit to survive, but I also think that each consumer has the right to know what they are putting into their body.
The companies that create these GMO crops say that these are good because we can feed more people with less space, water, and pesticides.
Sure we can give these seeds to third world countries that need the food, but most of the time the United States exports the crops.
Famers are using more pesticides now than ever and it is costing them.
Breeds of super bugs and super weeds are emerging that could wipe out all of our crops if we are not careful.
There are over 47,000 products in grocery stores today ( Food Inc.).
Our grocery stores are packed full of products that contains either wheat, soybeans or corn.
These crops are the ones that are genetically modified.
There are no facts that prove that GMOs are safe for human consumption.
"...the Food and Drug Administration did not do its own safety testing of GMOs before they were put into our food supply," (Bartolotto).
Lets go back in history and look at another powerful industry: The tobacco industry.
For years they marketed to the public how cool you would look smoking.
The question of if it was safe was never considered by the consumer.
History is repeating itself.
We, the consumers are not told where they, the companies, are getting their food and the industry does not want us to see what is happening behind closed doors.
In the film Food Inc. this issue is addressed, "The food has become much more dangerous in ways that are being hidden from us," (Food Inc.).
These large companies keep their farmers from talking about the GMO crops from the consumer.
There is so much that we do not know about our food today.
How can we, as consumers, know what is safe for us when we have put our trust into this large industry and all they want to do is make money by selling us these GMO products?
We have no idea, but like the tobacco industry we will find the truth.
Large food production supports large industry.
Who do large industries support?
"We have never had food companies this big and this powerful in our history," (Food Inc.).
These food companies support candidates running for government offices and this gives them the advantage over the consumer in policy especially Monsanto.
Who is Monsanto?
Monsanto is a chemical company that produces DDT, Agent Orange, and RoundUp.
In 1980, when a law was passed that you could paten life, a new opportunity rose.
Later in 1996, Monsanto created a soybean resistant to the chemical RoundUp.
They marketed it to farmers and by 2008, the patented soybean represents over ninety percent of the soybeans planted in the United States.
As more people learn about this topic the more they are outraged.
Outside of Monsanto world headquarters over five hundred non-GMO supporters marched on the opposite side of the street to protest the GMO crops Monsanto produces.
A farmer that was present spoke up, "Organic farmer Mark Brown said Monsanto controls seed markets," (Leiser).
He also offered seeds for any farmer that terminates their contract with Monsanto.
They are also involved in the government.
Monsanto supported the Bush administration and there are several former employees of Monsanto in our country's capitol.
Even in the supreme court (Food Inc.).
This is how they prevent labeling of their products.
What does this say about our nations leaders?
The normal consumer will not know how to pronounce some of the ingredients on a label of a produced food.
If you cannot pronounce the ingredient in the food that you are eating do you think that it is healthy for you?
I say no.
If you have no clue what any of the ingredients are in a food product you are buying, put it back on the shelf.
Seventy-eight percent of the food in the grocery store have GMOs and much of the food contains GMO corn.
"So much of our industrial food turns out to be clever rearrangements of corn," (Food Inc.).
Our government pays farmers to produce as much corn as possible.
With the abundance of corn we have chemically turned the crop into obscure ingredients in our food.
Mark Lynas, who is an environmentalist and science writer, spoke at a food industry meeting about labeling GMO foods.
"I'm here to challenge them and provoke them, which is why I told them today that they have to stop opposing GMO labeling.
I believe people do have the right to know what's in their food, and they as an industry have a responsibility and a mandate to deliver on that," (Eng).
Companies are spending millions of dollar to keep their food information from the consumers.
As consumers we should demand to know what is on the food that we are buying.
We are spending out hard earned money on food we think is safe for us.
We are feeding our kids, the next generation, GMO foods that are potentially harmful.
If we have no information on how safe our food is how can we trust these companies to tell us without proof?
Look at the ingredients of the food that you buy.
It is so simple to check before you buy.
You can change the market, make these companies label their GMO products.
It is as simple as choosing your foods carefully.
One less swipe at the grocery store by each of us can send the food industry the message.
We can change the industry.
Look at the tobacco industry and how as consumers we demanded to know the truth.
We can overcome and discover the truth they are keeping from us.






